I took my bf here for dinner on his bday and we enjoyed an overall satisfying rodizio dinner. We were seated promptly at our reservation time and our server was attentive and friendly. No problem getting any meat once we flipped our green card up! The side bar also had a nice assortment (cheese/salami/proscuitto/salad/veggies/pasta salad/mash potatoes/beans/rice,etc)...but don't get full on these before you get your meat! I tried a variety of meats like the tri trip, sirloin, filet migon (with salt/parmesean), spicy chicken legs, chorizo, chicken hearts, etc. I also loved the pineapple! So juicy and delicious! I found myself eating this on top of my meats! Overall the meat was good, my bf said some was dry but overall the slices were tasty. Price was $47 per person (slightly cheaper than Espetus) and I say worth it for the amount of food. Just make sure you got there hungry! I'd recommend Pampas for a nice dinner date or small group dinner but I would definitely would like to try Espetus to compare!
Pampas, seemed kind of snobby, but a nice place. Our party arrived, we weren't dressed fancy like most of the other diners, shorts, t-shirt, etc... also we had a baby with us. They seated us in the far corner towards the back of the restaurant. But, that was a good thing, we were close by the salad bar, we had extra room to ourselves, we were isolated from all the foot traffic, and the servers got to our table first with all the fresh roasted meats. They start you off with fried polenta cakes, fried plantains, and cheese bread, very good. Then it's up to you to attack the salad bar. Not as big compared to some of the other Brazilian steakhouses I have been to but the food was good. I recommend, of all things, the corn. It is boiled in herbs and butter, oh man... The fried mushrooms were decent, and the coconut sweet potatoes. Also there was a bunch of fresh fruit as a palate cleanser. The meat is pretty darn good, we tried everything, even the chicken hearts, which I recommend. The parmesan crusted filet, and the lamb chop with vinaigrette, oh man...everything else falls second compared to those two. The two I liked the least was the chorizo, and the bacon wrapped chicken, they were kind of dry. The servers are super nice, so is the wait staff, they would come by and clear your plates, and the servers would ask if you would like anything specific. TRY the grilled pineapple, it is eating super sweet hot pineapple, the best thing you will eat, unless you are either (a) allergic to pineapple, or (b) dead. Overall good, experience, would only go back there for a special occasion.
Wow- a TON of food so bring your appetite... but BIGGEST TIP I can share:  If someone ordered the $45 plate for all the different meats... You CAN'T share it with them. They came over to our table to tell us that if I wanted to have meat that I needed to pay for my own. The server never told us this before we ordered, which made me a little mad because I wouldn't have ordered scallops as well. Taking responsibility, he let me enjoy the tastes of meat but assured me that in the future, I would need to order my own. I appreciated him letting it slide, but every server at this place needs to mention that in the beginning, because it seems completely unorganized and unprofessional to tell a person that they can't have bites of their friends meat. For the price of this place, they should get that system down a lot better. Otherwise, the food is good and everything, but it definitely has a Tapas vibe. The buffet has lots of options, but nothing hearty like pasta or something. They have rice and beans and then the rest is antipasti stuff mostly. Not sure if it's worth the price for just the buffet, but if you've never been here it's definitely worth a try... for the meat that is. Talk about tender and flavorful!! I just wish they would let you take some home for that price!! I haven't asked.. but worth a shot!??
The best happy hour around. $5 cocktails and 50% off their lounge menu between 5-7pm, M-F. Ample seating, great ambience and live music. Cheers, mate!
Pampas, what happened? I wanted to take my cousins out as a thank you for letting me stay the weekend, so I chose Pampas because of a great experience I had a year or so before. I never expected to have such horrible service, it almost made the evening awkward. The restaurant was not packed and we were a small group, it took the server what seemed like forever to take our drink order. He didn't even speak when he walked up to the table, my cousin had to say..."Sir, can we order our drinks?" We didn't get the usual spiel about how a churrascaria works, just blank stares. It was bizarre. I'll move on to the food, it wasn't as great as I remember, many of the meats were over seasoned and the servers wouldn't come to our table very often. Maybe it was an off night, but this made me not want to bring people here when I'm back in town.
They make the drinks strong; that should say enough, but let's talk about the meat. The meat quality... Read more 
Went for happy hour and had a great time. It is a bit hard to find seating during happy hour, but you can always stand at the bar. Was extremely pleased with everything we ordered, but I didn't give 5 starts because the service was a bit slow and the waiter came back twice to clarify what we had ordered. Great ambience; bartenders and waiters were very friendly. Favorite dish: lamb meatballs by far. YUM! Empadas and mixed grill were delicious as well. The Classic Caipirinha was awesome; like a mojito, but way better. And for such good quality food, happy hour is very well priced. I definitely want to go back!!
Excellent food and service. Their dinner salad bar had hot and cold items - that alone would make a great meal. The unlimited skewers of freshly carved BBQ'ed meats is a real treat. A great place to go when the carnivore in you takes control. Great atmosphere and food overall.
Came back here for the first time in 10 months last Friday and boy am I a happy camper! To be honest, I think I really got to enjoy each cut of meat better this time since I've gotten used to the process and learned how to pace myself. I absolutely love my meat medium to medium rare and that's exactly what the top sirloin was. I think one of my favorite seasonings are the rock salt and olive oil. For such a simple seasoning, I loved it! The tri tip was also seasoned with rock salt and olive oil but the meat was so tender and the crusty outside piece I got was full of flavor. As always, I was anticipating the pork loin which was awesomeeeeeee and juicy. The filet was beyond tender and delicious. On the other hand, the sausages were not very impressive to me at all and the lamb chop was a disappointment. It had a weird after taste that I did not enjoy ata all. I usually like the leg of lamb but it wasn't available that day. :( The chicken leg was spicy and good difficult to get to the meat. The turkey breast wrapped in bacon was very hot and juicy but just alright. I've never been disappointed wit the service here. Our server was great and came back to our group multiple times asking if we had any special requests. He made sure the pineapple came around multiple times to us. Since it was closing, they brought more pineapple to us on fresh plates even after cleaning our table. Updated favorites: top sirloin, tri trip, flank, pork loin, tenderloin filet with garlic and herbs Eh: the sausages (linguica, chorizo), lamb chop
I loveeee this place! I've been here both with a large party as well as a small party of two. Both... Read more 
Nice, but not as nice as Fogo de Chao in Austin. The only meat I really, really liked was the top sirloin. Not sure why the others are raving about the roasted pineapple, it was just OK. Loved the sweet potato and coconut puree. The service was great, not sure what happened with the others. The benches are severely ripped and completely destroy the ambiance.
Hmm - they had torn pleather seat/benches.  That kinda threw off the classy atmosphere they were going for.  And the bf noticed the steak knife was missing a screw in its handle.  So meh, ambience could use a little tweaking. With that being said, their meat selection was okay - beef, chicken, and pork.  Maybe I'd be more impressed if they have exotic meats (say deer meat, or maybe bison?).  They did have chicken hearts though! Sadly though, I probably got too full fm their sidebar.  They have this mashed yam and coconut dish that I could not stop eating!  The quality was fresh and varied from anchovies to cheeses; it was strange I saw a vegetarian dish however.  Who goes to a steakhouse if you're vegetarian?!
I always wanna die when I leave here.  There's just so much meat and they keep bringing it to you and its so hard to say no cause it's so good.  Side bar also has a good selection of stuff if you need a break from the meat. Some of the meats could be more tender or higher quality, but for a buffet, this is probably the best I've ever had.  Make sure to order the chicken hearts. Service is generally good and the ambience is nice.  I've been here for bigger group gatherings as well as more intimate one on one dates.  The staff caters pretty well for all of them. Live jazz music by the bar is a nice touch.
We did a mistake to come here. Service is not good Waiter is rude . Please think once before you come here!
PARMASEN FILET MIGNON ! FTW! It could get packed here so reserving a table can be necessary. so this is how it works, they give you a plate and you can go to the salad bar to pick whatever you'd like to eat on the side.The meat part is interesting, so the waiters come by with skewers with a different kind of meat everytime ( they have up to 12 kinds of meat varying from park,lamb,beef(variety of beef sections), &chicken). Got a bottle of red wine to taste with the meat. They'll give you a circle card one side green and the other side red. Red indicates that you do not want the waiters to stop by and serve the meat while Green indicates GIMME MORE! Overall i was satisfied/food coma'd  and kept picking at my boyfriends plate even after i told them to take my plate away. Along with that we had dessert , we ordered the acai/berry flan ? and the chocolate mousse(only chocolate on the list anyways) or whatever it is i dont remember exactly but it was sooooo good.
Never had I been so glad to see meat on top of meat on top of meat. In the words of the Governator "I'll be back"
Haikus for Pampas (Palo Alto).... All you can eat meat Pampas churrascaria Rodizio style! Steak, steak and more steak Pork loin, spicy chicken Lamb chops, pineapple! A great salad bar I'd come just for the salad If not for the meat! Trout, veggies, rice, beans Couscous, cheeses, on and on All kinds of goodness! Guarana soda I enjoy like ginger ale Brazillian flare! Cheese bread, polenta, And fried banana platter Yes, keep it comin'! Dessert is a blur Probably from food coma Notice it next time!
I've been to many Brazilian BBQs.  This one is right in the middle.  The salad bar was pretty good, but not spectacular.  Most of the meats (as long as you got an outside cut) were very flavorful (only the pork and the turkey were dry).  The service was pretty quick (except if you wanted flank or picanha).  Price was a little high for what you got.  The servers were not very careful and made a huge mess.  If our table had been full, it'd become a sport to avoid the splatters. That being said, there aren't too many of these places in PA, so I'll be back in a month or two after I've recovered from my meat coma.
Came here on my birthday for a meatfest to end all meatfests and Pampas delivered!
Fantastic meats, cooked perfectly, except the lamb.  They had lamb cooked two ways the leg of lamb was fantastic but the other was overcooked and dry.  Considering how many different meats came out 9 out of 10 is still good.   I am not even going to attempt to describe the  the salad bar, but i will be coming back just for that.   My favorites were the filet mignon,  leg of lamb and the chicken.  $50 a person without tip and drinks. I saw two parking areas.  One across the street in front of the restaurant and a public garage down the street.   Public garage is free on weekends.  If you park across the street its $4.
A smashing selection of bbq meats and sides! Pampas provides a classy dining experience with its contemporary atmosphere along with modest level of background music from a live jazz band.  Upon entering this restaurant on a Saturday evening, we were warmly greeted, yet encountered a long wait.  If we knew ahead of time, we would've swiftly made a reservation on the phone. After being seated, the waiter informed us of how the all-you-can-eat BBQ worked (about $52/person, tax included). We then walked to the salad bar and found an excellent selection.  There were several types of cheese, vegetables, and other sides.  At the salad bar, I enjoyed the mashed potatoes, smoked salmon and crispy rice croquettes. There were seven different types of BBQ meat available.  We tried the majority of it.  The filet mignon was succulent, tender, and deliciously seasoned.  The roast beef had a wonderful seasoned crust on the edge, which provided an explosion of a charred, garlicky and herb flavor that is to die for.  The tri-tip similarly did not disappoint.  I believe the chicken selections were decent.  They were well seasoned, yet somewhat lacked adequate moisture for making it enjoyable.  However in the end, I was able to be uncomfortably full after this satisfying feast. I also tried the White Chocolate Cheesecake and the Coconut Flan.  They were well prepared and enjoyable even after being filled up by delicious meat. There is a small parking garage located adjacent to the restaurant. If you are at all curious, then this place is worth a try!
Upscale fine dining at its best. Great ambience and really nice interiors. Look at the menu only for the wine and just get the Rodizio ! Its an unlimited serving of a variety of chicken, lamb chops, pork loin and meat until you say that you cant take it anymore. The lamb chops was outta of the world. They have a very good salad bar as well but I wasnt really interested. They finish up with grilled pineapple towards the end which was really amazing. Overall, great staff, great food and definitely visiting again soon.
I came across Pampas, which was advertised as a Brazilian steakhouse. I found the meats to be excellent and the salad/vegetable bar selection robust. The meat kept coming until I put the red sign out! The waiter also recommended several South American red wines that were pleasant by the glass. Overall, I had a delightful experience and plan to go back.
I love meat in my mouth. No homo. That being said, it's ridiculous that after all these years, this was the first time I've been to a Brazilian BBQ AYCE establishment. Pampas is a nice restaurant, and of course we had to try to Rodizio. We each tried all of the meats they had to offer (don't judge me!), and I think our favorites were the lamb chops and sirloin (ironically better flavors and juicer than the "better" cuts of beef they had to offer). I think most surprising to us though was the fact that the grilled pineapple was SOOOOO good, and what we were craving after trying everything the first time around. It might have had something to do with the fact that we were eating all that savory, salty meat. Maybe. The side bar has some nice options to it too. I think the biggest turn off for me is that after tax and tip we payed about $55 each, and that was without any of us ordering alcohol. I'd like to give this review 3.5 stars, and I was close to rounding up to 4, but at the time of the review I'm feeling like rounding it down to an even 3 stars. I wouldn't crave this place, but would be willing to come back with someone who is.
We love Pampas!  It is the perfect restaurant for the meat eater.  It was quite an amazing experience.  They come around and bring out the various kind of meats - filet mignon, lamb, chicken, pork, sauages, etc -- all cooked deliciously.   It is so easy too over eat in this place. What is amazing is that besides the meat, the side bar has a very good selection too. We will be back.
Pampas has really transformed into a very competitive Churrascaria. With the decline of Espetus in SF, they have risen to the task of offering Rodizio de Speto of high quality. The quality of the meats and their preparation were very good. Today, they rate above what Espetus SF offers. The other dishes were very authentic and well prepared. Service is as good as a Churrascaria can offer. Buffet is very good, not an easy feat to pull off. Wine cellar is focussed on Argentinian Malbec and other fruit-forward yet velvety reds. It is a good cellar, with many selections otherwise not encountered in North America. As long as Pampas keeps up the good work, they will find us regulars (as much as can be for a Churrascaria :))
If you enjoy meat, then Pampas is the place to be! The Rodizio is so worth it.  The meat is high quality, fresh, juicy, tender, and extremely flavorful!  I don't really care for the salad bar.  It's just there to fill you up before you get into the meat! Happy hour here is the best.  Many drinks and dishes for only $5!  The lamb meatballs are my favorite from the happy hour menu.  It's full of spices and it's so juicy.  I'm not usually a fan of lamb, but  Pampas knows how meat should be cooked. The desserts here are also very tasty.  I have tried the cheesecake and the tres leches cake.  The cheesecake was light, and the perfect amount of sweetness! the tres leches cake was very moist and delicious. Service here is also nice.
I fell in love with churrascaria ever since i tried Fogo de Chao in minnesota. Pampas has since then filled that void, and I frequent here at least twice a year. I am a CARNIVORE and i love big portions, so I am in heaven when here. All their meats are delicious and flavorful, their salad bar is ON POINT, and the grilled pineapple is AMAZING. Also, try their chicken hearts. Eating chicken heart and other weird animal parts is nothing foreign to me, but for those who are less daring, you might be surprised; they are quite good! They also have a decent happy hour menu.
Whoa did we leave full... its was well worth the pain! This is a lunch review NOT dinner. Lets start of with the rolls that are brought to the table. I really enjoyed the polenta, the fried banana (yes banana not plantain) as well as the biscuit.  Try all of them... they wont help you in saving space for the goods (meat) but they are tasty. We came starving and left very full.  The buffet was extensive and had fresh quality food.  I tried the noodle dish on the buffet that I wish I grabbed more of. The rest of the buffet is worth mentioning but lets be honest... a review on the buffet is not what you are here for... its for the meat. We ordred "family style of the table" (Buffet and Meat) Chicken - chicken cooked on skewars. Very tender and nicely seasoned. Pork Chops - I did not have but everyone at the table mentioned how good they were. Flank Steak - I found the flank steak to be my favorite. New York Strip - a little more fatty but that comes with the type of cut. Filet Mignon - who doesn't like a nice bit of filet mignon?!? This is a great lunch spot but come hungry! I found the service to be friendly and attentive and the atmosphere to be clean, inviting with natural sunlight throughout.
Like it a little more than espetus.  The side bar is very good.  I especially like the mango and coconut couscous as well as the mashed sweet potato. Out of the meats,  I only like the red meats.  All of them were good, but my favorite had to be the flank steak and tri-tip.  The special sauce they give you is great and I put it on all the meats.  I'm not usually a fan of lamb, but the lamb chops were very juicy without the strong lamb taste. You must also try the Cosmo do diabo drink.  It is sweet and spicy.
Food was great, but the waitstaff stopped bringing around the meat skewers before we were full.  Given that we had a party of 20, we were very disappointed in the service.
I've been to many Brazilian places but this was too expensive and the food was ok. I would say that it was not good food for the price I paid. I would recommend go to other Brazilian place.
If you haven't been to Brazilian steakhouse (churrascaria) and you like meat, you're missing one of life's great experiences. It's the best of all worlds: varieties of meat, always piping hot, and just a few bites each time. As far as churrascarias go, Pampas is a very good one. High end atmosphere so a great date night (assuming your date's not vegetarian). Great salad bar (all you can eat).
Went here with a bunch of friends for dinner. Each of us ordered the Rodizio. Which is the all you can eat meat with sidebar. Great choices of greens, mashed potatoes (mmm coconut sweet potatoes ) fresh tomatoes, mushrooms and anti pasta complete the sidebar. My drink choice was  the Cosmo do Diabo. It had the right amount of spice and flavor to wake up the taste buds. Now the main reason for visiting this establishment. The meat. I was disappointed in the seasoning of the majority of the meat choices. The top sirloin was my least favorite, the flank was ok and the filet with the Parmesan and without was the best. I  expected the filet to be the best of the meat but, the difference in seasoning should have not been so far from the other cuts. My overall favorite was not a beef choice but a turkey one. The bacon wrapped turkey. Bacon makes everything better. Maybe the other meat choices should have also been wrapped in it. Servicewise, the meat did not come out quick enough for me and the unpopular choices repeated too often. If the meat and service matched the drinks and sidebar. Pampas would have received 5 stars.
When this restaurant first opened, about 5 or 6 years ago, we loved it and readily recommended it to our friends.  So after seeing a matinee opera in Palo Alto, we decided to go here for dinner.  I will *NEVER* go here again and I will *NEVER* again recommend it. I had made a reservation for a party of 3 at 5:45 p.m.; in the past, this was prime time for this restaurant (especially on the weekends) so I figured it was a good idea to reserve. When we arrived at 5:30-ish, the very rude hostess attempted to seat us downstairs (where the servers circulate very sparsely).  I asked if we could have a seat on the main level, and she curtly replied, "Oh, we like to keep those for the people who have a reservation."  I told her that we *did* have a reservation and that there did look to be tables available on the main level. She was very rude in her reply, and in a very snotty tone, said, "those are for the reserved parties."  It was only when my husband glared at her that she added, "Oh, I mean for parties of like 6 or more."  She then proceeded to seat us in a corner on the main level. Now for the food.  The quality of the food has gone down.  In the past, the meats were juicy and the size of the meat slices were decent.  The selections were very sparse, to say the least.  The pork was dry and overcooked; the lamb was mutton and had the taste and texture of cardboard; the turkey with bacon was overcooked and dry and the tri-tip was tough.  The sausages, which, in the past, were the size of Italian sausages, looked more like cocktail weiners than sausages.  The only things that were passable were the filet mignon and the pineapple. This place is overpriced for the quality of the food--at almost $50 per person, I would expect better cuts of meat, better food preparation and certainly, better front service.  Our waiter was the only thing that was nice about the entire experience.   I will never eat here again, nor will I ever recommend it again either.
5 Stars for the Happy Hour / Bar.  Looooovvveeee it!  The bartenders are excellent and you cannot beat their happy hour!  All the food is half off and AMAZING!  Love the fried Yucca!  #Keeping it classy in DTPA.
Pretty decent brazillian spot.  I'd prefer Espetus but this is definately worth it for the price.  Ambiance is so-so.  They need to do something about the ceiling, very unattractive white pipes throughout the building.  Food was really good though. Girl who sat us to our table looked like she was ready to hit the club with her hoochie skirt, gf and I noticed and laughed about it during dinner
THIS PLACE IS A MEAT LOVER'S HEAVEN. The deal here is phenomenal a Rodizio style meal is $47 which also includes a side bar which is equipped with a salad bar, cheese, mashed potatoes and so much other items! The Rodizio style entree lets you have an unlimited tasting menu of various meats, such as lamb, chicken, top sirlon, filet mignon , rib eye, pineapple... so much more! Also this place was PACKED for a Wednesday night when I had dined here. It was still packed even when i was leaving around 9:30. Minus 1 star for their duck entree which was overcooked and dry. If you're looking for good company and good eats this is the place to go!
Great meat!  One of the best steaks I've had!
Happy Hour review only. Great happy hour.  First of all it ends at 7pm, slightly later than most places.  All drinks at $5 and all appetizers are half off.  Let's just say I got a bit excited. We ordered - 3 each of the classic caipirinha (props to the bartender for making them both tasty and strong.) - sliders- comes with three sliders.  My favorite item that we ordered - yucca fries-  okay, very starchy - lamb meatballs- not bad, eat it with the tomatoes on the side and they taste a bit better.  Was happy that they weren't dry or overcooked like meatballs sometimes can be - ceviche- okay. - calamari- mm.great dish. The food and drinks were all great.  The lounge area is a bit small, so I would recommend going earlier for happy hour.  The main thing is that it's really hard to get anyone's attention.  There really is only one guy working the entire lounge.  Well there's another guy, but he seems to just washing glasses.  So every time we tried to add something to our order it took a while.
Lunch Review: Simply.Delicious. Brazilian BBQ places are few and far in California and the first one I've ever dined at was in my hometown in San Diego (Rei Do Gado). Thinking that this place could never live up to RDG, I was in for a pleasant surprise. The decor and ambiance was very modern contemporary. Think of it as a place you'd go for an art exhibit but with tables, an upstairs seating area, and a downstairs private room which you can view on the first level since it has windows for one to peer into and feel jealous.. Anywho, just like RDG, this place has guys walking around with all different kinds of meats on skewers, but only during dinner time. From sirloin steak to filet mignon, this place has a plethora of meats to try. For lunch however, ordering the Family Style ($28 per person) gives you a plate of Shrimp, pork chops, filet mignon, and NY Strip, instead of the guys walking around with the skewers, BUT they also give you access to their SIDE BAR! Their side bar has a nice selection of cold dishes such as cous cous, coconut risotto, and marinated mushrooms, with the addition of a small but pleasant cheese variety. What's great about this place is their option of choosing several appetizers and other entrees (which are a lot CHEAPER) if you don't feel up to the challenge of eating tons of meat, pork and chicken. My only gripe is I wish their side bar had hot dishes like the one back in SD. Other than that, this place is a must try for anyone that loves meat, good service, modern-looking restaurant, and tons of food variety. And not to mention the complimentary cheesy bread balls, polenta, and another item I forgot! Cheers!
Every time my stomach growls for meat, I think of once place and once place only. Pampas. It's crazy to actually think someone would dream about meat, but it's what I do. I dream about Pampas's meats. The food is cooked to perfection, very tasty, extremely tender, astoundingly flavorful and superbly succulent! Simply put: Mouth watering. Ahahha. Pardon me, but you can't just describe their food with petty terms such as "good".  I've never had the privilege of tasting their Rodizio, but I've tried a snippet of their meats from a rice plate on the Happy Hour menu. The lamb meatballs are also amazing.. it has spices you can distinguish with every bite. One of the highlights here besides the food, is their very talkative and attentive bar tenders. My favorite one is a gentleman with blondish hair. This guy is extremely funny and knows exactly what to say. If you happen to catch him working, stir up a conversation, it's worth it. Also, if you're a business owner, you'd be a fool not to give him your card. Final words? If you're trying to look on Yelp to see if this restaurant is suitable for you, stop what you're doing and go to Pampas NOW.. Don't waste time.. it may be your only chance!
Don't waste your time with the side dishes - they're meant to make you full so you have less room for the meat. Personally, if you want to make the most out of your meal, skip the salad and go strait to the mushrooms, black beans, rice, and mashed potatoes and you will not forget it. In terms of the meat my favorites were the TRI-TIP and the PORK LOIN. I know, I know, the latter isn't what you were expecting but trust me, it's delicious. It has this almost curry-like skin that is just amazing. Beware of the tri-tip! Try and get the inside of pieces for the most tender and juiciest slices. Otherwise, the parmesan steak was pretty good as was the filet mignon. I also had the turkey wrapped in bacon which was a bit too salty for my taste, but good nonetheless. Our most recent trip was on Mother's Day which they offered bottomless mimosas for $12! Who could say no to that?
Wow, I can't decide which one I like better, Pampas or Espetus. While Espetus is a little more formal, Pampas is more modern and trendy. I really like the lounge/house/bossa nova they play here. The layout of the space is more intimate than Espetus. Came for a Thursday guys night out and this place was popular for happy hour with a well dressed crowd of 20/30 something professionals. Instead of hanging out at the bar, the fellas and I did the AYCE Rodizio (w/tax & tip $55). Here's where I think Espetus is a little better, the meat dept. - The feijoada here was meh, missing the plump chunks of beef/pork it was missing the depth of flavor to go with the stewed beans. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) - While the meats here were very good (fresh, cooked perfectly, and well seasoned), I liked the skirt steak, garlic/herb and parmesan tenderloin, and lamb chop the best. It was missing a showstopper meat like Espetus' beef rib and feijoada. ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) Tough to make a decision so I'd say it depends on your occasion. Date night? Pampas. Going out with your family/older people? Espetus.
I LOVE MEAT !!! We finally had the chance to dine here after driving by it on the way to work for the last few years!!! We've been to their Las Vegas location a couple of times, but this PA location is so much nicer. We were joined by our close friends (Jonathan & Catherine) and we both had the grandparents babysit our rug-rats, errr kids for our date night. Reservations are highly necessary. This place gets packed easily around dinner & Happy Hour. The reason we fasted all day was to take advantage of the Rodizio (All-You-Can-Eat Brazilian meat ) feast!!! I'm not sure what else I can add to all their positive YELP reviews, but we really loved the *special ordered- chicken hearts, grilled pineapple, top sirloin, bacon wrapped turkey sausage, and their side bar with an array of CHEESES and more !!! ;-) Our service staff was stellar and on point. Plus, the red wine and several fresh mimosas hit the spot!!! We can't wait to eat here again really soon....Cheers!!!
The sidebar (buffet table) is a diverse spread of cold salads and finger foods like smoked salmon and assorted olives and cheese. Smoked Gouda is my favorite and they had PLENTY! The bowl of anchovies was a nice touch. The sidebar is like a fancier version of Sweet Tomatoes. You also get less of a selection, but the quality of spread is phenomenally better. Factor in the $27 price tag though and a selection of mostly cold and meatless dishes becomes less appealing after each bite. It may be a vegetarian's heaven, but if you are an omnivore like I am, I need some meat with my anchovy salad. That's why you have to go with the forty six dollar Rodizio if you are going to dine here. Here's what I felt. Only the top sirloin, tri-tip, and chicken heart were outstanding. I have an affinity for chicken hearts. Definitely my favorite offal to consume - they are intensely chewy morsels that pack an iron punch. Unfortunately, the other cuts of beef weren't cooked as well. I like my meats usually at medium with jus dripping from every pore. The seasoning was kept simple to accentuate the meat flavors, but some of the meats served weren't tender. A marinade may have helped. As a rule of thumb, I stay away from chicken unless it's dark meat and the breasts looked a bit dry. My girlfriend agreed after she ate a piece. The only bird worth mentioning was the turkey wrapped in pig. Of course it was tasty because everything wrapped in bacon is lip-smackingly delicious. Try durian wrapped in bacon. Shit is amazing! We did not try any dessert for fear of our stomachs rupturing, but they looked scrumptious. Overall, it was a pleasant experience. The food was good and the crowd was energetic and vibrant. The vibe was inviting. The wait staff was also friendly and courteous. I would rate it in a range between 3-4 stars. I'm sure I'll be back for another random occasion. P.S. Don't eat the biscuits they serve! They are addiciting and made strategically to deter you from eating more meat. Even the size of the starch ball was designed to make you eat more of it. They are like eating donut holes. They go down easy and you don't feel them till you've eaten more than a dozen. Don't even smell them or the buttery aroma will nullify your resolve. Be strong.
Had dinner reservations for a friday and we were seated immediately upon arrival. The restaurant area was pretty empty, so there really wasn't a need for the reservation. The bar area, on the other hand was packed. The boyfriend and I did the rodizio. The side bar was amazing; there's just so many options. I would definitely go back for just the side bar. The unlimited meat on the other hand, was not so amazing. The meats were all pre-cooked and kept warm and because of that, I thought the meats were overcooked, tough, and chewy. Service was good. Our server kept asking us if we missed a meat or if we wanted another meat again, so that was nice.
I love Pampas! I don't often go because it would probably take years off my life eating that much meat on a regular basis! I always do the rodizio (the waiters bring a variety of meats and slice off bits for you dining pleasure). The side bar is a great supplement. I would not recommend this place for vegetarians and defiantly not for vegans. One of the best parts of this place is the service. The wait staff is fantastic! Great place for a special date night.
We had a really nice meal here on a Friday night with my mother- and father-in-law who were visiting from out of town. We had an early reservation around 6:30 and were seated immediately - the restaurant is huge and it was already quite full at that time. Service was quite good, it wasn't completely buttoned up (brought the wrong wine, ended up being the wine for the table next to us), but still very good. I liked that our waiter came to check on us frequently even though he really isn't doing much since it's the guys bringing the meat around who we're waiting for. he did check in to see if there was anything we missed or wanted more of and they promptly came around with that. The salad bar area was very fresh and while I was trying not to fill up on that stuff, it all seemed to be good quality and a huge selection. The meat was all good but not amazing. i think I liked the tri tip best. It's a fun place to go and obviously you get to try a lot of different things, but I only need a place like this every once in a while. Otherwise I'd rather spend the same amount to get a really good steak.
Excellent rodizio experience in the south bay. If you are a meat lover, and enjoy hot food coming to your table, and picking choice cuts, this is a great choice. They have a fresh vegetarian bar, which has a unique set of salads and cheese to pick from. Wine selections are okay, good with the meal. Its a fantastic choice for large groups, business meetings and events.
Easy to make reservations for here on OpenTable. Great ambiance, perfect service, clean restaurant, and pretty good food. Fun place to have a special meal or a big group dinner. The meat that circles around tastes pretty much the same with exception of the filet mignon (which is awesome). The turkey is also good and the pineapple just lovely. There was something wrapped in bacon and the bacon wasn't just not crispy -  it was hardly cooked. The salad bar area is one of the best things about the palce.
Whoa...just finished reading Shannon L's review, and I was going to write the exact same thing. She... Read more 
Mmm...meat.  So much to like about Pampas.  I liked most cuts of meat (favorites being the filet, flank, and lamb shank) and the salad bar was quite good.  I would rate the salad bar as better than Fogo de Chao's (Beverly Hills version). I also really liked the grilled pineapple.  Yummm. Minor complaints: We were waiting for meat for a while sometimes, and certain cuts of meat just never came out even after we requested them.  Also, while service was friendly, I wish they spoke a little better English; I had trouble understanding what cuts of meat were offered at times. The space was pretty cool, especially how they designed the upstairs/basement areas.   It was on the trendy side, which was also how many of the restaurant-goers dressed (as if they were about to go to a club next). Finally, try the chicken hearts! I didn't like them, but glad I was daring enough to try it :P
The quality of the service does not match the expense of this place. Tip to staff: never ask your patrons to leave to make room for new guests. That's not how you treat those that keep your business alive.  Too bad we had already paid gratuity.
Came here last night with the roomies for a celebration in which one of my roomates got a new job. I had never been here before but one of my roomates have. She told me about the unlimited meat and food bar deal, only 44.00!  We were a party of six and four of us got this deal. When I went up to the food bar it included salad with very fresh toppings. The salad dressing was a lot different too, pinapple dressing was the one I tried and it was very good! Included in this bar was fresh veggies like asparagus, corn, tomatoes and hot items as well like whipped potatoes, corn, grilled veggies. In addition they had a cheese bar which had me sold! Loved the variety. After we sat down we had this one guy bring us the first selection of meat which was filet mignon. Super good.They cut it up right infront of you. A+ for presentation. They give you a table signal to let them know if you have had enough or keep it coming.  We tried chicken, filet mignon, rib eye and too many more to name, we even  tried chicken heart! In addition to the meal I tried their blueberry mojito. It was good a little strong for my liking but good. And also their chocolate dessert. I am going to come back to this place. **Beautiful atmosphere, can be a little pricey so have a generous wallet**
My husband and great friends ate here last night and had a really nice meal. It's pretty fun how they keep coming around with all the different meats, and the salad bar is extensive, spotless and delicious. The jazz band in the bar was a bit loud, but that was ok. The reason I am giving 2 stars is that they committed a major faux pas- we were asked to leave our table at the end of the meal so that another party could be seated. We had only just finished our meal (did not go for dessert) and one of the servers came by and said "terribly sorry, but we need your table". I was pretty shocked. I have never been asked to leave a table- and this isn't (from what I understand) a 2-seatings per night kind of place- I saw tables coming and going the whole time. If they really needed our table, they could have asked us to relocate to the bar and buy us a round of drinks. That would be appropriate for a fine dining restaurant. We didn't let this ruin our evening as we did have good food and a good time with our friends  and very good service during the meal, but I won't be back because the experience of being asked to leave at the end of the meal really left a stinging impression.
AMAZING!  eat your little heart out..... for all you meat lovers this place will do you no wrong.. the side bar is awesome as well.. they keep bringing you meat after meat.. sausage,lamb,turkey wrapped bacon, sirlon meats for days.. you will not walk out of here but you will have to roll out of here you will be so full.. really get your money's worth.. i will be back i promise!
This restaurant is based upon the Argentinian Churrascaria with their signature offering being an all you can eat beef, lamb, pork, chicken and turkey items which are brought out on skewers and cut at the table. For those into quantity and variety it would be satisfying. However, I was disappointed in many of the offerings. Some of the chicken was dry while others moist. The lamb (leg and chops), though tasty, was cooked too much for my liking as I like lamb medium rare. The pork loin was very good while other pork was a bit dry and not tender. The best was the top sirloin- signature dish for churrascarrias- cooked and seasoned very nicely as well as the tri-tip. If I had not ordered the Rodizio ( all you can eat deal) and just ordered the top sirloin, I probably would have given another star. They had lots of side dishes on a buffet, but our table sampled only a few items as we saved ourselves for the meats and fowls. They looked nice though. Service was very good and pleasant. a bit expensive when considering my comments above however.
Fantastic food, different variety from Espetus Churrascuria. Situated in a difficult area to park, a reservation is a good plan especialy on weekends or holiday. Service is attentive and some even remembered my preferences, two thumbs up for a quality establishment.
Been here a few times and it's always been a great experience.  Great selection in food: not TOO many meats but the quality of each is top tier.  The meats were all juicy and flavorful without being overwhelming.  The salad bar has a great selection of cured meats, cheeses, soups..etc.  They also serve a separate menu for single serve entrees which is good for those light eaters.  Servers and waiters are always professional and enthusiastic.
I've dined here about three times and I don't even want to bother trying any other brazillian steakhouse! My experiences here are always pleasant. The staff is super sweet and very attentive to your needs. If you opt for the Rodizio ($49) you're in for a treat. Starting off with the complimentary bread served as soon as you are seated, it's so addicting, but don't fill yourself up with it! The side bar is so so GOOD! Everything from the salad, the dressing, cheese, salami, it all looks so appetizing but the BEST part is the MEAT. Carnivores, I hope you came hungry. Don't eaet too much of the side bar food because the meat is where the money is at! The filet mignon and pork loin is to die for! Even the grilled pineapple is juicy and delicious! You'll have to request the chicken hearts because not a lot of people are a fan of it. I usually eat about a dozen. It's THAT GOOD! Even for those who have never had a chicken heart, this place should be your first because you'll love it!
I love this place! I came here Monday for my birthday dinner with 5 of my friends. We all decided to... Read more 
I had lunch here on Monday with a group of friends from work. We got there shortly after it opened at 11:30am and were the only ones in the restaurant for probably an hour. Four of us got the sidebar and shared two orders of the Family Feast (huge plate of different kinds of meat), while the other four people ordered entrees off the menu. The sidebar was actually really, really good. I could have just eaten that. My favorite parts were ... 1) coconut couscous salad with pineapple; 2) sesame chicken pasta; 3) mashed squash with coconut. There was also of course plenty of normal or caesar salad, roasted vegetables, cheeses, and other yummy goodness. I might have liked to see more fruit up there, but I wouldn't have had room on my plate anyway. The portions at this place are huge, so if you order the rotisserie chicken, expect to actually get half a chicken. My friend was shocked/delighted/horrified/lol when it arrived at the table. Several of us left with boxes. It's not cheap, but the prices aren't surprising, and especially for lunch, it seemed reasonable considering how stuffed we all were by the time we left. It's hard to compare my experience here to the Brazilian steakhouse in San Mateo since I was there for dinner rather than lunch. One friend who'd been here before for dinner said they do the same type of thing where you have a red/green card that you show to servers to let them know if you want more meat or not. They don't do that at lunch. The closest thing, if you want to try a bunch of kinds of meat, is to get the family feast. I was really glad we decided to share it though instead of each getting our own order (although that meant we paid $17 each for 2 sidebars, and even though it sounds like a lot for a salad bar buffet, it didn't seem unreasonable at all since there was so much to choose from and it was all delicious!). The outside sign was being repaired today, but it wasn't a problem and hopefully it will be done and looking even better soon. The decorations inside were classy and simple. My friends commented that the bathroom was nice, and the paper towels to dry our hands were soft and pillowy. :) I'd be happy if someone wanted to take me out to eat here again! But I'd probably avoid coming here too often on my own since it's kind of pricey.
Took my boyfriend here for a post valentines day dinner. Side bar is wonderful & meat is good. My favorites are definitely the Parmesan filet mignon/lamb/chicken hearts/grilled pineapple. I make sure to use most of my stomach space on those. Service and ambiance was great as always, although the night we went, they were a bit slow upon my request for chicken hearts. But other than that, everything was great. 4 stars well deserved (:
I've been here once with my fiance, we have mixed feeling about this restaurant. They have very great customer service, everyone serves their customers with positive attitude - their customer service deserves full 4-Stars. We got their all you can eat steak dinner and ordered two glasses of red wine; they had about 12 types of meats from skirt steaks, prime rib, rib eyes, chicken, pork, chicken heart, lamb chops, leg of lamb, etc. They also have a very nice fresh salad bar with variety choices; I loved their salads and I ate tons of veggies too. The meats were all freshly made but they were way too raw! We usually eat our steaks at medium, medium rare is acceptable too; however, they cooked all of their meats rare! We really wanted to love this place since we are both meat lovers; due to the uncooked meats they offer, I don't think we would want to go back.
Yes, come hungry! We visited Pampas with a group of 30 friends for my birthday and my oh my! The selections! Meat is very juicy and flavorful! The staff was very accomdating as we had a large group! BYOWine is always a plus! This place is a bit pricey but you can't complain at all! Its ALL YOU CAN EAT BRAZILIAN steak!
Went for the rodizio, which is of course what everyone comes here for. The meats were all delicious, but my favorites were the lamb and the sirloin steak. Almost everything was extremely tender and flavorful, with juices oozing out. The only exception was the chicken breast, which I found quite dry. One of the best parts is actually the grilled pineapple, which you should NOT under any circumstance pass up, even if you normally aren't a fan of pineapple. It's just so sweet and juicy and serves as a perfect palette cleanser in between different meats. Not the best brazilian rodizio place I've tried, but definitely good. Price isn't bad for this type of meal, only $46 per person for dinner. The service was a bit slower, but extremely friendly. I'd recommend this place for anyone who likes meat. But be prepared to come out bloated to a near death state...it's that good.
If you are a true meat eater, this is the place for. One of the best Argentinian eating experiences ever. The meat is cooked to perfection no matter what you order. I highly recommend this place.
OMG! Steak buffet! MY HEAVEN!!!! Decoration is very classy. The architect did a very good job. Highly recommend for first date just coz of the deco. Yummy steak. Honestly, I have tried many steak place, to me I only liked LB steak on Santana Row but this one totally beat LB steak in every level!! Five stars for the steak. For steak buffet it would comes up with around $60/person (at night) including tips. I find it reasonable because at LB steak, one piece alone is already $30ish. Double it and you can try 10 different types of steak. The buffet would come with salad bar too. It was fresh but I just love the meat too much to eat salad lol.
My husband and I went to Pampas on a Friday night to celebrate a special occasion. I would recommend making a reservation. We were greeted in a friendly manner and were seated in a few minutes. The waitress walked through the menu with us, explaining about the Rodizio and the ala carte menu; she recommended that we go for the Rodizio especially as this was our first time coming to Pampas. The Rodizio gave us unlimited access to meat and the salad bar. The salad bar has a huge selection of all kinds of salads, both hot and cold. Their complimentary fried bananas and biscuits were simply delicious. In fact, I liked the fried bananas so much that I requested multiple servings and they were happy to serve. There is a round coaster-like thingy on the table, which is red on one side and green on the other side. The servers walk around the aisle with all kinds of meat and if you need more food, just flip the side of the coaster to Green. If they see the Red side of the coaster, they will not bother you. We don't remember what we ate, but we liked most of the meat. I wish the desserts were included along with the Rodizio. It was quite noisy that day, probably because there was a birthday party going on at the bar, and we were seated very close to the bar. That was the only thing that annoyed me. Otherwise, a very nice experience. The ambiance is trendy. Great service. Pricey, but worth it for a special occasion!
This review is overdue. We first came here after getting raving reviews from family members. My boyfriend and I decided to splurge as a way to celebrate our 3.5 years anniversary. It was just an excuse, but we enjoyed the whole experience immensely. The vibe and overall look of the restaurant was a big plus. It was a nice casual dinner but had it's fanciness factor also. We both got the rodizio and it was delicious! I'm sure I didn't eat $44 worth of food, but I didn't leave upset. Even upon exiting, my boyfriend and I were still talking and raving about it. The meats are well-seasoned and well-cooked. Don't come here not trying the grilled pineapples. They are excellent!! And don't forget the side bar also as there are some worthy items. Can't wait to come back for our post-valentine's day dinner.
We came here for a special occasion so we got here just in time to partake the Happy Hour fun. The evening started with Classic Caipirinha & ended with Cosmo do Diabo. Cosmo do Diabo's Mazama Infused Pepper vodka had an intense flavor, I recommend small sips of this potent specialty cocktail :-) Everyone in the party, went for the Rodizio Style, to experience the extravagance of the authentic Brazilian churrasco. We started at the side bar, which was more than plentiful and with a ton of options. The meat started overflowing once we flipped the coaster to the green color. Picanha: top sirloin seasoned with rock salt and olive oil Cordeiro: leg of lamb marinated with garlic and mint Costela de Cordeiro: lamb loin chop marinated with garlic and ginger Frango: chicken thighs marinated with smoked paprika and lemon Frango Picante: chicken legs marinated with garlic, chili peppers, and vinegar Fraldinha: skirt steak with onion-herb marinade The quality of meat was good and everything was fresh and pipping hot. If you are looking for an evening to simply sit back, indulge and indulge some more, then Pampas is worth a shot. The desserts were good as well, I ordered the Coconut Flan, with almond lace crisp. I also sampled the Tres Leches Cake & Chocolate Torte, everything was simply fantastic. The service was beyond my expectations as well considering it was a large party. I loved the decor, the warm hardwood accents and dim lights add to the experience.
My brazillian wife likes the food here but says that it is not traditional seasoning on the meat. Me, I love it and starve myself for a whole day before i go. salad bar is also good
I was super excited to try out Pampas with a friend.  We had a few things to celebrate, and I was really excited for a nice meal at a nice restaurant.  For the amount of money we were setting out to pay, I was expecting a flawless dinning experience.  I used to work at a five-star restaurant, so I'm aware of the effort it takes to create a great dinner out on the town.  I pride myself on being low-maintenance and not creating a fuss over small things; it takes a lot before I complain about anything. We sat down at the first table and I immediately got cold.  The room felt drafty.  I was in jeans and a sweater; I shouldn't be freezing inside at a restaurant, right?  I asked the hostess to reseat us, and she did, but the next table upstairs was just as drafty and chilly.  We should have left at this point, but we stayed on; my dinning companion wanted steak. I ordered the duck with the apricot glaze, which came out not only in a tiny portion, but lukewarm to boot.  The glaze was overly sweet with very little hint of apricot.  Our server asked if everything was okay, and I told her after I'd made it half-way through the duck that it was too cold.  She offered to take it back, but what's the point half-way through a meal? My friend got the unlimited meat and sides option; the steak and lamb were amazing.  Very tender and full of flavor. Looking around the upstairs dinning room, I noticed another girl shivering.  She had her shawl pulled tightly around her shoulders and was leaning forward, trying to keep warm.  At this point, I went downstairs to try to warm up, and asked the host to please turn off the air conditioning.  He obliged, but wasn't apologetic.  I could have gotten a reliable meal at any other restaurant on or off University Avenue, but we had chosen Pampas because we wanted a special meal.  For me, the experience was anything but exceptional.  Because the rodizio steak was amazing, this review gets two stars. For whatever the entire bill wound up being, it was really not worth our money in terms of service or the quality of the duck.  I left really disappointed and cold, and curled up on a couch at Philz with some warm tea to warm back up.  I have great circulation, but I've never been this cold in a restaurant. If you're going to bring someone here who's dressed up and doesn't want to wear a parka and boots to dinner, I highly suggest calling ahead of time and asking them to turn down the air.  And ordering the rodizio offerings, not the entrees. --- Chilly in Palo Alto
Went there last night.  I enjoyed my food and the atmosphere - concentrated on the meat.  The salad bar looked gorgeous but I mostly stayed away from it to save space for....you guessed it... the meat. Top of my list:  Tri-tip, filet (plain and w/ parmesan), chicken hearts, turkey wrapped in bacon. I don't recommend it for a first date though, I've NEVER eaten great on a first date.
Food is amazing!
Just as a disclaimer, I only had an appetizer and a beer here, so this is not a full review, but I will do my best to review my limited experience. I actually came here on a Yelp date (woohoo) with a fellow Yelper. Right on Alma in downtown Palo Alto, it is a very chic place, nice spacious bar in the front with comfy chairs by the window as well, and it looks like ample seating in the restaurant area. I was greeted by a friendly hostess who told me to feel free to look around the restaurant. When I sat at the bar, I was greeted by a friendly bartender who helped me right away. I ordered beer, and then we ordered the lamb meatball appetizer. This was absolutely delicious. Two flat screen tv's were also at the bar, and people in the back part of the restaurant cheered occasionally, watching some sports game (I have no idea what), so I could see this being a nice place to go and watch the game (although not the rowdy type of watching). Anyhoo, the bartender was very attentive to our needs, always asking if we wanted a refill when he saw empty glasses, good atmosphere, clean, and decently priced. We got three beers and the appetizers and the bill came to like $30. I would definitely be willing to come back here and actually sit down at a table and try a meal.
I haven't had the dinner menu at Pampas, but the happy hour menu here is DELISH and so affordable (50% off!). Not to mention, the place is really nice inside (with ample seating and couches) and there's live music! We ordered the shrimp ceviche, the ribs, the cheese stuffed pepper, and the sliders. Every single dish we had was outstanding! Flavorful, fresh, light...delectable! My favorite has to be the sliders. The bread is made with rice flour so it's actually quite flavorful along with the meat and cheese. I'm drooling just writing about it now... We also ordered cocktails and had the passion fruit and mango caipirinhas, which were both fruity and tasty. I can't wait to come back here and try the rest of the happy hour menu!
I wanted to treat myself after a particularly tough week at work. Thanks to Pampas, it ended up being a pretty good night after all! At the advice of the hostess, I sat in the bar. It was a nice, wood-countered bar, with cushiony stools lined up along it. The restaurant itself is very nice, dimly-lit and romantic. The bartender was very friendly; I went ahead and ordered the all you can eat meats, and he brought me out an entire plate of them. My favorites of the all you can eat meats were the: - Sirloin, which was seasoned to perfection with sea salt and olive oil. - Skirt steak, which had a flavorful oniony taste to it. - The tenderloin fillet with parmesan cheese. Steak and cheese, need I say more? - The tenderloin fillet, seasoned very well with garlic and herbs. Just wonderful. The meats I didn't care for were the: - Bacon-wrapped turkey, which hugely disappointed me since I usually like bacon-wrapped--well--anything! - Pork sausage. Just had a smokiness to it that didn't complement the meat very well. By the end of it, I came out stuffed, even despite the fact that I took a decent amount of it home with me to go! Overall, the meats are good, but not great, but I suppose that's the price of taking quantity over quality. Nothing much to complain about here!
First time I came here, it was for a special yelp scotch tasting event, so I never had the chance to try the food. With that said... Pampas, so good it's unreal. Rodizio is what y'all need to come here for. I think this is the most i've ever eaten in one sitting. Between the 2 of us, we tried: Filet Mignon Chicken Hearts Chicken Drumettes Top Sirloin Bacon wrapped turkey Chorizo Sausage Pork Sausage Lamb loin Chop (best thing in the rodizio) Leg of lamb Tri-tip Roasted pineapple (2nd best after all of that meat to sweeten up your mouth) Skirt steak Full salad bar, huge variety too. Service was awesome. Top it off with some wine and Jameson & ginger ale, and you got yourselves a fantastic night. I'll definitely come here again, and I recommend it to anyone who likes trying all types of meat, especially Brazilian style. You'll definitely like it if you come hungry. Worth the steep cost because, you're worth it.
Great if you're eating paleo or Atkins -- bring on the beef! And you can even garnish it with a token leaf of lettuce or a slice of grilled zucchini from the side bar. Watch out if you are wearing heels -- floor hellishly slippery on the night we went. I almost lost it, the woman next to us barely escaped a spectacular wipeout in her 5" platforms -- and that was before we had cocktails. On the Friday night we were here, the bar was wildly inconsistent. I had a too-sweet caipirinha; fabulous hubby ordered one too 'cause he liked it, and his was pucker-up-sour. Wine list was good. Meat quality: very good to excellent (we tried everything except the chicken hearts) Sides: very good but not memorable beyond their breadth and diversity Dessert: mediocre; we had acai/blueberry crumble, soggy, gloppy, bland Service: excellent
We came here on a rainy Friday evening. The Happy Hour with 3 piece jazz band was too tempting to resist. We waited about 10-15 min. for a spot at the bar and it was well worth it. We knew we wanted to take full advantage of 1/2 off prices from 5-7pm - Oh and we did just that! I love the dark woods, brick walls and dark leather accents. The layout is brilliant. Spacious yet cozy and inviting. ------------ Happy Hour run down: Feta and olives - the feta cubes are stacked so thoughtfully and a very generous portion of mixed olives. Great presentation. Fried yucca with house made chipotle ketchup. This was my 1st yucca experience and I loved them. Crunchy on the outside and creamy on the inside. Drum roll....the **Piece de resistance** -  RUM GUAVA GLAZED PORK RIBS.  SOOO meaty and juicy. I may or may not have blacked out while eating these babies - they're THAT good! I seriously will compare all future ribs to these. They have complimentary bites for Happy Hour too! Two Fried Polentas, Two Fried Bananas and Two Puff cheese ball thingys. All of them were delicious! Did I mention they were COMPLIMENTARY?! ------------ For the red wine lovers out there I highly recommend the Malbec. For just $5 a glass (HH) you can't beat that.  It stands out even from some of their "top" reds. The food and 4 glasses of wine (between 2 people of course - I'm not *THAT* much of a lush) our total bill was $35. Now THAT is amazing and reason enough to come back. Our bartender Pablo was awesome btw! Cheers!
I just had dinner here and it was fantastic. Like many others I went with the rodizio. The meats were plentiful, the service was fairly attentive and it was pretty tasty too.  It seemed like tonight there were almost 2 different preparations of every type of meat: herb filet mignon and a parmesan covered filet.  2 lamb preparations and 2 chicken preparations.  There's also the pineapple which is pretty delightful as well. For the provided appetizer they gave out fried polenta as well as fried banana, which was great.  The side bar was pretty good as well.  While it may not be worth the a la carte price, as an accompaniment to the meats, it worked quite well and had a pretty good variety of items. The service was very good.  the meat carvers were attentive as was my server.  While this may be a bit of a classy/trendy place I really never felt out of place here, which is definitely a plus. As a person who dines alone often, that's fairly important and notable to me.  With regards to the price, while it's not cheap, I definitely feel that you do get pretty good value for your money. I would definitely return here in the future 4.5/5
Last Saturday was the first time I ever experienced a Brazilian steakhouse restaurant.  I came for an early celebration of my companion's birthday.  She's been here before for a birthday dinner previously with another one of her friends, that's why she knew about this place and told me, and therefore we agreed on coming here.  This was also the first restaurant I ever made reservation thru the Yelp system. It was definitely meat galore.  I definitely needed my cholesterol pill that day with all those meat choices, 14 of them.  It was $44 per person for the meat buffet plus trips to the side bar (with salads, cheeses, etc.).  For the light eater, it's $27 for the side bar only, which for me seemed unworthy of that price.  As for the meat itself, there were 14 choices listed on the menu.  They were all delicious (or at least the ones I had, since I passed on the lamb choices).  My companion, she's very petite and generally a light eater, yet she ate a lot of meat too, almost as much as me. Despite my companion's reservation about my drinking, I ordered the Pampas Ale which is a house brew.  It was a very good beer.  I made her order something because we needed a toast, so she got a non-alcoholic drink. There's a live band here, which could be considered a minus if you want a quiet dinner.  When we arrived at the restaurant announcing our reservation, we were taken to a table on the main floor (there were three dining levels total) very close to the band.  My companion asked me to request for a table further away since we saw one available, and the hostess obliged. We're definitely fans of coming here again for the occasional celebrations that call for fine dining and such.
This is our third visit to this restaurant.  We had a great meal here for our first wedding anniversary on Monday.  We chose the 'all you can eat' rather than ordering a plate from the menu.  I believe this is what most people pick when they go here.  The salad bar was plentiful with many choices of raw and cooked veggies with interesting flavors.  My favorite was the coconut sweet potato mash, yum! The meat was delicious, as I had expected.  The staff were wonderful, very friendly and generous with the meat. One star off for not acknowledging our anniversary even though they made a note when we booked with Open Table.
I had  a wonderful Fathers day brunch here...As expected it's a carnivores paradise...I tried all the meats they can offer and they are all exceptionally good. The salad bar didn't came up short, it came with all the trimmings and then some like  Papaya yogurt and granola , both house made  and they are delectable. They served succulent prawns that day,  and they are gigantic,  which I did not expect.The only missing is the chicken heart, gizzards and liver to make it a true churascharia.
Hmm... Maybe it was an off night, or the fact that there was a bridal party of about 50 people that came in around the same time as us, but with how much we paid, I was not impressed with Pampas. The fact that we were ignored for a good 10 minutes after being seated should have tipped me off that we were not in for the best service ever.  It also took quite a while to get our drinks that we ordered.  Again, it may have been because of the large party, but I really felt as though service should have been better. For those of  you who have never been to a place like Pampas, the dining experience consists of the waitstaff bringing various meats around for you to sample, as well as a side bar downstairs.  My favorite part of the meal was actually the side bar, as well as the fried bananas they brought before the meal.  Now if they had a waiter bringing around those little guys, I'd be sold!  The side bar had salad fixings, vegetables, and cheeses, many of which really complimented the meats.  As for the meats themselves, I found many of them to be pretty dry.  My favorites were the spicy chicken and the lamb, but I didn't particular care for many of the beef options.  Definitely try the grilled pineapple though, as it is pretty darn tasty.  Though I found myself trying a bit of everything, I have to say I was a bit disappointed.
Want to witness 2 rather slender Asian chicks eat 20lbs worth of meat? Reservations at: 5:45pm. We got seated: 5:20pm. I cannot fathom the experience I had yesterday.  To top off the evening, my best friend, Vi gave me a bag of green tea Kit Kat prior AND I bought $10 worth of pastries from Paris Baguette AND chocolate goodness from Paperwhirl. Only thing though is that there are no signs or fixtures on the window.  We hella passed this place since the name of the restaurant is above their canopy thing.  Anyhow. Let the feast begins. Our server was friendly and soft-spoken and I don't know how he brought us 2 diet sodas when I was the only one that ordered it but it was all good since Vi caved and enjoyed it.  Our server explained the process and yaddi-yaddi-ya.. we were fixated on getting our first fill from the side bar.  My favorite was the sesame pasta.  I could have eaten 5lbs of that.  I was very impressed.. at first, prior to coming here, I was thinking to myself, "I'm going to eat straight up 20lbs of meat, why would I load up on anything else?"  WRONG.  The side bar (for $27 if you do not want the meat) blew me away. When we returned from the side bar, a small and cute little plate of carb-ilcious was featured at the center of the table.  Did I grab some?  Oh yes!  I did not like the fried plantain though (maybe because it's a fruit and I do not eat fruits). Let's see.. for an entire 60 minutes, Vi and I said, "Yes, please" to all of the servings of meat that they offered and boy are they quick.  Vi grabbed the card and did not even place it on the table yet and we were already greeted immediately w/ or first cut of meat: top sirloin and from a cute guy!  That guy was our favorite.. I think my favorite was EVERYTHING however, the filet mignon, pork, spicy chicken, and the turkey wrapped w/ bacon were my favorite.. I guess you can say that my favorite, minus the banana was everything. The meat was tender, juicy, and cooked medium even though my choice would have been extremely rare but I understand I am not their ONLY customer although I wish I had that place to myself though.  We had 2 servings of each... I did say no to the chicken heart and the pineapple and I actually stopped my meat filling before Vi (which surprised me) but I was pretty much done.  "No more meat" but I was ready for dessert.  I only eat chocolates but I was disappointed to see bacon in their chocolate dessert: chocolate torte but the server assured me that it is one of a kind, truly delicious so of course I gave in!  At first Vi did not want anymore food but she caved and ate some of it w/ me.  I kind of wanted to order another for myself at that point, haha.  The chocolate torte was OFF THE HOOK!  I think if I could, I would have ordered 10 and die w/ it.  Well, order 10 to eat it and then another 10 to die in it.  Make that 20. At the end of the meal (BTW, I tipped like 25-30% because everything was quite awesome) and last.. on our way out, the cute preppy guy that commented on my "no fruits" statement ended our evening whilst opening the door for us w/ a "Em dep lam" so... do you know what that means?  That means I LOVE this place.  If only they offered car service (drive from restaurant back to the car) because after all of that, I felt like a hippo.  A pretty hippo because of the attention we got... And you know what?  After I got home, I ate my vermicelli croquette and white chocolate brioche from Paris Baguette.  If you think this chick.. me.. cannot eat then you are dead wrong.
I'd never had Brazilian before (although the thought of being served food from a sword sounded so cool), but my boyfriend brought me here for a romantic date and I fell in love with it! First, hats off to the bartender, who was witty with conversation and made a MEAN mojito.  All of the staff throughout the meal was very courteous and, after a quick explanation of the green-card-red-card system, it was a night of cheese bread, filet mignon, great wine and awesome atmosphere.  I was diggin' the bossa nova, the food, and when dessert came, I barely had room but couldn't resist! If you start feeling way too full (as is common when you eat that much red meat), definitely take some time to enjoy the pineapple.  Like orange slices when eating Korean barbque, there's some sort of weird science behind it, and a little bit of pineapple can help with that "OMG I'M GONNA DIE" feeling.  Then, you have room for the CHOCOLATE TORTE!!  I've never had a dessert that had so many flavors layered in (order it and you'll know what I mean).  All in all, I can't wait for the next time I visit Pampas again!
Definitely make a reservation for this place. And it's definitely for special occasions, because it is PRICEY but soooo GOOD. I think it's almost $50 for the rodizio (buffet style). They have a side buffet bar, more like salads, cheese/crackers, etc... Nothing fabulous there. You come here for the rodizio. The rodizio is where the servers come around with giant swords/skewers of meat and they come to your table and plop whatever piece or section you want onto your plate. I've never had so much meat but it all tasted sooo good. Most of it is beef of some sort, but there are some porkchops, chicken, gizzards, etc... All of it just so deliciously good! It's also an experience everyone has to try at least once. I like the fact that it's a buffet that you don't need to get up for (except for the "salad" bar), but then again it would be nice to have to get up and walk to get food so you can "walk it off", haha. Mhmmm MEAT.
I would have never found this place if a friend had not brought me here for drinks. It is not on the normal high-traffic part of university avenue, so you might never find it serendipitously. We sat at the bar and had a great time flirting with our bartender Dillon. He made us excellent drinks-- I had a mango Caipirinha which was fruity, sweet, and very alcoholic. The atmosphere of Pampas is high-end, with lots of hard wood and fine art on the walls. They even brought in a live jazz band later in the evening. Nevertheless, it doesn't feel pretentious, which I think is due to the fact that all of the staff are warm and inviting. I will definitely be back for happy hour where their delicious cocktails are only $5.
Amazing! For those that don't know, this is a Brazilian style steakhouse, which means you can pay one price (about $45) for all you can eat meat and side bar (salads, veggies, potatoes, etc.). The waiters bring around giant skewers of various meats and cut off pieces for you. There are several different kinds of steak, lamb, chicken, turkey, and even roasted pineapple (which was amazing!!!). I've been to Brazilian steakhouses where everything is overcooked, and this is not one of those. Everything was cooked perfectly. All five of us in the party thoroughly enjoyed the experience!
I really should update my review for Pampas' HAPPY HOUR, since I rave about it so much to my friends. Completely deserving of a 5 star rating, Pampas' HH is the bar against which all other DTPA (and beyond) HHs are compared to. The HH menu boasts a wide variety of cocktails ($5 and packs a powerful punch!), beers ($3), wine (I think $5?), and food (50% off, mostly in the $3-7 range). Everyone I've introduced to Pampas' HH LOVES it and can't get enough. Definite WIN.
This review is for the HAPPY HOUR only. What a fab deal. Pampas has HH M-F 5-7pm. Their specialty... Read more 
A place that requires all day preparation... as in, you better come hungry (in stretchy pants)! Came here with a group of friends for the rodizio (unlimited Brazilian meats) and side bar.  They start you off with a small plate of cheese bread, plantain and one other thing that we never really figured out.  I love cheese bread so I was disappointed that it wasn't just part of the side bar.  Our server did get us another plate when we asked for it though.  The side bar offers a great variety to offset all the meats.  There are different types of salads, veggies, fruits, cheese, etc.  It's more than enough to fill anyone up but of course, we came here for the meat.  They bring a variety of Brazilian meats to your table until you tell them to stop.  Everything they brought was fresh off the grill, juicy and so flavorful!  Our server would check with us to see if there were any specific meats we liked so that they could bring us more of it.  He definitely earned his already included gratuity.  We miraculously had room to try one dessert: tres leches cake.  And that too was delicious. Other noteworthy stuff: trendy decor and full bar =) Their corkage fee is pretty steep so if you're going to bring your own wine, make sure it's not the cheap stuff otherwise you'll be paying more for them to pop that open than what it's worth. Be sure to make reservations!
Came by for dinner a second time other night at the peak dinner hour and this place was packed! Glad I made reservations a week ahead! Meal started off with complimentary appetizers which consisted of a cheesy bread, fried banana and something else. We opted for the Rodizio @ $44 a head which included unlimited salad bar. Best things from the salad bar include the smoked salmon, carpaciio, grilled eggplant, asparagus, and fresh mozzarella. From the Rodizio, the best meats were the filet mignon and the bacon wrapped turkey, which were both extremely flavorful and juicy when hot. Some of the inferior goods that should be passed on include the sausages, chicken thighs, and pork loin. I did notice that they tend to circulate the "cheap" meats twice as often as the "premium" meats like the leg of lamb, lamb loin etc. Service was very friendly by our waiter The odd thing about this restaurant is that all of their food taste really good straight out of the kitchen. After my food was sitting out on my plate for a few minutes, the food immediately becomes very hard and dry... Tip:Their hardwood floor is very slippery for the ladies in their high-heels, esp on a rainy day...
Came by for a team dinner and was amazed at the quality and service of this upscale restaurant! The... Read more 
Carnivores rejoice! Talk about a special night. An unlimited supply of Brazilian-prepared meat served on skewers and an endless bar of side dishes? Get out of here. What a great place to come with a large group of people and be social. The service was fantastic, as we were constantly treated to skewer upon skewer of delicious meat all night. The only disappointment in the bunch was the chicken skewers, but you can't go wrong with any of the beef. I couldn't get enough of the pork sausage, turkey breast wrapped in bacon, and pineapple, too. The sides are good but are pretty overshadowed by the awesome selection of meat. I have to add that I loved the fantastically unique decor and layout, including the mini upper floor and the mini basement. Absolutely great food, although for the price, you may just want to come here on business.
My boyfriend and I went to Pampas the night before Valentine's Day to do a little pre-celebration (so we wouldn't have to fight the crowds for reservations and stuff the next day). This place is super nice! Definitely for the higher end crowd (business crowd... also slightly dressy), it has a full bar (out in the front of the restaurant) and two floors of seating (the bottom floor looks like a basement floor). It's a pretty intimate setting, and the tables are just the distance from each other to not feel cramped. We both got the rodizio (of course) and my boyfriend put his water glass on the sign for food (yay or nay for service) before the waiter had a chance to explain how it worked (whoops XD). I'd been to one of these kinds of places before (Espetus Churrascaria in downtown San Mateo), but this place was clearly better for certain things. The appetizers were the same as Espetus (fried polenta, fried banana, and some puff pastry), but they didn't bring any more when we had finished them. The beef cuts were cooked absolutely perfectly. The top sirloin, the filet mignon... oh so tasty. The chicken was a tad bit dry, the lamb (I usually like lamb) was a bit on the strong side (still good), and a couple of the pork cuts were not as great. But all in all a solid meat selection. The salad bar here definitely outshines Espetus Churrascaria (the one in San Mateo anyway). The options were significantly better, and all the sides were very tasty. They even had broccolini! I liked the fact that they had more vegetables to balance the immense amount of meat they offered. They also had stuff like grilled pineapple, which was quite good. The only negative I would have to say was the fact that the my boyfriend tried to order one of their specialty beers... which never came. But we were having a great time, so we let it go. This place is definitely cheaper than the one up north too. I'd probably go back at some point, but because it is a more expensive meal, I'd probably save it for something special.
A few coworkers and I decided that we wanted to treat ourselves to a fancy dinner, and we arrived just at the tail end of their happy hour.  The waitress was nice enough to let us know that we can order [or as she slyly suggested, to double up] hh specials before heading over to our dinner table.  $5 caiprinhas/ sangrias/ other stuff? OKAY! Dinner was, to be perfectly honest, a little overwhelming for me.  I'm a pretty petite gal, and I just couldn't handle all the meat [insert that's what she said joke here].  All joking aside, though, I'm a slow eater, and the rate of how fast the meat was being shown up to our table and the rate I was eating just wasn't matching up.  Soon there was just way too much stuff to eat and not enough room to stomach it all.  I KNOW we can say no, but it was just so hard when I'm raring to try everything! Closer to the end of the meal, things started to kind of taste the same- but I did enjoy their GRILLED PINEAPPLES!!!, Chicken Hearts, Filet, Bacon Wrapped Turkey, and... you know, I can't really remember.  I enjoyed most of the cuts and had no major complaints.  The salad bar, while really neat, was nothing spectacular compared to the meatier companions. I was a little disappointed by the acoustics in the restaurant, though.  It was pretty crowded and it got hard to hear what my friends were talking about and when the servers were trying to explain what was on their fancy swords.  Otherwise, service was spot on.  Dessert was pretty good.  Had a few tastes of the Mango Mousse and their Blueberry tart.   Both were yummy, but let's face it.  I did not come here looking for dessert. All in all, come hungry, leave happy- but with a slightly emptier wallet for sure.
Before yesterday, I would give this place 5 stars without any hesitation. I've been there multiple times, and they never failed to impress. Rodizio Style meats are simply excellent, Hoegarden on tap makes a perfect companion to it, and desserts are exquisite. However, they do seem to have a slip once in a while. Last time, meats were overcooked and simply not good, even filet mignon. -1 star for that.
I Just was at the bar, great service, was disappointed about their calamari only one sauce but the waiter was great offer us other options. I'm comparing the calamari as the one at Beatlenut in San Francisco which is so far my favorite, the one at Pampas were good. Definitely recommend this place for drinks. 06.10.2012
First time trying a Brazilian steakhouse and I loved it! The atmosphere is really peaceful and calm. You don't feel like people are constantly staring at you *_____*   (like some places...). I also liked the industrial/modern design of the restaurant. What I didn't like was the main door. We've tried opening the main door but failed to notice the (Please use other door) note for a second. Haha I ordered the Rodizio and side bar. Rodizio: First time trying something like this but a very cool concept. I forgot what meat I ate but everything I had was good; nothing was bland or overly salty. The steak is cooked rare (too red for me) but what the hell, YOLO! The selection felt endless! The side bar itself was DELICIOUS! I think I'm a bit guilty for somewhat over stuffing myself at the side bar but I've tried my best to sample a little bit of everything. My favorite was the sauteed mushrooms, deep fried stuff mushroom, grilled onion (went well w/ the meat) and the salmon (mmmmMm). The starters they served was good.. especially that cheese bread! From that moment, I knew this place would be good and it proved itself worthy. We've also ordered the coconut flan. The egg didn't take over the flan and the consistency wasn't too fragile which was great. Men - Highly recommend if you like steak. Women - Highly recommend if you want your BF to take you somewhere expensive. Overall: Win-win situation.
I went with a date to a steakhouse that is a competitor of Pampas and despite having a reservation, we waited 20 minutes and still had not been seated. My date and I decided to leave and I found Pampas on here while we were driving. I was able to make an online reservation 10 minutes in advance of arriving! When we got to Pampas, we were greeted at the door and were told we could wait while a table was cleared or sit at the bar. We decided to sit at the bar to eat and I am rather glad because the bar tender was really awesome! He was attentive and amiable, but not overbearing like some waiters can be as far as checking up on us. The food arrived quickly and was AMAZING! I had the lamb shank and my date had the rib eye, both were cooked perfectly and were delicious and hearty portions. The bartender was able to recommend a great wine to go with the lamb as well. The prices are more than reasonable for the experience. WELL WORTH THE MONEY! I want more of that lamb! All in all, we were able to turn the night around due to Pampas! I cannot WAIT to come here again, the food, the service and the atmosphere were all amazing. Too bad they couldn't make my date less of a chauvinist jerk, also too bad that the bartender has a girlfriend. ;)
Went here during lunch time and  to be honest I was not really that excited because it was not a all you can eat buffet during lunch time. My co workers and I had ordered the family style menu and man was I wrong about going here during lunch. For 28 bucks you get unlimited side bar which had over 15 items to choose from fresh salads to cheeses. The family style menu also contained 4 different types of meat from new york to lamb chops. I would definitely come back again the waitress here was awesome very hot, but definitely married though.
I love brazilian bbq. I've only had it once in SoCal but after that one time, I've been dying to go back. My family and I came here on Xmas Eve which is a nice time to come as everyone has the holiday spirit. We all opted for the AYCE of course even though there were dishes on their regular menu that seemed very appetizing. Along with the AYCE you get to check out the salad bar which is OK in my opinion. A wide array of salads and dishes but nothing really that appetizing. The one thing I loved were the slices of prosciutto. I seriously wanted to take the whole plate back and make a sandwich or something. The meats came in a pretty timely manner and we never really had to wait super long or get a ton of repeats before a certain meats comes out. I particularly liked the lamb chops (a tad gamier than usual), filet migon, and the chicken hearts. The design of this place is REALLY nice. We were sat in the lower area that was pretty nice
BEST SKIRT STEAK EVER! Its simply perfection.  I luv the salad bar as well.  The olives and smoked trout they have are the perfect complement to the skirt steak and a nice big cab.
Pampas was okay. Unless you are a true connoisseur of fine-quality meat, you will be left wondering, "why did this meal cost me $44?" It is an authentic Rodizio experience, where waiters & waitresses bring huge chunks of different meats (filet mignon, sirloin, pork loins, lamb, chicken) - and succulent fire-grilled pineapples - to your tables. If you want them to come by your table, simply flip your card to 'green.' When you are satisfied with the amount on your dish and want to dig in the meal, flip it to red. Service is top-notch - friendly, polite, efficient, but not bothersome. The decor of the restaurant is very ambient and luxurious, very apt for the expensive price tag on the meal. Now, the food. The quality is excellent and the succulence is tangible. Very tender and savory. My problem is not with the quality or the taste of the individual meat cuts; rather, it is a holistic one. The entire experience was pleasant, but for $44 a person, the flavors were much too limited. The meat selections all have similar tastes, and lack the dynamics. The side bar is decent, at best, and lacks variety as well. The bill added up to a little over $150 for 3 people, including tip - no wine, no nothing. Add a bottle of a modestly-priced wine and you get an average of $60 - 70 a person. This is best for those who absolutely love meat and are adept at detecting the different flavors and textures of top-notch meat. For us regular eaters whose mouths are trained for family restaurants, it's a bit too much to swallow (excuse the pun).
I love rodizio, and Pampas delivers quality and consistency every time.  They serve everything from lamb to chicken hearts and, of course, have rodizio standards such as filet mignon and pork sausage.  The salad bar is good, too, although if you're paying such absurd amounts of money for excellent grilled meat, why would you fill up on greens, deli meat, and cheese?  While you're there, have a mojito - if you get the same bartender I did, it'll be the best you've ever had.
This is my second time dining at Pampas. Both times I was blown away with the quality of the food and wonderful space. Pampas offers several traditional dinners, but everyone goes for the Rodizio. This means you get all you can eat sides like salad, potatoes, squash, cheese and rice plus all the Brazilian meat you can eat. The unique feature of the all you can eat meat is that it is brought right to your table and carved directly off the skewer on to your plate. This time we completed our dining with the tres leche cake and we were not disappointed. It was sweet and smooth, exactly how you would want it. The price is not for the faint of heart, but I think you get your money's worth. I find it to be on the noisy side, so do not expect an intimate candlelit dinner in silence. We did have to wait for the final meat, but this was just a small bump in the road for a fantabulous dinner.
I hear so many good things about this place so I was super excited to check out this place. The service was great but the food was just alright. I don't think it was worth the price that I paid. The only meat that I really liked was their skirt steak. Everything else was just okay. The chicken heart was very interesting. It had good flavoring, then weird texture, then super salt rush at the end that you don't expect. I know it's not the same but I would rather spend the same amount of money at house of prime rib in sf.
I died and went to meat heaven! Meat on meat on meat and a little grilled pineapple in the mix :) Food - 4 stars The meat was cooked perfectly in the first few rounds they came by. Juicy, tender, perfection. Towards the end of the night the meat was a little overcooked and dry but I was already stuffed by then so it didn't bother me too much. The grilled pineapple is so bomb! I love pineapple! I want to live in a giant pineapple under the sea and change my name to Spongebob! The side dishes and salad bar I didn't really attack because I wanted to save room for the meat but everything seemed pretty fresh. The service bumped this place up to 5 stars for me. Right as we sat down and got situated the skewers were coming by non-stop. One after another and before I knew it, my plate had a whole dead animal on it. For a Friday night, it didn't seemed too packed. We made reservations but they were able to seat us early. The bar was full but the dining area still had seats open so waiting doesn't seem to be a problem.
My boyfriend and I love it here! Its a great place to get some really good meat! I also enjoy the side bar because they have lots of different cheeses and veggies to snack on. The drinks are also delicious! I recommend wearing stretchy pants so you can take everything in! Also, if you do not want a certain meat do not be shy. Let them know and also ask them to send over something that you do want! :)
This is a review for their great hh! Half off appetizers or "lounge food" and $5 specialty cocktails! First off I have to say I absolutely love the restaurant decore. It's got this really nice urban feel to it that makes you feel very comfortable. You can walk in dressed up or dressed down and it wouldn't matter. The bartenders and staff are also super friendly and chatty and make you feel welcome. Their specialty capriniha's are also very interesting and worth a try. I really liked the cantalope/passion fruit/pink peppercorn capriniha. There was something...Christmasy about it? I can't quite put my finger on it, but it was definitely tasty and worth trying. The cucumber/lemon was way sweeter than I had thought it would be so I didn't like it as much. The classic was definitely good and refreshing! You can really taste the cachaca, but the flavors are very well balanced so it's not overwhelming. The malbec they had on the hh menu was also surprisingly good! Kinda spicy, full-bodied, but easy to drink. The food was pretty good too. The lamb meatballs paired with the dukka and tamarind glaze had some really great flavors going on. It was like a flavor party in my mouth. My only complaint was that the meatballs were a tad bit dry. The seafood ceviche was good but nothing special so I'd pass on that next time. The guava-glazed pork ribs were pretty tasty albeit a little sweet for my liking. Three appetizers between the 2 of us was pretty filling, especially with the drinks.
"Exquisite. It's dinner and a show. Grilled pineapple was great, filet minot with parmesan was incredible. Could live off the skirt steak." Had our 15 year family celebration here, perfect place for fancy dinner celebration. We had 7 person group and I was able to make a reservation day the night before for a Thursday night (though not for the exact time I wanted) Most of us ordered the all you can eat bbq, and all of us found something to love and have seconds of. I tried a bit of every single cut except the chicken hearts and pork. I don't mean to sound like a broken record, but I absolutely adored the skirt steak, and the filet minot with parmesan was just perfection. They without question know their meats. The salad bar that came with the all you can eat bbq was creative, something for everyone. The bread they served was more of an appetizer than plain bread, very delicious. The scallop appetizer was perfectly cooked, great sauce. They mixed great martini's. Their deserts on the other hand fell quite flat. I recommend grabbing a couple extra pieces of pineapple instead. The tres leches cake was sub par and the Chocolate Torte was much too sweet. Basically, this is your best alternative to a fancy steak house. Great service, atmosphere, and bar. Without question going back.
Had I not been invited to a private event at Pampas last week, I never would've known about it! What a nice spot in downtown Palo Alto! I love the setup of the place - and I especially love the hardwood accents everywhere. Although I can't say much about the food, the wine and cocktail list are fairly extensive. We had asked the bartender what she thought would pair well with Scotch - she couldn't answer. Honestly, I don't know what goes with Scotch besides... well... Scotch? I'm not a big Scotch drinker, so went for a glass of red. Pampas has a private dining room downstairs - it can comfortably fit between 20-30 people, max. Good for business meetings or an intimate get-together between family or friends. And they have a projector in case you want to show a video or PPT presentation. If anyone wants to come back with me here to try the meat + buffet, just let me know! I'm always down for some Brazilian food!
Loved the salad bar and their skewered meat, but others in the party had to wait far too long for their food.  The staff and atmosphere were great!
-1* for steep price for the side bar.  Other menu items like sandwiches, salads, etc range from $8-15.  Service is prompt and courteous.  I've only come for lunch so the meat buffet is not available.  I opted for the side bar which was perfect for lunch.  At $17, it is quite steep.  I'd say I'd pay $15 tops for it especially since there is NO meat at this side bar although there are a few hot food items which was nice.  Quite healthy too and I had two plates.  The bar had around 25 items and were all well prepared. Some items: peanut noodles- i didn't like but my bf did tabbouleh variety of cheeses- and not just american type of cheeses rice and the black beans were yum 3 types of lettuce/salad mixes + toppings (toppings weren't that exciting. not much variety) 3 types of dressings roasted eggplant and tomato roast bell peppers asparagus broccolini israeli couscous w shredded coconut, etc- i really enjoyed this.  slightly sweet and creamy. coconut mashed sweet potatoes spiced carrots Once I scavenge some change (more like $40 lol), I'll come for dinner for the meat.  I will update..
THIS PLACE IS BOMBBBBBB!!!! definitely give this place 5 stars for the following reasons. -Great and attentive service. -Food:  Must try all the meats and please pace yourself carefully.  Don't overindulge on the salad bar because your belly must have room for the yummy and savory meat. BUT DO OVERINDULGE IN THE CHEESE BALL BREAD (YUMMMMMMMMMM).  So the meat, all the meats were wonderful but some were better than others. The top sirloin seasoned with salt and olive oil was just nice and savory.  The filet mignon (2 types: 1 is seasoned with garlic and herbs and the other with parmesan cheese) is definitely the best ones (so soft and just melts in your mouth).  The flank steak with onion-herb taste was also flavorful and savory.  The tri tip was on the oily greasy side, but also good (DONT COME HERE IF YOU ARE ON A DIET ... hehe).  The lamb loin chop has a distinct gamy taste (so this just depends on the person).   These were the most memorable ones, but they have other meats as well including pork sausage and marinated chicken.  And for the hardcore meat-goers and not for the faint of heart ---- CHICKEN HEARTS (my boyfriend liked it but I was hesitant to try it). The post dinner experience will depend on how much you consumed.  Their dessert LOOKED amazing too, but was too full to even try =/.  But we will be prepared for the next time (WHICH DEFINITELY WILL BE A NEXT TIME).
4.5 stars Make sure to wear your fancy stretchy pants for this one. Ordered the Rodizio and side bar for two - in short, this gives you unlimited quantities of the side bar and a wide range of selected meats. The side bar itself can keep you busy the whole night but control yourself dammit!...soon enough spit-roasted meats will be coming at you from every direction. Intrigued? Thought so. Top sirloin, leg of lamb and chop, pork loin, tenderloin with parmesan, tri-tip, chicken, linguica, turkey wrapped in bacon, skirt steak, chicken hearts....I'm sure there were more I had but I can't remember. I came in thinking I'd be able to hang but I was down for the count way sooner than I expected. I mean I tried everything at least once; my favorites were the skirt steak, lamb chop, and the filet with parm mmmmmm so good. The side bar has everything you need to compliment the meats and more; everything from grilled veggies to smoked salmon, need I say more? Well probably, but honestly I blacked out due to meat sweats. Not really, but you get my point. I ordered a bottle of red that our waiter recommended, don't know the same since I'm not a connoisseur or anything. But we finished the bottle and it complimented everything very well. Definitely a good experience, and I felt bad for turning away some meats towards the end but I had no choice...I bitched out SMH. Food coma never tasted so good.
Ohhhhhhh meat sweatsssssssss. Hahaha how to describe my Pampas experience... G and I came here with the fam for my dad's birthday.  I had friends warn me of the meat sweats, so I knew to come here starving (I didn't eat lunch and I ate breakfast really early) and we came in the early evening (so that we wouldn't have to go to bed with super full bellies).  But I don't think ANYTHING can prepare you for the meat-fest that is Pampas. We got here right when they opened and I was super impressed with the venue.  It looks so pretty but very chill as well.  Their is a large bar in the front and then a three-level restaurant.  We were seated right near the door, so we had perfect access to everything.  There is a huge side bar with salads, appetizers, cheeses, meats, etc.  I could get full just from that stuff.  We all decided to go with the Rodizio menu (which is the all you can eat sidebar PLUS meat). The meat: There were quite a few types of meat.  My personal favorites were the top sirloin and the filet mignon with parmesan cheese.  They also had different chickens, lamb, pork sirloin, and sausage.  I was pleasantly surprised with the grilled pineapple which was AMAZING.  I think I ended up getting 3 or 4 refills of the pineapple.  It acted as a great intermezzo between meats. A lot of people suggested this, and I totally second it: get only 1 or 2 meats at a time.  I know its tempting to say yes to everything as they walk by (especially for us, there were only a few people when we got there so it seemed like the meat guys were at our table every minute or two) but you really need to savor the meat.  And the meat was meant to be enjoyed right away.  If you let it sit on your plate for too long, it toughens up and the flavors become less amazing.  We ended up having to flip our Pampas button to red for a bit, so that we could catch up.  I highly recommend using that button A LOT.  So get like 2 pieces of meat, flip it, and then flip it back once you've finished. Another suggestion: grab a variety of items from the side bar that will go well with the meat.  Don't go crazy though!  Like I said, its way too easy to get full over there and not have room for all of the meat. Last suggestion: give all of the meats a try.  I know I was hesitant to try the chicken because it looked spicy, but it was really yummy.  And the lamb--my parents hate lamb.  They were hands down not planning on getting it, but after I forced them to, they really loved it. Take your time and enjoy your meat sweats :)
All kinds of meat, all day, everyday!  Famous for their Rodizio style ($44/person) where meat carvers come to your table to offer you whatever type of meat they have on hand (steak, chicken, pork, and lamb). The Mr ordered the Rodizio while I ordered the prawns and empanadas for myself.  This is a good idea for those who want a tasting of the meat but can't necessarily eat all of what's offered to you.  Everything was pretty tasty, but our personal favorites were the following: - turkey wrapped in bacon - pork loin in adobo seasoning - steak in parmesan - steak in garlic marinade With the Rodizio comes the side bar where you can choose from different kinds of cheeses, olives, salami, prosciutto, etc.  The prawns were delicious as well as the empanadas (chorizo and manchego) that we ordered. We'll be back if we're ever in the mood for never-ending protein!
Vegetarians need not apply!  This place is definitely a fav to add to the list. Four of us had dinner here last week and had a good meal with good service. It's a bit pricey but enjoy the experience and order the rodizio service. Well worth the $50 but just come hungry!  Some meats were good but no wow-factor, others were fantastic.  The nice thing is with the rodizio style, you can try a little of all and get more of your favs. Added bonus for a nice live band that evening!
Pampas provides excellent rodizio experience. There is a wide variety of choice cuts meats including Prime Rib, Trip Tip, Turkey, Lamb, Pork, Chicken, and Chorizo dishes. My favorite was the Tri-tip. Once the food is served you can also request them to bring your favorites back to the table. They have a large salad bar, which has a unique set of salads, veggies, and fruits to accompany your dinner. Overall a great experience.
My friends decided to book out the entire restaurant for their wedding reception - what a great idea!!!  It was an unlimited AYCE feast for all the guests who attended, including a side bar that blows all other Brazilian BBQ places out of the water!  But who comes to a meat feast extravaganza to fill up on sides?  Not I... Considering this was a massive party of about 150, the staff did an amazing job!  The cuts of meat continuously made their rounds to every table nonstop... I never felt like I had to wait very long for any cut of meat.  My favorite was definitely the skirt steak... so juicy and tender and cooked to perfection.  I was really surprised that all cuts of meat and chicken were cooked well considering they had a huge guest list to attend to.  I don't work in the restaurant industry but I know enough to know that that was not an easy feat. The space is modern and clean... this is definitely a very upscale Brazilian BBQ place.  The ventilation is also great because you don't smell meat or smoke or any of that here. Pampas... you are more than deserving of these 5 stars - Touche!
I have to say the food is pretty good but the hostess' are pretty tacky. The first impression when I got in was I am going to pay 40 bucks for this? The host said that since we don't have reservation we only get an hour to eat. Um.. the restaurant is empty and we were the first customer. When we left only about 4 tables were filled. I was pretty annoyed but the food was good. The filet mignon was really good and the sides were decent. The waiters were nice but I couldn't give a flip dog about the rude hosts in the front. About 3 hosts helped us get a table in an empty restaurant. Real good impression.
Don't be fooled like we were on the higher reviews.  This place is a joke at a high price.  Our meat was not good enough for my dog.  The price is so outrageous.  If you want a good steak house please spend the extra few dollars and head to Espetus in San Mateo.  It is night and day on quality and taste.  So sorry we wasted our time and money on this place.  Don't make the same mistake.
If designers made couture elastic pants--this would the place to wear them. Pampas is an elegant all-you-can-eat Brazilian rodizio where you pay $44 for a dozen different meats to be brought to your table. Most of the meats are moist and delicious and the endless salad and artisan cheese bar is included. Save room for the tenderloin filets--they tend to arrive at the end of your meal. One filet is served with parmesan and the other is delicately seasoned with garlic and herbs. Skip the lamb. One of my favorite things about this lovely restaurant is that it is quiet and spacious. You can have a conversation here. The wine list is extensive and the service is excellent. It's almost criminal not to over-indulge. Therefore I insist that you get dessert even though you won't have room for it. My favorite it the: chocolate torte with caramel ice-cream and bacon Brazil nut toffee. It's not really enough to share, so encourage your date to get the tres leches cake. Pampas is not the place to take your vegetarian date (although for $27 you can indulge in the endless salad bar.) Actually I wouldn't take a date here at all. If you want to get frisky after dinner--don't take your lover to an all-you-can-eat meat buffet. No one wants to get naked when they are busting out of their pants and slipping into a food coma. On the other hand, this restaurant is perfect for groups and intimate gatherings of friends. Have sex another night.
We all had a great time! A+++ We went for my hunnies' 28th and it was new to all of us! We wanted to try something different... I'm pregnant again and normally I love to eat steak, but I barely ate cause I'm just not feeling red meat when I'm knocked up, lol. I did try to have alittle bite of it all and let me say, there was alot to try! All the different kind of steaks was def. good and juicy, spicy chicken was my favorite though! Had a nice kick to it... But the chicken hearts and all lambs was not my cup of tea, but the guys seem to like it. :-) The experience really knocks off the bad experiences of buffet since its all served to you like a non-stop buffet style in a sophisticated way. Price: I'd say its fairly reasonable for an all you can eat Brazilian steak and salad bar, $44 per person, com'on. Our waitress was adorable and very kind. Since it was all our first time, she explained how it works and them guys just kept on coming with the meats, YES and even when our button is on red and we all looked like we were gonna explode! Not only that, I made reservation for 7pm, but with the baby and all, we didn't actually make it there till 8pm, an hour late. They still kindly reserved our table till then and we didn't even have to wait to be seated when we all got there, kudos! Place is very warm and inviting, modern, lots of lighting so your not eating in the dark, and fun atmosphere for groups. They seem to make good use of all their space without feeling cramped, and can accommodate large parties well. Walkway to restrooms is pretty impressive too. There are wine racks all the way to the back that was a pretty cool display for their wine bottles, and may I say, restroom is clean and has awesome hand napkins! I took a couple back to the table cause it was that awesome, lol! On top of that, she brought out my hunnies' dessert with a lit candle and joined us to sing happy bday which she didn't have to do. We stayed over an hour past their closing time and didn't get rushed out of the restaurant either. Also, the guys were getting intoxicated and getting loud and alittle obnoxious, but they didn't come complain to us, lol. So I guess we can all agree that we all had a great time, and it was a wonderful bday for my babe! We'd def. will be back!
Love love love this place. Every time I've come to this place, I've enjoyed it immensely!  All you can eat meat and salad bar?  How can you not love this combo? I would recommend to not go too crazy at the salad bar, but just get items to compliment the meat.  I love Pampas compared to other Brazilian restaurants because they don't overly salt the meat.  It has enough flavoring added to let the meat stand alone and be the star.  The sangria here is http://bomb.com -- I always get a pitcher and it guarantees a GOOD time!  The servers here are also great, so tip them well :) The only thing I would probably pass on here is their desserts.  Ordered practically all of them during my various visits and they're just mehhh.  But let's be serious, you're here for the meat!
Pampas is a great restaurant for special events: anniversaries, birthdays, graduation dinners for getting edumacated... It's probably also only good for those things unless you're relatively high roller, since it's not cheap to eat here! But then again, if you frequent University Ave, you must be pretty high roller. Pampas has a simple elegant ambiance that gives credibility to your feeling of being high roller, whether you really are or not. Even the bathrooms have some super soft absorbent paper towels. Definitely not your typical restaurant restroom. The side bar is $27 if you're just going to eat from there, but it's actually a pretty decent selection (arugula, grilled onions and garlic rice, roasted mushrooms, and pineapple vinaigrette? yes please!!). You'd probably regret it once you see your friends gorging on all-you-can-eat meat rodizio and other entrees. Maybe they can fork some over for you on the black market. I almost did that, except at the last minute my will caved and I said, "I'd like the rodizio, please." (thinking to myself, "holy crap, there goes nearly 2 hours of hard work, pre-tax..not to mention, is my stomach going to survive this? am I going to live in the gym for the next week?") I made it a point to try every meat-on-a-stick that came by our table. Here's what I remember: Good: top sirloin, skirt steak, lemon chicken, slow roasted pineapple Ok: triptip, lamb, filet mignon Meh: bacon wrapped turkey and pork sausage, filet mignon with cheese If I could go back in time I'd barf up all the OK and MEH meats and restuff my stomach with the GOOD ones (most of the other people at my table with the rodizio agree with my assessment). I'd give a lower rating for the average quality, but the GOOD meats bump the average up solidly enough. So there you go, 4 stars.
Just went here for a work party this last week.  The food was okay.  The private dining room was really nice.  It was located downstairs and was very quiet which was nice with such a large group. The salad bar was nice and some of the meats were decent too, it just did not have that yum factor.  If you're looking for a good Brazilian place try out Espetus Churrascaria. I just can't sing any praises here...
We went here for happy hour once to get a feel for the food.  Unfortunately we weren't impressed.... Read more 
I first visited Pampas Brazilian Steakhouse in Las Vegas. I had been given a 2 for 1 ticket with my boyfriend one evening on the way to a show so we figured that we should take advantage. We got the rodizio, fully enjoyed the salad bar (best in Vegas) and brazilian beers. After enjoying this location so much I went online and found one in Palo Alto! I was thrilled. We first went to Pampas in Palo Alto last year for my birthday. The only difference I noticed were different salad bar options. Still a GREAT salad bar, but the one in Vegas was slightly better. The rodizio is fabulous. Men with different kinds of highest quality brazilian meats walk around and serve you endlessly. There is also a grilled pineapple man who walks around and slices off pieces of warm, rotisserated pineapple (my boyfriend's favorite!). The cocktails at the bar are also very nice! My boyfriend has had the happy hour a few time and has enjoyed it. The way it works is you are given a coaster that has one side red and one side green. Depending on whether you want to try the meat they walk by with you flip your coaster to either red or green. What a great idea! All in all Pampas has great atmosphere and unbeatable service. Slightly pricy but the rodizio is TOTALLY worth it. I recommend making a reservation.
interesting, never been to buffet (rodizio) where they come to your table with food. all the meats were tasty, but you get full really fast! i like the side bar, lots of fresh choices to choose from. tri-tip...good! filet mignon...good! pork lion...good! yum, worth the food and experience!
Rodizio?  A wise man once said (and by wise man I mean Barney Gumble from the Simpson's), "Just hook it to my veins!" Seriously, what's there not to like?  All you can eat meat?  Sign me up. Pampas has a great atmosphere with a salad bar that's easily accessible no matter where you're sitting.  You have your usual meat selection--Picanha is still my favorite, oh, and make that rare please. One thing I really enjoyed here was the Grilled Pineapple.  Not all Brazilian places have this and I really enjoyed it towards the end of my meal. Don't forget the Guarana!!! NOTE: The only other Rodizio style restaurant that can top this place is Fogo de Chao.
I don't know what took me so long to realize that I never reviewed Pampas. For Shame! I've been enjoying Pampas on occasion since it opened in PA a few years ago. I come about 4-5 times a year, depending on who wants to celebrate what occasion where. I can say with all honesty, that every single time I eat here, I always experience the same thing: - EXCELLENT service - Wonderful, Fabulous, Glorious food - Great entertainment - Food Coma You know how sometimes you hesitate recommending (what you think is) a great restaurant to someone because they might not like it, or the restaurant might have an "off" day, making you look like a jackass for recommending it? Well, you will NEVER have that problem with Pampas. I've recommended it to many people who have them recommended it to their people as well. Seriously, if you enjoy quality food prepared with care and are a serious meat lover, come for the rodizio. The day I first tried the lamp chops is still fresh in my mind. I am not a fan of lamb meat. I dont like the way it smells, tastes...the texture doesnt agree with me. I went to the restroom and the guy brings around lamb, which someone gets for me. I come back, eat it, and proclaim my love for Pampas' lamb forever. I complimented them so highly, that the chef came out and told us where the lamb came from (New Zealand), and how he prepared it. Awesome. I love the lamb, but the picanha is my favorite. You can usually find me at the end of the meal, crying over one last piece of picanha that I have to force myself to finish. Usually because the guy brought it around and I couldnt say no to another piece of my favorite meat. Cinco Estrelas for service, food and entertainment. One of my favorite restaurants EVER.
Fun and interesting.  Lots of meat.  Nice wines.  Fairly priced.
Great atmosphere and ambiance for a corporate party or an occasional event. +Service: Attentive but not overly annoying. +Setting: white table cloths, nice silverware +Food: Meat selection (Rodizio and side bar unlimited $44) is good but quality of some cuts was pretty average. Salad bar was OK, but not worth  $27 per person. +Desert: great! Try their Chocolate torte with Brazil nut toffee ($9). +Drinks are decent and fairly quick. +Good wine selection. +Good bar. Minus stars for: -Plates change was pretty slow -Utensils were taken but not replaced -So-called fillet mignon was not tender and rather chewy -Were told of more than actual meat selection (received 10 out of 14). -Per each round of beef there were 3-4 solicitations of chicken legs -Location is good for commuters but car parking is scarce on a Fri eve. -Overpriced salad bar (comparing to similarly tiered Espetus) Would still recommend this place, but beware of the Cons above.
It isn't difficult to get me to break my diet; wanting to try a new restaurant ranks #1 on my excuse list, but if I'm consuming 2500 calories in one meal, it better be so good that I don't regret the number on the scale the next morning. Pampas was not a worthy splurge. My bf & our two friends ordered Rodizio ($44, all you can eat meat & side bar.) The general consensus was meat was not well seasoned & many of the 12 cuts were dry. I ordered just the side bar ($27.) The cheesy breads & the rice were major fails, as the textures were off. Neither were fluffy, both were too chewy. The fried sides were no better; polenta was bland & bananas were not sweet. Cheese were not good quality ones; Parmesan was waxy, Gouda had no flavor, etc. There were three different salads, couscous & feijoada (traditional Brazilian stew of beans & pork.) The only items I liked were the grilled peaches, marinated mushrooms & garbanzo bean salad. I could continue with the bitchin', but suffice it to say this was one of the worse Brazilian steakhouse salad bars I've tried. Food was not well-flavored & many dishes seemed fresh out of a can. Not recommended. Go to Espetus instead.
OMG..best salad bar ever!!!!!  I went here on the third date but I did not order the all you can eat meat on the stick:( I guess I didn't want to come off as a fatass.. Came back a year later, you bet I ordered the all you can eat :p I loved the cheese breads!! They are so warm and it melts in your mouth...okay exergerrating.. The salad bar: It is not a traditional salad bar. There are so many items to choose from! I liked the sauteed mushrooms and the cheese selection. The meats: Some of the meats were dry but most were yummy!!! I liked the lamb. I will definitely come back again!
Not all meats there are great... Most of the meats are rare...I mean bloody red. You can always ask them to cook it  a little more, or make it well done. Salad bar is great, perfect addition to the meats. The whole experience is awesome, go there with the friends. Order Rodizion. Plan on being there for 2+ hours. Have fun!!!
Visited Pampas yesterday for the first time, and loved it! We had the Rodizio with Sidebar (which is a MUST we were told, and now concur to), not cheap with 44 USD per person, but worth the money for sure. We counted, and indeed tried all of the thirteen offered meats, and many of the sidebar dishes. I was surprised that in a restaurant known for his meat, the chicken was the absolute best. Don't get me wrong, all lamb, pork and beef was delicious, but the chicken legs (with lemon and smoked peppers, the other one with garlic and chili) were outstanding, only topped by the PERFECT chicken hearts (so don't chicken out trying them, heart is the best meat, tender and yummy). The sidebar is great, Pampas has everything from fresh salads to side dishes like coconut sweet potato mash to roasted peppers, and the best sauteed mushrooms I ever had! For desserts (hardly fitting), we tried the Coconut Flan and Blueberry-Acai Crisp, I wasn't too much into the Flan, but the Crisp (it's like a crumble with loooots of blueberries) was mindblowingly good. Come hungry, and make sure to at least try a small piece of everything, it's really worth it.
This restaurant is simply for meat lovers. Well, they do have a decent salad bar but why would you come here if you only want salad? You can simply go to a Fresh Choice for salad instead. Came here with a group of co-workers for lunch and was expecting a Brazilian cut and serve in front of you type lunch. But they told us that was only for dinner. No problem. We proceeded to order the family style variety meat plates. We started off with the salad bar. There was not much to write home about. The selection was mediocre and I felt Fresh Choice had more veggie choices. The meat plates we ordered included filet mignon, NY steak, lamb rack, grilled shrimp and pork chop. Pork chop and shrimp were marinated and grilled to perfection. They were juicy and tasty. Filet mignon and NY steak were both overcooked and dry. Lamb rack was OK. Portion size is huge. Each person had at least 3-4 pieces of decent sized leftover meat to take home. I have to minus 1 star for putting lamb rack with the rest of the meat on the same serving plate. Some of my co-workers did not like the smell of lamb and they had to endure lamb's favor mixing with other meat, which was a big turn-off for them. Overall, service was good and quick. Salad bar was below average (but we came here mainly for meat so no big deal). Quality of meat was good but disappointed that filet mignon and NY steak were way overcooked. Great atmosphere and location (downtown Palo Alto) but parking can't be hard to find. Price is no doubt expensive and I would only come back if someone (ie: my company) pays the tab.
4.5 stars Pampas is a great place for having a relaxed, yummy meal -- even if you're a vegetarian! Yep, you heard right.. even if you're a vegetarian at a Brazilian BBQ place, you can enjoy your meal. How is that possible? Well, Pampas starts you off with a great side bar. Not just salad, but fancy cheese, appetizer-type dishes, mashed potatoes, grilled veggies, macaroni salad, the works. Bonus points for the tasty sliced peaches with chevre! Now on to the meat -- if you purchase their standard buffet, the staff bring around various slices of meat, including skirt steak, filet mignon cubes, pork, lamb chops, homemade sausage (linguica), etc. This isn't heavy, fatty meat either -- it's tasty, and you can get small slices. After your table gets a taste of each thing, you can order seconds and thirds of any favorites. Our table actually loved the grilled pineapple more than any of the meats =) The ambience is fairly nice -- not the typical place that you imagine when you think Brazilian BBQ, i.e. big slabs of meat on a metal trolley. They have a nice bar area with the ubiquitous flat-screen TVs, and when we went there on a Friday night, there was live music. Last but not least, the desserts are great! Lots of tropical influences here, with mango mousse and passion fruit tart on the menu. I had the latter, because i LOVE passion fruit. My friends shared a coconut flan, which they said was quite tasty as well. All in all, Pampas is a great place to go for a savory dinner -- the only caveat is: come hungry!
Be ready for meat galore!  I am reviewing for the rodizio experience.  Best to come here hungry, better yet starving-it's all you can eat!  Don't forget the salad bar as well.  You might think, "Err...salad bar? No thanks, ' but let me tell you, it is as amazing as the meats!  Thumbs up for the variety and the unusual bites they offer.  One that stood out to me was the chilled peach soup- so amazing! (not sure if they change the salad bar menu around).  It was like a peach pureed and spiced with cinnamon and maybe cloves and chilled to perfection!  Also, there was a variety of dressings like pineapple dressing and banana dressing, many cheeses to chose from, the usual fancy deli meats, and interesting things like marinated eggplant and garlic mushrooms.  Before I rave about the meats, just be sure visit the salad bar at least once! On to the meats- amazing! (well, most)  All were good quality cuts of meat and the flavor was perfect.  May I also add that the servers were great, they kept filling our plates with meat non-stop!  It got overwhelming at one point, but better than not getting served! By the way, I didn't understand what the tongs were for, haha, but now I do.  If you don't know like me, it's what you use to grab the meat as the server is slicing it. MY FAVORITES (got seconds ,even thirds on these!): -Filet Mignon - super tender, on the rare side, but not stringy, which I love!  It had the perfect soft, buttery taste.  Both the garlic and parmesan were equally great. -Skirt Steak - tender as well, and very flavorful. -Lamb (loin chop) -  flavor was great and it was juicy and tender.  It eventually had the wild gamey taste, but nevertheless, I gobbled it all up! -Spicy Chicken Leg - very well flavored and cooked. -Grilled Pineapple - who knew this would be so delicious, but it is!  It may be due to the fact that it's something sweet and refreshing after eating so much salty meat, but regardless, it is a must-try! LEAST FAVORITES (took one bite and was ok letting it go to waste): -Bacon Wrapped Turkey - the turkey meat just did not suite my taste buds. -Sausage - tasted too oily and kind of felt quesy after one bite. The other meats were great tasting too, they just didn't stand out as much as my favorites, nor did they make the reject list. COME HUNGRY AND COME WITH THE MINDSET TO SPEND MONEY!  (Rodizio menu is 44 dollars/person) ...but in the end, you'll be glad you tried it and the money spent won't make you feel you wasted it.  HAPPY EATING!
YUM (that pretty much sums it up)! Came here last night for dinner while on a first date. My date had heard this place was good, so we checked it out. We both really enjoyed our dinner. He got the Rodizio and I got the Lobster Tail. I was indecisive on what to get since I wasn't too hungry (I think I was more nervous than anything, really haha). The Lobster Tail was very tasty, the best I've ever had and the squeezed lemon and butter made it even more mouth watering. Served with a salad on the side, this was the perfect portion of food. Great place to bring a date! I had an awesome time. :)
Stopped by for lunch and $14 for their Filet Mignon Skewer entree is very fair! Good size portion and a solid steak. Good customer service and trendy/modern style restaurant.
My friends introduced me to this carnivorous wonderland a year ago and I recently went again. When we first went here, I had no idea what a Brazilian steakhouse was -- I assumed it was like any other steakhouse. NOPE, I walked in and was in complete awe: waiters walking from table to table with HUGE slabs of meat on long metal sticks... and the rest was history. Each time I've been here I've always gotten the side bar along with the rodizio. $50ish if I remember correctly. Be careful not too fill yourself up on the side bar. I usually grab a couple pieces of cheese like their fresh mozzarella balls, smoked salmon, and various vegetables to go with the meat. Just don't forget that the meat is the main thing here! I love the lamb and the tri tip. Everything else was pretty good as well, but I usually stay away from the pork just because it was dry. Service is wonderful, quick and responsive. Environment is very lively and may not be to your liking if you go for dinner... the music was really loud around 7ish on a weekday. Overall a great place to stuff your face with meat and hang out with your friends (they have a bar!).
Great food, atmosphere & the band is incredible tonight!
This is a trendy relatively new restaurant in downtown PA.  I'd heard mixed reviews (particularly from my Brazilian friends).  I've been to several Brazilian steak houses before and this is one of the nicer ones. My party had the Rodizio.  The side bar was very good and in fact is probably good enough to simply eat there!   The meats were high quality and came frequently (perhaps too frequently).  There were about 10 different meats, nothing particularly exotic (e.g. chicken hearts) but all were good and well-cooked.  The servers weren't always the friendliest, but weren't stingy. The price is appropriate for the quality and location.  So no complaints.
it is definitely one of the classier Brazilian BBQ spots around the bay. The decor is chic and modern..with a live band right as you walk in. The drinks were tasty..and all you can eat for 44 dollars is mad cheap. A great selection of meat and the salad bar was fresh...what more can a girl ask?
Went at lunch time on a Tuesday. Very attractive atmosphere. I ordered the new york steak and calamari appetizer. I was sadly unimpressed. The steak was meh. Nothing special. My veggies and rice tasted like bananas and I hate bananas. They had delicious vanilla tea. Desert cheesecake and gelatto. Meh not amazing just mediocre.  My friend got the family platter and I sampled the meats. Meh. Nothing special for a whole lotta buck.
Meat! Meat! Meat! Meat! Grrrrrr. This is a carnivore's dream! My foodie cousin, Lisa C, a fellow yelper, took me here for a late b-day dinner and let's just say I'm stuffed.  Come hungry! We both went with the rodizio which also included the side bar for $44/person.  Over the course of a few hours, we were able to eat a bunch of meats including: Picanha (top sirloin) Costela de cordeiro (loin chop) - love lamb, so good! Lombo (pork loin) Medalhao com alho (tenderloin filet) Maminha (tri-tip) Frango (chicken thighs) Frango picante (chicken legs) Linguica (house brazilian pork sausage) - tasty Abacaxi (slow roasted pineapple) - refreshing after eating all this meat! Peru (turkey breast wrapped in bacon) - everything is better with bacon Fraldinha (skirt steak) - so flavorful! All of the above was definitely worth it! I love eating lots of different things at once so that may be another reason why I enjoyed dinner so much.  Overall, all the meats were well flavored and tasty! I might come back next time and just get the halibut entree - looks amazing! I know they give you the option to have unlimited access to the side bar for $27 - I would say, not worth it.  Honestly, the side bar is nothing but a fancy Sweet Tomatoes. And really worth $10 at the most.  Don't get me wrong, they do offer a great variety of veggies and side dishes that definitely complement the meats very well, so if you're going to get it, just go with the rodizio + side dishes.
Pampas.......... mMmmmMmm!!!!!!! The first time I came here was about a year ago, when my boyfriend's sister had her birthday dinner. We didn't really know about the whole rodizio deal, so we got the new york steak and shared. It was DELICIOUS!! Especially with this green mint sauce that they give you on the side. Holy moly!! But we couldn't help but stare at everyone else doing the rodizio lol. So our anniversary came around and we decided to make reservations for Pampas. Got there a little late because we couldn't find parking but they were very accommodating and seated us right away! The table was a little wobbly but anything for Brazilian steak, haha. This time, we both got the rodizio. Their mushrooms and asparagus in the side bar was phenomenon (we probably ate like 2lbs worth of mushrooms). Then the meat galore came.... omg. The filet mignon to me was the best! Servers were attentive and explains what meat they're serving. For $44 a person with unlimited brazillian meat, I think its def worth it. I want to go back again :(
I came here last night with my boyfriend for a work event that he had. His work had the entire room downstairs with unlimited amounts of wine and free drinks. One of his co-workers told us how the place worked and said that the salad bar and free bread appetizers were a trick and to hold out for the meat!!! I went upstairs to try out the salad bar and would give it a 6 out of 10. I have only been to one other Brazilian BBQ place and that was in San Diego and their salad bar was much more impressive as it included all you can eat seafood including crab legs and huge prawns. About 15 minutes later the meat started to arrive. My favorite side of meat was called the Peru which is turkey breast wrapped in smoked bacon. I also really liked the pineapple on the stick as it was warm and juicy. I passed on several of the different meats because I have a hard time eating meat medium rare and thats probably my only complaint. Overall it was a great experience because it was free. If I was paying out of my own pocket I would have expected a little bit more.... Bar: Great Dining Room: Awesome Service: Good Food: Ok with a couple of great dishes (pinapple, bacon wrapped turkey) Would I go back? I would probably take a friend here from out of town just for the experience
I wanted to update my review , I have come here on several occasions and have noticed that the service has dipped a little bit.  I've asked for them to bring back certain cuts and it takes them awhile in comparison to other restaurants even at off-peak hours.  The rodizio still is a great option if you like meat and have a healthy appetite.
this place is pretty good. Came here for lunch with some co-workers and i have to say that I enjoyed... Read more 
Came here for a late night dinner during the weekday... and surprisingly there was still a handful of people and people coming in after us... we came like at 8:40PM... We opted for their rodizio, all you can eat. Their salad bar at the usual items, grilled veggies, rice salad, etc. I can say all their meats were very well seasoned, so I enjoyed this place more than other Brazilian Steak houses.
Don't laugh at me just because I didn't try the Rodizio menu at Pampas.  After dining at other Churrascarias such as Samba in Las Vegas ($31), Cleo's in San Bruno ($20), and both Espetus locations in San Francisco and San Mateo ($50), I've come to the conclusion that paying $45 for all you can eat Brazillian BBQ might not be worth it. I came here to treat my sister out for her birthday and was joined with her husband and my other sister.  While the birthday celebrant and her husband both ordered the Rodizio menu, my sister ordered their Duck Breast entree, and I just had the Unlimited Side Bar. Their Rodizio menu seemed very similar to Samba, since they had the Bacon Wrapped Turkey Breast, but they didn't have any seafood skewers.  My sister still enjoyed it, but she was only really blown away by a few of the skewers, in particular their Skirt Steak and Grilled Pineapple. I had the Unlimited Side Bar, which was good, but I don't think it was worth $27 considering that everything I ate was just up to par with Fresh Choice.  The sides were still good though, albeit a little salty, especially the mushrooms.  The Zucchini Croquettes were pretty good though, especially when dipped in Garlic Parmesan dressing. My other sister's Duck Breast entree looked really good and she enjoyed it.  Also I peeked at another table and noticed that their Ribeye entree was HUGE!!  If I ever come back here, I'll definitely have to give their Ribeye a go. Service here was really spot on as they always checked on our table and even carried out requests for certain skewers.  So no complaints there. Overall, Pampas is just like any other fancy Churrascaria that you should  visit if you have the mad craving for meat.  Just be aware that you probably won't enjoy every skewer in the Rodizio menu, but it's worth a try at least once.
Went with a large group last night for dinner. This place was very cool. I've never had Brazilian style steakhouse food and it was a pleasant surprise. We order a few apps, calamari and prawns. Those were both pretty good but not amazing. The real shine in this place is the meat. We all agreed on the meat selection which they bring out to you constantly on large skewers and slice off fresh portions of meat. We had everything from tender leg of lamb, tri-tip, fillet, chicken, chicken hearts and several other things I didn't recognize. It's a bonanza of meat but very good. They do have a side-dish-like bar at the back of the restaurant where you can get cheeses or salads but clearly the focus is the meat. Overall it was a good place for a group. A bit pricey but worth the try. I would go back but I'm still feeling the effects of all the meat we ate so it won't be soon.
all i gotta say is, bring a really big appetite when you come.  especially if you're gonna do the all you can eat deal. it was my first time here with a bunch of my girlfriends, and i really enjoyed my whole dining experience. the environment + the service was super.  the servers made sure we got to try all their meats.  i tried most, but passed on all the weird stuff. everything was pretty good.  i know i didn't eat 50$ worth of meat, but it was worth the experience. as for the meat, they just bring it around to you, and you can choose to eat or not.  they'll continue to come until you change your sign to have them to stop.  when you're ready for some more food, you can change it back. along with the all you can eat, comes with their little salad buffet.  its pretty good.  has more than just salad.  lots of cheese and meats to pair with a glass of wine.
Solid 3.5 stars. Avg per person w/o alcohol/drinks: $50 Came back again for a family birthday gathering and this time around it was "okay." I guess it also has to do with unlimited food. Usually, my marginal utility and appreciation for the food goes down with buffet style type restaurant. All of us agreed most of the meats were on the salty side. Don't get me wrong; If you're a meat lover, this place is perfect for you!!
Must order the Rodizio: All you can eat for $45/person! COME HUNGRY!!! Be wary of the wine prices.... Read more 
I'm usually not a buffet-style-all-you-can-eat type of gal, but I've heard a lot about Brazilian meats, so I had to try Pampas. The happy hour crowd was quite busy, which makes me want to come back to try their HH food. If you love meat, you'll find the non-stop meat options that rotate throughout the restaurant a pleasure to have. Between two girls, we had our fair share of tastings, but I don't think we ate $44 worth of meat. I definitely appreciated the variety of meats, and it definitely helps to have the side bar (which had salads, fruits, some starch) to mix in with the meat. We both only visited the bar once and stuck with cuts of meat throughout dinner. If you're a big eater and LOVE meat, you'll find it enjoyable. As for me, I think once is good enough, but I wouldn't mind coming back for the happy hour specials!
Very good, my boyfriend took me here for our mini anniversary. Great atmosphere and awesome food! Would definately go back!!
I've been to Pampas for dinner and happy hour and my experiences have been really pleasant. Dinner -- all the meats are nicely grilled and seasoned. Filet mignon is my favorite meat among all the options (Parmesan chicken is also delic!). Also, don't forget the yummy appetizers: cheeseball, plantains, and fried banana thing! Grilled pineapple is very tasty after all the grease you consume throughout the dinner. Happy hour -- This is hands down one of the best HH place in Palo Alto downtown. All the food is half off! You can get the assortment plate for half of the normal place and it's enough to fill two people. Ribs and grilled chille are really yummy as well. I highly recommend this place!
i tried it for the first time last friday for my husband's birthday.  LOVED it!  the salad bar was amazing and the meat was excellent, but also served with such care.  Great service.
With over 1,000 reviews and counting, Pampas needs another review like I need a couple of more inches.  Nonetheless, I feel compelled to spill my guts (not literally) about my experience there.  And an experience it was.....although the food is very good (not excellent), this is a restaurant you will remember and discuss with whatever few friends you may have for quite a while. As a Brazilian steakhouse, Pampas delivers great quantities of food ( = all you can eat), but it's the atmosphere that makes this restaurant.  Tall ceilings, well-spaced tables, an up-beat buzz and very friendly waiters soothe the soul of the savage beast, whatever the hell that means.  The waiters actually thank you after they slice off high-quality meat and place in on your plate.  Even the side bar is a happy place as you fool yourself into thinking that all of the fat and cholesterol that you're filling up on during dinner is somehow being offset by tossing down a sprig or two of parsley and a few spears of well-cooked broccoli. As a once-in-awhile excursion, Pampas is a great place to enjoy dinner.  By buffet restaurant standards, this is an expensive joint, but by Palo Alto fine-dining standards, you'll have a very nice meal and a party of two can get out alive for not much more than $100 if you heed your sponsor's advice and forego the booze.
We tried this place as my BFF was craving meat. This is certainly the place for it! Everything we tried was SO SO good. They even had chicken hearts. Mmmm. Well, I grew up eating it so it doesnt gross me out. Come here hungry as it is all you can eat! The servers that come to your table are super friendly. The choices are just amazing. I love this place!
Let me first say I don't like the concepts of buffets in general - food laying around in a steam table. Personally it's kind of gross. So when I got here I didn't know what to expect. I ordered the Rodizio (an unlimited amount of meat) with the side bar (vegetables, salads, etc.). Maybe it's the Anthony Bourdain in me forget the side bar it's all about the meat. The meat is on a spitfire rod and servers come to your table to ask if you want to try this piece of meat. The skirt steak, top sirloin, and tri-tip were phenomenal. What's the point of going to a steakhouse where you can only order one steak for half the price or the same price? In Pampas you can have varieties of steak. One last note Pampas beats any buffets in Las Vegas. Bar none the best buffet I have ever been to.
Pampas!  Not so much of any Brazilian feel, but more like modern sleek steakhouse.  The decor already speaks the prices...$$$.  Nice restroom too! Ok, to the important points here... Overall, 3.5 stars if there is a half star...can't give it a 4-star because I am not completely a big fan yet. Food: 3 stars Fried yucca, yum! yum!  Lamb meatball - good but a bit dry.  Rib -- nay...not so good - the meat selection is not good (they didn't use good quality pork...).  Calamari -- NOT GOOD AT ALL --- DRY!!! Service: 2.5 Just okay, can't complain.  But not super good either. Ambiance: 4 stars Ah...it is pretty good...nicely decor! I would go again,  if someone else is picking up the tab...
WOW! One of the best meals we've had! We came for dinner to celebrate my husband's birthday. We brought the kiddos and they both enjoyed items from the kids' menu. Although next time I think we'll all order the same thing... The RIDIZIO! It was phenomenal! I only felt bad for the kiddos, because I think it was sad for them watching us go back and forth from the sidebar and all the meat that comes your way, I think they would've enjoyed that experience as much as we did! There's always next time! They are pricey, but well worth it! Normally, I would say that I live for dessert, but after last night's feast, I was saying, I live for meat! Woohoo! ;-) My only bits of advice are: 1) GET THE RIDIZIO and 2) don't waste too much of your appetite on the side bar items. Most of the things there are great, however, I highly recommend you focus on THE MEAT! :-) If I'm going to be nitpicky, I have to say that I was disappointed there wasn't any "Happy Birthday" hoorah for my husband. I put it in the Open Table reservation and when I checked-in (husband was out parking the car), the hostess greeted me and said "Happy Birthday to your husband". So I know that they knew... again, just being nitpicky here...
MEAT MEAT MEAT MEAT...YUM!  For my friend's birthday, I had arranged a dinner party at Pampas.  The hostess was great.  We were seated exactly per our reservation time and wasted no time getting to the business of chowing down! Did I mention that there is a full bar and live band as well! Be sure you come here on an empty stomach and release your inner BEAST!!!  The Rodizio for $44 includes all you can eat meat (over 14 types depending on the night) and over 24 dishes from the salad bar....did I mention ALL YOU CAN EAT?!   The service was great and we actually made a new friend :)  Ken was awesome and accommodated us very well. My Picks: -Grilled Pineapple (this is a MUST to try...the juiciest pineapple I've ever had!!!) -Turkey wrapped bacon -Filet Mignon -Argentina Parmesan Sirlion -Rack of Lamb (I'm not a lamb person but this lamb tasted great! not gamey and super tender) Note: Do not fill your plate and stomach at the salad bar.  Make sure you save some room on your plate for the meat!
Outside of my Vegas buffet visits, this is the best buffet I have ever been to. 1)  The service is awesome.  Our server was super nice and friendly and always asking if there was anything we needed.  Is there a specific meat you want brought out?  Does everything taste ok?  I think her name is Ashley so if you get her you'll be well taken care of.  Thanks Ashley!  Others came by and changed out our dirty plates.  Water was constantly flowing. 2)  The side bar was awesome!  I love the fact you are asked to use a new plate each time visiting the bar (sanitation and hygenic factors for me).  Everything was presented in a visually appealing manner to the eye and did not look like a hoard of hogs had ravaged anything.  Super clean and organized and not a morsel of food on the floor to be found.  I do advise taking small one to two bite portions of whatever you like and save room for the meat!  I didn't get to try everything in the side bar, but most of what I had was pretty awesome and fresh tasting.  Nothing was over oily...just a clean and fresh taste in my mouth.  The mushrooms were killer as was the fresh mozzarella (soft and silky melting in my mouth).  The pilaf and mashed taters went well with the meats.  The veggies zucchini were all grilled to perfections (not mushy with just a firmness to them). 3)  The MEAT!  The meats were all grilled to perfection (in my case, medium rare), except for the pork loin (too lean and too dry but well seasoned).  My favorite was the leg of lamb and skirt steak.  The lamb loin was a bit gamey, but was not so noticeable once dipped with the chipotle or balsamic dressing.  Turkey wrapped in bacon was pretty impressive.  I thought it would be dry, but the turkey was moist and flavorful..how turkey should always be!!!  Although the meats were grilled perfectly, some lacked flavor for me.  However, using the dipping sauces cured that.  All the meats did not taste heavy and oily, perfect!  Be sue to use the green and red signs they give you.  In the beginning, we kept it on green and the meat literally kept coming to our table.  I found myself constantly interrupted by the awesome service and had to flip it to red so I could enjoy what was already on my plate.  Be sure to come hungry but PACE yourself. 4)  The dessert we chose was awesome!  The chocolate torte was elegant, surprising, and delicious.  The dish was presented on the plate in a dramatic and elegant manner with the cake and gelato ice cream on one end with a streak of creme fraiche across the plate leading to two pieces of bacon brittle.  I know!  There's even bacon in the dessert!  Surprisingly the bacon brittle was smokey and crunchy and awesome!  We were eating the brittle on its own, but then we combined it with the cake and gelato and had one awesome dessert.  Enjoy! 5)  The decor and ambiance was classy and fitting.  By the time we left there were lots of people in the bar area enjoying the libations and live band.  The decor is modern with dark wood, white linens, and black floors...simple, casual, yet evoked a feel of fine dining. We were two very happy people that had to waddle ourselves back to the car parked blocks away and pop the button on our pants.  We then went into a deep sleep for a very long time!  Happy campers we are!!
Amazing salad selection. Great service. Lovely ambiance. My favorite meat selections were spicy chicken, filet mignon with parmessan cheese, and the skirt steak.You'll leave here stuffed! Also this toffee ice cream chocolate brownie dessert thing was DELICIOUS. Not great for a date though, given how regularly you are interrupted. Just a thought.
Came here for my birthday a few months ago.  The atmosphere was wonderful, our waitress (though a bit scary) was very helpful. The rodizio was AWESOME. The other dishes from the group that night were the lamb shank and duck breast.  The lamb shank was supposedly very good.  The duck breast on the other hand, was a bit too fatty and chewy. Overall, the experience was enjoyable.  Just a bit off on the food which is not their signature rodizio.
I had made a reservation for a party of 2 for 7:45pm on a friday. We arrived at approximately 6:50pm. We checked in with the hostess, she suggested we wait in the lounge/bar area and that she would notify us when our table was ready. While sitting at the bar waiting, we noticed that there were plenty of empty tables and wondered why we weren't being seated. At about 7:30pm we decided to cancel our reservations and leave. I informed a different hostess of the cancellation and he inquired as to why we were canceling. I told him it was due to our observation of empty tables and lack of service. He replied with," I didn't know you guys were waiting, I can seat you right now". I told him it wasn't his fault but was the other hostesses fault, since she checked us in. Horrible service! We also noticed that the waiters/servers didn't attend to the occupied tables to often. Went to Espetus previously and TOTALLY recommend it rather then this establishment.
Leave it to me to not try Pampas until the week before moving away... We came for Happy Hour, when the drinks are all $5 and lounge food is 50% off. Great in theory, though I didn't find very many of the menu items very appealing. All of the drinks are a little hard to pronounce, but I would just ask the waitress for recommendations. There were a few particularly delicious drinks, but I have no idea what they were called since I couldn't pronounce them to begin with. Off the lounge menu, we tried a number of items, but the only ones that were memorable were the mixed grill platter and the ribs. The ribs were juicy, meaty, and ready to fall off the bone. The mixed grill platter had a great selection, as promised, but I would only buy it during happy hour since it definitely wouldn't be worth the full $28. The steak was juicy and a little sweet and chewy, the turkey and chicken were both great, and the pineapple on the side was a great addition. Best part of the night was our server - she did an amazing job given how many people were packed into the lounge, she had great recommendations, and she was super sweet.
Top Ten Things That Make You Go Hmmm.........after eating at Pampas: 10) Did I really just eat that much meat? 9) How long will this food coma last? 8) Is it too late to become a vegetarian? 7) Is gluttony still a sin? I guess I'm going to hell. 6) How many poor chickens did they have to sacrifice to get all those chicken hearts on a skewer? 5) Did I just eat perfectly cooked al dente asparagus from a salad bar? Impossible! 4) Is it really possible to be even fuller than at Thanksgiving? 3) If the green side of the thingy-ma-jiggy means "Oh hell yeah, bring on the meat" and the red side means "For the love of jeebus, I can't take it anymore. Please leave me the hell alone with your meat on a stick", then where the heck is the yellow side that means "I just need a little break, so puh-leez slow the hell down before my arteries shut down"? 2) Where in the world did that room for dessert come from? 1) Did I really just eat that much meat? Did I ask that already? Brain is fuzzy. Meat-induced dementia is kicking in. I can't remember.
It's best to prepare yourself by eating a light breakfast and lunch before having the all-you-can-eat rodizio for dinner at this excellent Brazilian Churrascaria. It's located in a convenient location in downtown near caltrain and a parking garage. The space has a cool design: there's a lounge bar in front, a loft area upstairs with long tables for large parties, and a sub-level downstairs with more intimate lighting. The service has always been great here.  When you set your marker to "go", you'll promptly be swarmed by friendly skewers of meat. Just say "yes, I would like a slice of you on my plate please." Servers will periodically bring you fresh plates and keep your drinks topped off. Their best cut is the Picanha (top sirloin). They cook it medium rare, but you can ask the servers to bring you cuts cooked to your liking. The cuts of filet mignon are also delicious. They have two versions: garlic and parmesan. Just those items are enough to make satisfy me, but they also have tri-tip, skirt steak, pork tenderloin, chicken, lamb, turkey wrapped in bacon, and sausage. If you ask, they also serve marinated chicken hearts. If you need something sweet to clear your palette during the meat parade, they'll bring out grilled pineapples. The salad bar is good, but really just a warm up for the rodizio. They also have nice desserts, but I usually never have room. Coffee or a dessert wine is good enough for me. If you're not up for the rodizio, they have appetizers and various entrees, but I've never tried them. They do $5 cocktails and 1/2 off appetizers 5-7pm for happy hour, so it's a great place for drinks after work.
Service really is top notch here.  The staff was attentive, considerate, and anticipated our needs without being invasive.  One friend preferred her food well done, and off the skewer, items lean towards medium-rare (the way it should be, not that I'm judging, ok, I am, but a only a little bit.) One of the passadores said that he'd be coming back with some well done.  We waited a bit, and when concerned we asked our server, he assured us it would be out soon and they just need needed the prep time. They came out with two plates, will every cut, served up just for her.  Nice. We all fiended for the roasted pineapple, they came back around three times, and gave us fattier and fattier cuts. I mentioned how I enjoyed going all Hannibal Lecter on chicken hearts, but figured it wouldn't be served.  While I was away from the table, my friends asked about it, and sure enough it's available only by request. Minutes later, I'm presented with a couple of skewers.  Not only did they make sure to prep some, they knew to ask me, despite my absence from the table. Service in this style of eating, is key and I left full and happy. The food bar was solid. The meats were solid with a slight exception.  The lamb.  It shouldn't need a balsamic reduction sauce, but it did.  Another joint I went to, did them as small chops, simply done with some herbs and salt.  Probably easier to get the flavor all the way through, though, I can imagine that would be more difficult to cook to perfection. The one big gripe I have was their "caipirinha".  Looked and tasted like sweet and sour mix seriously, it looked like piss.  The limes, clearly, weren't muddled.  If I was the bartender, manager, owner, I'd be ashamed to serve that at a Brazilian restaurant.  I'd be ashamed to serve that at a dive bar for 60 year old alcoholics.  It'd be a four star review if it wasn't for that heinous drink.  Perhaps a little skewed and biased, but take it with a grain of salt, it's the national drink of Brazil afterall. Seriously, it's easier to make one that it is to spell one.  Sugar and fruit, muddled.  Ice.  Cachaca.  And you know what?  Mix it up.  You can use different fruits.  Sake instead of cachaca.  Make a couple of rolling caipirinha stations and make them to order table side.  Just a thought.
If you love meat, this is a place to try. You can have a menu with unlimited meat and sides. You can help yourself with the sides on a buffet, and meat is being served at your table one after each other. You have a great choice of beef, chicken, filet mignon, lamb, and so on, nicely prepared, cut at your table. I loved each meat I tasted! It's a bit pricey, but worth it.
Surprised my boyfriend by reserving a table here for a belated Valentines Day Dinner. The hostess was so accommodating because I had to call twice to push back our reservation time due to traffic. Upon arriving, we only had to wait 5 minutes for our table, which is understandable since I kept changing the time. We grabbed drinks at the bar, which was pretty nice but had no customers sitting down; then again we got there at 8:15. When we sat down we were offered two choices of dining, regular menu or what they call their Rodizio. We decided to go with that since it allowed us to sample different types of meats plus it was unlimited for only $44! Their side bar had a HUGE selection of choices and whats even better was that it even listed allergen facts such as "contains dairy" on the little name plaques. This was perfect because I had major food allergies so it worked out without me having to ask the server and troubling them. We sampled the FRALDINHA (skirt steak) and even though it was the cheapest item of meat, it had the most flavors and tasted the best. We even got 2 rounds of it cause it was so good! Other items that came our way included: LAMB - it was very gamey with not much flavor but we used the sauce they provided at the beginning of the meal, which tasted like their house A1 sauce. MEDALHAO COM ALHO (filet mignon with garlic and herb seasoning) - the seasoning was delicious!!! But given it was a filet mignon; it did not have fat so it was very meaty. MAMINHA (tri-tip with rock salt and olive oil) - it was just okay. Not much flavor, had to use the sauce again. LINGUICA/CHORIZO - little links that tasted the same. I couldn't tell the difference between the two, honestly. But it was good. Just couldn't eat another round because it had a lot of fat and oil. CORACAO DE FRANGO (chicken hearts) - my boyfriend only ate these, but he said they were HELLA good, so good that he ordered another round and they ended up cooking fresh ones just for him haha. ABACAXI (roasted pineapple) - SWEET! And the fact it was roasted gave it a smoky taste, which perfected it. I wish they came around more with this because it would make a perfect dessert. After awhile, we stopped seeing the servers walking around offering the meat but I think because they were going to close soon. By then we were way too full but I think we got our moneys worth. I wish we were able to try some of the chicken selections though, because looking at their menu on the website the seasonings sound really good. The bill for the two of us came down to be less than $100 not including tip yet. I think this was a good deal for sure. The service was friendly and they helped explain to us what each item was. The decor of the place was very modern with nice wooden furnishings and white table-clothed tables. They had a little loft up above for private parties and a little basement room downstairs with more tables. I definitely would recommend this place to anyone who loves their meat!
If Pampas were a movie, this would be the opening scene: *Two white guys are sitting on a couch watching football: White Dude #1: Hey broski, wanna start a restaurant? White Dude #2: TOTALLY! White Dude #1: I heard like, Brazil like, does pretty good BBQ. White Dude #2: AWW MAN, I love BBQ! White Dude #1: ME TOO! And that's pretty much it. It would probably get a 17% on Rotten Tomatoes. But what will it get on my review? First off, this was the restaurant of choice for my 21st birthday. No pressure, right? Inside, the restaurant was very well decorated. I love the dark feel, and I love the warm colors. I feel inebriated already! Now, unlike the masses of people who just HAD to get the Rodizo (aka, the all you can eat meat + salad bar), I actually had a brain and decided to get entrees. I mean, yea, it's a Brazilian steakhouse and you SHOULD get the Rodizo, right? Well, if their specialty is meat, then technically speaking, ALL of their meat entrees should rock my undies off, right? No. Ceviche: The fish was good - I'll give em that. But the flavor was WAAY too simple. It was just fish and citrus, without any of the veggies. I would be a lot more satisfied if I had gone to a Mexican joint in San Jose. Ribs: When I first saw the ribs, my initial response was to pick it up with chopsticks. I mean it seriously looked like the #34 special on your local Chinese Restaurant. Furthermore, it tasted like it too! I was like "ME...NO...RIKE!! *flings food at waiter's face*" Lamb Shank: When this bad boy came out I was like "DAYUM! That ain't a shank! That's a goddamn Lamb BAZOOKA!" Unfortunately, this was just a big pile of sadness. This dish summarizes my feelings about poverty, racism, and Sarah Palin - it's just horrific. The meat was SOO godamn bland. Sure, it was tender, but it had absolutely no flavor at all. I was tempted to lick the bum of the blonde chick sitting next to me for some flavor. I also tried my friend's dishes: duck and squash. Those dishes were also crap. Overall, I wasn't that surprised. Palo Alto is known for hyping up their food when in reality, it sucks big lamb balls. The food was highly underseasoned, boring, and uninventive. To make matters worse, our waiter was a bit condescending. Shit son, I was about to take my lamb shank and SHANK HIM! I give Pampas a TOTALLY AWESOME 2.0 out of 5.
Prepare yourself for a feast having the all-you-can-eat rodizio and the salad bar for dinner at this excellent Brazilian Churrascaria. The restaurant is design very nice with a lounge bar in front, a loft area upstairs with long tables for large parties, and a sub-level downstairs with more intimate lighting and a HUGE wine selection. It's located in a convenient location in downtown near cal-train and a parking garage. Please remember to pay for parking if you park at the cal-train station. This is my 4th time visiting here and the service is impeccable always. When you set your marker to (green) "the meats are coming", Just say (yes), I would like a slice please. The opposite side of the marker is red (stop) that means you have given up. The servers will bring you fresh plates as needed and with the refill of drinks for your thirst quencher. They also have a larger vegetarian food bar if you are not a carnivore. Their best cut meats include: *Top sirloin *Lamb *Chicken *Tri-tip *Pork chops *Turkey wrapped in bacon *Fillet Mignon *Sausage AND *Grilled pineapples are also delicious. A experience of a lifetime, you only live once. Enjoy!!!!
Indeed, I am a huge fan of this place. The food is amazing!!! There are so many places that charge you an arm and a leg for mediocre food. This is not one of them. The food and drinks are well worth the money. Portions are quite generous, and I made a good second meal out of leftovers. I do have to disclose that I know the owner, but my palate is completely unbiased. If this restaurant were near where I worked or lived, I would want to go so frequently that and would be so poor. By the way, this is a carnivore's heaven. :)
Instantly became one of my FAVORITE PLACES!!!! First of all parking was awesome here, there is a structure right next to the restaurant.  As soon as I walked in I already loved the ambiance.  It had a lot of space to sit if you're waiting for your table, although we got seated promptly. It is sooooo worth it to get the Rodizio menu, which is the all you can eat.  You get all you can eat meat and sides for only $44.00 a person!! I loved the Filet Mignon and the ribeye (they had a parmesan encrusted and regular) and they were both cooked perfectly pink. :)  The tri tip was a little too well done for my tastes but still good.  I actually was a huge fan of their mushroom side, I couldn't stop eating them!!! If I could give any critique it would be that the pork loin was a little salty since I got the first carve of it, but otherwise PERFECTION.  EXTREMELY RECOMMENDED!!!
I don't remember anything from my night at Pampas.  I just remember walking in, sitting down and then a blur of servers with tray after tray of meat.  I awoke from my meat induced coma the next morning, still full, wondering if maybe it had been a delicious dream.  The photographic evidence shows it was not a dream and the things me and that meat were doing is probably illegal in most states. My advice for coming to Pampas, bring a vegetarian.  You'll need somebody to drag you to the car and drive you home.
Oh Pampas, how I love thee!  How you so easily satisfy my carnivorous desires with your variety of succulent meats!  Is it the fact that they are presented to me on a spear by a good looking young man or the fact that they're perfectly seasoned and cooked Brazilian-style that makes this meat so amazing.  OK, it's all of the above! Skirt steak, tri-tip, sirloin, chicken, lamb --- as long as the coaster on your table displays the green side up, the parade of meat will continue, the minute you flip it with to the red side it stops.  Although challenging to convince yourself to so, I suggest that you flip that baby every now and then to give yourself a breather. Otherwise, you will have difficulty extracting yourself from the table later. The only thing this place doesn't do well are Cosmopolitans.  Mine was a little weak and watered down but I will forgive Pampas for this fault because the meat is just that good! Don't miss the salad bar ---- couscous, curried vegetables, and an assortment of greens, your meat deserves to be part of a well rounded meal.
This was one of the most interesting and flavorful eating experiences I've ever had! Pampas is a... Read more 
What can I say, a meat lovers paradise ;). Service was excellent and the food or shall I say the meat was excellent. Rodizio lets you try all the meats and if you have a favorite they will keep bringing more. A little spendy but well worth trying, they have an excellent solection of Tequila.
Meat, meat and meat!!! Beside of meat there is a nice salad bar. Drinks a good and the wine list OK. Services was subtle. The quality of the meat was perfect. They brought different styles of grilled variations very frequently. I will come back in the future.
Pampas is a meat lovers delight. There are a variety of good items in the sidebar, but the reason that you come here is for the meat.  I am not going to go into detail of all of the types and seasonings, but if you love meat you will not be disappointed.  I would give the food here a four to four and a half stars. I have been to several churrascaria restaurants and the service at Pampas puts them all to shame. The waiter and servers were friendly and they all had smiles as they brought the food around.  When the staff is in a good mood it makes the atmosphere that much better. Whenever we asked for a certain type of meat it was brought to the table very quickly. The service along with live music gives them 5 stars. Pampas rocks!
Getting the Rodizio at this place is pretty good if you are not paying, but if you are, I would say that $40+ just for that is not worth it considering how much you have to stuff yourself to make that worthwhile. That said, I did come here, not on my own dime, and had a ball of a time trying almost everything and having some delicious wine with it. The happy hour is nice for drinks but I feel that the appetizers are a tad small. I would get drinks here and go elsewhere for dinner, though be warned that the lounge seating is minimal. If you have many friends, be prepared to stand.
First Brazilian Churrascaria in the Bay Area and I was not very impressed. The place is very nice, clean and the decor is very modern. The meat selection seemed a little lacking, which would have been fine if the meat wasn't so salty. The meat is cooked perfectly, but too heavily seasoned. This is silly because that just makes patrons waste food by getting more than they think they can eat because the saltiness will keep them from eating more. Not a fan of this place.
This place should not be classified as a restaurant.  It is just a saloon, and no place to take respectable guests, unless they are heavy drinkers.  Found out the hard way.
I came here on a saturday night for a friends birthday dinner.  It was pretty crowded and it looked like most tables were occupied.  We sat on the top floor. the side salad bar is actually pretty decent.  everything looks fresh and there is plenty of selection.  the meats are carved in front of you.  watch out for flying juices.  the best cut i thought was the filet mignon.  everything else was ok.  oh and the grilled pineapple was also delicious.
I've had Brazilian BBQ in Brazil. So I guess I'm spoiled. The food here is very average. it's way too expensive. We sat at the lower level and got no service. Will not be back.
A meat lover's dream! If you don't like lamb, try it, this place just may convert you. The salad bar in the back has plenty of choices if you're not in the mood to order the all you can eat bbq. Don't skip the mouth watering pineapple between meat servings, you'll need the enzyme to help digest all the food (so I'm told). Would have given them 5 stars if the service was better. For some reason they stopped coming by and it wasn't near closing; yes, our table sign was on green for more servings. Just tried their happy hour for the first time and it's worth running to. Appetizers were half off. Ordered several and all were really good (calamari, sliders, ceviche, meatballs, etc.), plus live music & plenty of wine. HAPPY HOUR: M-F, 5-7pm. Located a few doors down from a parking structure so ample parking nearby.
I LOOOOOVE MEAT!!! came here in January ( i know i'm late on my review.. but truuuust.. i remember exactly how i felt about Pamaps.. ) to celebrate my parent's 20+something wedding anniversary.. my dad, my sister, and i are big MEAT eaters.. my mom's the oddball.. she doesnt like to chew as much as is necessary when it comes to eating steaks and such..... but she's amazing.. and chose Pampas for dinner!! we came on a saturday night.. around 830pm.. they weren't very packed.. but it wasn't empty either.. kinda hard to say because the place is VERY spacious.. (i can get claustrophobic so i can appreciate large spaces) it was just the right amount of people to get you excited to eat.. haha. it was my fam's first "all you can eat" kinda brazlilian steakhouse.. and we were pretty overwhelmed.. like i said.. 3/4 of us are big CARNIVORES.. but MAN.. there's only soo much meat one person SHOULD eat!! but i'm not complaining.. cuz the meats were delicious.. ( we also had the unlimited sidebar which was also YUMTASTIC.. esp the MUSHROOMS!! ) we sampled everything but the chicken hearts.. they never came around, but even if they did.. the thought of them didnt excite my tastebuds.. my fave meats that i'll admit i got 3-4 servings of was the "medalhao com alho" (tenderloin filet with garlic & herbs) and the "Fraldinha" (skirt steak).. soo tender!!!  ooh.. make sure you get the "abacaxi" (slow-roasted pineapple). it was JUICY and not all "fibery" as i like to call some fruits that dont just sink through your teeth and melt in your mouth.. you'll soon learn that i LOVE BACON.. so when i saw the "Peru" (turkey breast wrapped in smoked bacon) i was impatiently waiting for the server to come with it.. after about 30 minutes i just asked one of the servers if they could just bring some.. and within 10 minutes.. BAM.. too bad it wasnt as good as i made it up to be in my head.. the servers were great.. very attentive.. which i love.. the bread they give you at first.. GOOOOOD.. all in all.. i'd mosdef go again.. but next time.. i'll make sure i have a light lunch.. :)
We've eaten at Pampas twice.  The meat is excellent and the service very good.  We ordered a side of fried calamari and found it to be good but not excellent.  We found the same to be true with the salad bar. After continuing to eat and being brought the food, we found that any coffee and desert were served immediately and bill brought.  I know they have 2 seatings on Saturday night, and it seems that if you are at the first seating at 6, then you need to plan that you'll need to leave by 8. A carnavors dream, but somewhat presented with a cadence.
Came here for a wedding and the meat was pretty good.  Certain cuts were better than others.  The spicy chicken was the best flavored and tasting while the pork loin was extremely dry and bland.  Everything else was in between. The self-help sides were okay. Men's restroom was flooded that night with about an inch of water.
Been here like 5x already. My husband and I are huge fans. We've been to a couple of Brazilian restaurants back in LA and none of it can compare to the quality of meat they serve here. To top it all off, they have great selection of side dishes and the place is really nice and clean. Servers are great too! We just love this place overall. The ambiance and great food makes this a perfect place.
Interesting place.  Yes, the food is delicious, meat is of great quality but its obviously not a great choice for someone who isn't a HUGE carnivore.  I eat meat regularly but not enough to want to have a meal based around all different sorts of meat.  I came here because I know my BF IS that way, loves meat.  period.  He said Pampas is his new favorite restaurant, I had some of the lamb and chicken, but enjoyed the salad bar more then anything. Servers were excellent, very attentive and asked us (or my BF) several times throughout our meal if he'd like another selection brought by again.  We were seated upstairs which felt kinda odd and secluded, not downstairs with all the hustle and bustle.  Cocktails are lovely. I do have to say that the hostess was awesome.  We had reservations but were about 20 min late, we showed up and our table had been given away (I expected this after having read reviews here, but BF was peeved)  We made another reservation that would be 2 hours away (WTF!)  Ok, fine, we'll go hang out at Stanford shopping center and buy crap we don't need.  About 45 min later, the hostess called us and told me she could fit us in in about 15 min if we could make it.  Hell yes we can make it, we hadn't eaten all day. It was very nice of her to give us a call and fit us in early, knowing she really didn't need to do that.  Thanks hostess lady!
Definitely a meat lovers dream! When you're first seated, you get an appetizer plate which consisted of cheese biscuits (my fav of them all), polenta, and one other thing I don't remember what it was. Such a wide variety of meats from chicken hearts, lamb, filet mignon, tri tip, etc. My personal favorite was filet mignon. There was 2 different seasonings to choose from: garlic and parmesan. You can easily fill up on the side bar so it was definitely hard to limit myself. The side bar consists of salad, salmon, all sorts of vegetables, pasta, etc. Our server was really friendly. As well as the rest of the staff. $50 a person so it's pretty pricey so make sure you come hungry!
My first experience at a Brazilian Steakhouse and it was a great! Wanted to bring the boyfriend here since he is a huge fan of meat and a big eater so we both got the all you can eat rodizio. The experience was great, it's somewhat on the fancier side so you just gotta stuff your face in an elegant manner :) The service was friendly, constantly coming around with the different types of meat and you can always ask your server for a specific kind to come around. Some of my favorites were the chicken hearts, filet Mignon, top sirloin, lamb, and the sausages. Those were the most juicy, fresh, medium rare cooked meat.  We also got the house red Cabernet to drink and it went very well with the meats.The other meats were kind of so-so, the chicken stuff was kind of dry We were a little excited in the beginning and kept saying yes to everything as they were coming around and had a nice little stack of meat on our plate, but the meat gets pretty dry and not as good when you leave it there for a while. So take your time and flip the card to the red side so you can enjoy each meat one at a time! The salad bar was also delicious, lots of different veggies, cheese, salmon carpaccio and salads to compliment your meat. They also give you an appetizer plate and the cheese biscuit and fried banana on there was delicious! Oh don't forget to try the super juicy fresh grilled pineapple! I'm normally not a fan of pineapple but yelpers weren't lying when they said its good!
I can already tell you I'm going to have to write ANOTHER review next week about how much I love this place. I will start by saying I had lunch here yesterday and I just made reservations for our GIRLS NITE OUT dinner this Saturday night!  It's on! Holy GOODNESS!  Ambiance is pure excellence.  I felt underdressed when I entered during my lunch hour and I was wearing a dress and sandals (no make up though), hah!  It's beautiful inside and if you do come here for lunch hour it will be a struggle not to want a cocktail at their long and inviting bar facing the front of the restaurant lined with tall windows letting in the natural light. It's a tri-level design and I was reveling at the decor my during my entire visit... well... when I wasn't wiping the drool from the corner of my mouth from the aroma of the CRAZY ACE platter of MEATY GOODNESS on the family-style plate in front of me. "Help yourself to the buffet"  says the waiter after he dropped off a sweet little plate of Brazilian cheesy bread, polenta cakes, and FRIED BANANAS!!! Even though I thought it was silly for me to even look at some "Buffet" after I ordered Ceviche and a Family Style Meat Platter - I went WOW!  I made myself a gorgeous salad with fresh mixed greens, carrot slivers, hearts of palm, grilled peppers of all colors, grilled zucchini, and topped it all with some Banana Vinaigrette!  OMG I was seriously in heaven.  Baked pears...  Holy Crap So yummy! Looking forward to their dinner experience now... Stoked!
Pampas is a very nice Brazilian Steakhouse. If you are a meat lover and you like all you can eat quality food, I highly recommend. I've had dinner here a few times and for a fixed price you can get the all you can eat selection of meats and the side bar (which has hot and cold options). I really like the cuts of meat -- the fillet Mignon and the bacon wrapped chicken are really good. You are going to have to pace yourself because they keep on coming around to bring you the different meat selections. they also have tasty bread with cheese inside, very yummy. You should have a light lunch if you are going to dinner as there is plenty of good food. They also have an ample selection of wines that you can pair with your dinner. The staff has always been very helpful and friendly -- coming by to see if you need anything. This is a nice restaurant to go on a special occasion. The ambiance is very relaxing, not too loud, making a good place to talk an interact with your date.
Be ready to eat lots of meat - and a pay a few bucks. If you have not gone to a Brazilian BBQ place before, they basically walk around with a chunk of meat and ask if you want another piece.   This place is all-you-can-eat. I think a dinner here would cost about ~$60.   The food is delicious.   I'm generally a meat-lover, so this place appeals to me. Note that the Happy Hours here is very good too and is definitely worth the money.  You can order the entire bar menu for half off.
I took my boyfriend here and he was in heaven: all you can eat steak buffet! He especially likes the different cuts of meat and the fact that they don't all taste the same. The filet with parmesan is the best (IMO). A bit pricy for a girl who can't eat that much, but the quality is definitely there.
I think i have to give this 5 stars! I absolutely loved, loved, loved it. Granted, I've only been there once, but had cuzn not told us about this place, I would have never known! Now, i love Espetus but Pampas was really inviting.. Great Atmosphere, Beautiful Decor and Great entertainment. The salad bar had a ton of selections. The service was friendly, right on top of things, they just keep comin and comin. You just have to try it all, its so delish! We had a great first time expierence. Thank you - Thank you!. All i can end this with is FOOD COMA.  I think i ate so much it hurt walking out.  but I'd do it all over again. LoL.
I've eaten at a few Brazilian places before and while I generally like it, it's usually not worth the money for me, because I can fill up on one plate. However, Pampas has a different, more classy feel to it than other Brazilian steakhouses. It's not a ginormous place, so it feels more intimate. Service was really great there, last Saturday night. We had a 9pm reservation and didn't leave until well after they were closed, but they didn't rush us at all. The meats they offered were fantastic. They even had roasted pineapple, which was new for me. Delicious! The bar service was excellent as well. Overall, this was a great experience! However, I do agree with other reviewers in that, it's pricey and in order to make it worth the money, fast as far ahead as you can! But for meat lovers everywhere, this is the ticket! Any kind of meat you can imagine, they probably have it :). If you're looking for a place with excellent variety of meats, delicious quality and great service, but aren't afraid to pay for it, this is the place for you. Definitely a great place for celebration!
If you are a vegetarian, stay away from this place, but if you are a meat-lover, you would like it.  Steak, lamb, chicken, pork, sausage, and etc...you name it! Oh, don't miss the chicken heart and the grill pineapple!  They are delicious. Nice food, nice service, and nice decor.  Go there, keep the flip card green, stuff youself with all kind of meat, and enjoy it.
This place is awful for big parties.  If you are having a large party, do yourself a favor and go somewhere else.  They change the time on your reservation without asking, then push back the reservation even more so that your whole party will be waiting for 15-20 min (even though you called to confirm right days before).  Also, the meats are not as plentiful and the service is not as pleasant as it is in a smaller party on the ground floor because they know they charge mandatory gratuity. The worst was when the waiter asked me if I was the "leader" of the party and asked if I wanted to explain to everyone about the rodizio process - basically he wanted me to do his job for 26+ people.  Are you serious?  He was so lazy and rude.  When I asked him why the pineapple man keeps on going to the other tables when we've requested him multiple times, he couldn't really articulate a response or explanation or get the pineapple man to come right away.  He didn't really care whether anyone was having a good time.  His mission was to spend the least amount of time upstairs and get back downstairs since he was going to get his tip anyway.  He wasn't there for anything or take one photo for us.  The service has really changed since 2008.  I'm really disappointed. Also, they charge a "cake-cutting" fee even if you bring cupcakes.  LAME (they didn't even give us forks!).  I highly recommend avoiding Pampas for large parties.  Especially since you have this huge white beam separating the two tables in half so it makes it hard to talk to anyone since the tables are also too big across.  The set-up is bad and the service is worse. Details on the shady reservation process:  I made a reservation with Moritz on two and a half months before my big 3-0 birthday on April 3 for June 18 for 7:45p.  When I called a month before to confirm and increase the count from 20 to 28 ppl, I found out they had unilaterally changed the reservation from 7:45p to 8:15p to accommodate another large party but they didn't call me first or ask me about it.  Also, Moritz made the reservation in the claustrophobic dungeon room that is really dark downstairs even though I had specifically asked for upstairs.  Sanda increased the reservations to upstairs for 8:15p.  Days before the dinner and I called to confirm for 8:15p.  However, when we got there, the hostess said that the reservation was for 8:30p.  It was really irritating, especially since they had unilaterally changed the reservation already from 7:45p to 8:15p once before. It's no wonder this place is not as packed as before.  I hear the meat is better at Espetus.  Never again Pampas!  I'm over it!  This relationship is over!
This place is really nice and has great food and ambiance.  I want to come here again soon!  This is... Read more 
Meat, meat , meat ! Meat comma. I am sleepy right now after all the meat I consumed. I love their chicken hearts. I had three of those cuties! I ignored the chicken and pork meat since that's all that I cook. Instead I went for the  whole line of RED MEAT. Whoa! We got in during happy hour. No vino for me. I just want the food.  Meat with water was still all filling for my tummy! Dan B and I both agreed we like the Smoked Trout. It was perfectly smoked and not overpowering. The lamb was also great. Moist and tasty.  One item was dry-the Tri-Tip :( ( Dry Tip :) We also had a couple of their anchovies. The smoked peach was one of the standouts! Mental note to hang at the ground floor where all the vino actions are next time. Happy hour is from 5-7. The dining room on the second floor was above the bar area, You can hear happy people taking advantage of the happy hour :) Cozy leather seats for happy hour patrons and bean shaped chairs while you're waiting for your table. Parking was easy to find in front but there is a garage in the same block. The bar looks appealing...so I'll hit this spot again sometime soon.
I wish they had a bigger happy hour area.  It gets really crowded in there early!  Went there with a group for drinks and dinner.  Drinks were good and our table was ready shortly after our reservation time. If you go here, you must get the buffet.  About 10 - 12 meats come out on skewers throughout your meal and almost all are delicious.  LOVE the pineapple and thoroughly enjoyed the Top Sirloin, along with most others.  I didn't see as many interesting meats as I saw at Espetus in the city though...the only very different thing on the menu is the chicken hearts (only by request). The salad buffet is great, but don't fill up on it.  Love the variation in salads, plus some good cheeses, and yummy mashed potatoes.  The wine selection is good, but very pricey!  Drinks + $44 meal + wine = a pretty expensive night out, but the Rodizio experience is quite fun!
I took peoples advice and skipped the amazing looking salad bar, but did get a little cheese to compliment the wine we got.  The sirloin was by far the best, we had them cut some super rare stuff off and sear it.  The chicken was good. Even the chicken hearts were great. Thank you jenny for an amazing birthday feast!
Came here before heading out to Club Illusions. I love Brazilian and Argentinian style barbecue.  (I'm sure there is a difference but I'm too much of a gringa to know what it is.) The vibe here is simultaneously casual and classy--a hard mix to pull off, but they manage it with excellence. I had the prawns with olive oil.  I love olive oil on dishes and this was no exception. Jesse had the filet mignon and let me have a taste.  Really salty and magnificent.  Jesse, the boyfriend, who lived in Brazil for a while, showed me how Brazilians dip their food in farofa (sp?) which gives it an unsual taste--rather than make it saltier (it is already pretty salty) it kind of softens the taste.  It was different than I expected. Probably an acquired taste.  It was pretty good without it. The drinks were the real adventure. I had the Classic Caipirinha which was delicious.  It comes with lime and Brazilian cachaca. Jesse had the Beijo Muitos, which he told me means "Lots of Kisses" in Portuguese. A great date spot.
I was really excited to go to Pampas, but the experience was just okay.  Nice atmosphere, service was okay.  The food was just okay.  I've been to other Churrasscaria's.  I think what was missing here was the variety of meets.  For example, no shrimp, ribs.  I will give them point on their spicy chicken.  That was a nice surprise.  Also the hot food buffet, at other places, they usually have one or two side dishes like a piaya or pasta dish or something...I was happy to eat a taste of Brazil, but for the food and variety, I can only give it 3 stars!  :-(
Best Brazilian BBQ in Northern California, hands down.  They also have the best "salad bar" in town, although it is really more like a tapas bar. The only drawback to this restaurant is I think during busy hours, their meats tend to be inconsistent.  You often get things that are a bit overcooked, although the quality of the meat is still excellent. The ambiance is also great.  This is a perfect place for a more intimate dinner for 6-8 friends.  If you are looking for a classy place that won't break the bank, and you want to have food for both meat eaters and petite eaters, this is the place.  Highly recommended.
Been here tres times (twice for birthdays, once for Father's day) and loved it every time. Let me rephrase, I loved being there and eating, then hated myself while leaving... but only cause I felt like exploding!!! But it takes such godly self control to not consume all that tasty meat that comes to your table on sword like skewers. So if you are on a diet or watching your weight don't come any closer. Cause seriously, you'll want to eat! Talk about obesity in America. On to the food! RODIZIO + SIDE BAR =$44/person The side bar is AMAZING! So much delicious and unique dishes. I would say that if I EVER decide I want to "watch my weight" when I come here the side bar would be just fine. The meat, DELICIOUS! Some of the cuts of beef are a little salty so I like to eat it with pieces of fruit or vegetables from the salad bar. OH my FAVORITE is the roasted pear! It goes so well with any meat! And now the ambiance. Really great. I love the mood the interior design brings. Lucky me got to experience the restaurant on all three levels, so I could make some suggestions. If you go on a weekend there's a live band and it gets a bit noisy for my taste. If you would like a little (and I mean just a little) quieter sit up top, a little more quieter (the sound gets dampened) sit in the bottom area, and if you enjoy live music and don't mind talking a few decibels above library whispers have your meal on the entrance level. Service: Pretty good. Not the best, but good. FULL BAR: Love it! Love that it's right in front, perfect for waiting, if you do, and nice to just hang out and listen to music. + the bartenders are super nice! Just a couple of things. - I mentioned on my reservation that it was A's birthday this last time I went, and I had to tell the server two additional times. - I was charged for the dessert this time which they gave on the house last time. I would like a little more consistency in birthday service. - Parking is free and plentiful in the structure right past the restaurant. - And don't fear the chicken hearts.
Happy Hour Review: Pro's: Friendly bartenders, pretty drinks, and large appetizers that fill you up for cheap. Con's: Service can be slow especially on a Friday even at 5pm! The seating in the happy hour area is very limited, and when it's crowded I can't stand it. The food is just OK, I would highly recommend against the ceviche. The sampler platter and ribs are decent.
I know it's a Brazilian delicacy, but after seeing 80 little chicken hearts on a single skewer, I... Read more 
My sister, brother-in-law, and myself brought my parents here for a belated Anniversary dinner. There was some major preparation I did during the whole entire day. Basically everyone in our party fasted for the whole entire day. From my sister's prior experience she passed on the knowledge to all of us. I'm very glad she did. My sister made the reservations prior to even coming here. When we arrived here, the place was still pretty empty. They were just opening up for their dinner hour on a Sunday night.  Seating was not a problem at all. When our party of five was seated, our waiter was prompt and very attentive. This was actually my parents and including myself our first time here. My sister and her husband had to order for us. I was about to embark in the exploration of the Rodizio meal. Unlimited meats! The side bar was nicely prepared since we were one of the first ones in the restaurant. All the food was fresh. I can agree with everyone who has enjoyed the side bar here can be meal itself. I sampled almost everything on the Rodizio menu except the chicken hearts. I couldn't get that one scene out of my head in that movie "Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom." If you watched that movie, then you will know what I'm talking about. My personal favorites were the skirt steak and the tri-tip. The reason for the four stars is that the Frango I had was under cooked, but every other meat on the the menu was to my liking. I definitely would come back here again. Most importantly, made a memorable dinning experience for our parents Anniversary. Sure beats our regular tradition of Black Angus. My tips to you if you are coming here for your first time and maximizing your Rodizio experience: - The Rodizio maybe pricey for some, but well worth it for carnivore lovers (For a party of five, your looking a $250+ not including gratuity). - Fast for at least 24 hours or longer (depending on your preference) - Use carbs from the side bar at your desecration.
I came here for a friend's going-away during Pampas' happy hour, where the food is half off and drinks are $5. I tried quite a few items, the ribs, the mixed grill platter, the sliders, the meatballs, the tres leches cake and the white chocolate cheesecake. The ribs were very tender and heavily sauced, which I like. The sauce was a bit more vinegar-y than I would have liked though. The smell is so pungent, it kind of tickled my nose. The sliders were below par, not much juice or flavor, for that matter. And the toppings were unimaginative also. The lamb meatballs tasted like there's way too much filler, which messed with the texture and dimmed the taste of the finished product. The mixed grill platter really shined. There were grilled chicken legs, bacon wrapped chicken breast, two types of mini sauces, some sort of beef loin and turkey. None of the items were over cooked and were well seasoned. For dessert, I ordered the tres leches cake. It was very fluffy and spongey and with the fruit coulis on top, didn't taste much of the syrupy sweet tres leches that I've tried before. Definite plus in my book. Although I wish there was more of a condensed milk taste to the dish, but it was light and good. I also tried a bit of the cheesecake. It was rather dense and pretty nondescript. There was only one server for the entire lounge area and it took a while to get our orders in and food. Considering the conditions, she did an admirable job. Considering my mixed reaction to the food, I'm not sure if I would come back for dinner.
Oh Pampas, you're a place after my own heart, meat, meat, and more meat!  Sure they have a tasty salad bar to boot, but my fiancee and I came here for the meat. Our favorite surprisingly was the leg of lamb, the the crispy slices with some balsamic poured over it, mmmm!  The bacon wrapped turkey is a honorable mention too, so good! Service was also really good, the staff was very friendly and even went looking for the leg of lamb when we wanted another serving.  They were also really good about filling up our waters and swapping out our plates.  No complaints here!
this was our first time at a Brazilian steak house and I was disappointed.  We had a late night reservation and I felt  the only meat that came around was the meat they needed to get rid of.  We even asked for certain types of steaks which they said they would bring over but never came.   The meat that did come around was tasty but for the amount you pay for dinner I would think the service would be better.  I'm still waiting for our waitress to smile at least once. Agree with a few of the other postings..I really wanted to love this place.
What's not to love? Lots of perfectly cooked Brazilian BBQ. I came for a lunch buffet and everything was scrumptious. They start things off with a great assortment of bread. Go for the cheesy garlic rolls. Delicious. I could literally eat those all day. Before they bring out the assortment of proteins, you get the opportunity to check out their sidebar. It has everything you would ever want, from salads to fruit to side dishes like couscous and pasta salad to grilled vegetables and sauces. They also had smoked salmon, an assortment of cheeses, and olives. Seriously, this alone would make a great meal. And it's a buffet! Try a little bit of everything, and then come back for seconds on your favorites, if you have room. We got an assortment of proteins: rotisserie chicken, rack of lamb, pork chops, fillet mignon skewers. They were all beyond delicious. My favorite was surprisingly the rack of lamb, which was super tender and well-seasoned. For dessert, we were presented with the choice of either fruit sorbet or a chocolate torte served with caramel ice cream, creme fraiche sauce, bacon Brazil nut toffee, and smoked sea salt chocolate ice cream. I chose the later and it was REALLY good. Almost too much food though, as I couldn't finish it. They have a private seating area that can be reserved. It is located in the center of the restaurant, a few steps down from the ground level. It can seat up to 30 people and is located right by the sidebar for easy access to all the food. The space is great for a midsized party, but be warned that it is pretty dim, as it is surrounded by curtains and has "mood lighting."
I really cant say that I was impressed by Pampas. I've been here twice, once for lunch and then the second time for dinner. Both times I left feeling a little cheated. The restaurant itself is beautiful, the bar great... the food... so-so. I just cant justify paying 70ish a person for this dinner. They kept bringing around the same 3-4 cuts of meat. I wanted to try a little bit of everything so I waited and waited for something different to come out but no such luck. The one meat that I did really like and wanted seconds of was the chorizo, and they only brought it out once the entire 3 hours I was there. I really find that to be unacceptable. I'm sorry Pampas, for the prices you are charging...you really need provide better food and service.
I went here for dinner with my hubby because he looooves meat. I'm not a big meat fan. He had the Rodizio - of course and it was perfect. He loved it and was so full afterwards. I just had the fish of the day which was Mahi Mahi and it was really good. The Side Bar is "just" ok. Lots of veggies, mashed potatoes, cheese plate. If you're a meatlover GO THERE:) If not, you still can find something a la carte and then the side bar is only $12 extra (instead of alone $27). The service was very good and super friendly. They had a liveband that evening which was really cool. I liked the atmosphere!
food was delicious... Waiter = worst service ever. A group of 16, each one of us will contest he robbed us $300 but since we're civilized, just gave up and walked out livid. How are you going to straight up tell someone to tip you $100 - that obviously means that wasn't going toward the bill. All 16 of us will NEVER come back. You should apologize to us. I'm talking about the white guy with glasses. I'm really upset that I spent $150+ on dinner, and this is what we get... NOT a good way to treat anyone. Esp. a paying customers.
Reservation thru open table @ 730 for party of 7. Love their waiting area, its comfy and its cosy. Hostess is very nice offered to hang our coats. We were seated immediately and 3 different kinds of breads (2 baskets) were brought to our table as well. But, our waiter was slow. It was because there was party of 10+ a table away from us. $44 for the "Rodizio" (easy way to explain it is the all you can eat meat and salad bar). You can also order individual dishes, from their individual selection. The only thing I felt so so was their "Side Bar" that came with the Rodizio, orange wasn't very fresh, you can tell its been put out for awhile. Cheese was ok too. Extensive selection of wine list. Which is AWSOME! Dessert was amazing, Mango cream shorbet and Flan!! 4 Rodizio + 3 individual dish + bottle red wine (includes open charge) + 2 different desserts to share = 61.50/pp It was not bad for steakhouse. Will defenately come back.
Another place that I've had bookmarked for years.  Finally paid a visit for no particular reason. :) Though we expected some wait on a Friday night, we got seated right away.  The staff is very attentive and professional.  The rodizio choices were good.  I wouldn't say it's the best rodizio I've had, but it was definitely good.  My favorites were the picanha, medalhao com alho, maminha, and fraldinha.  Though I'm a red meat person, I found the peru (turkey wrapped in bacon) to be pretty tasty.  Steady flow of meat choices, though they started repeating pretty fast. They also bring a plate of appetizers with polenta, pao de queijo, and fried bananas (one item of each per person), and some tamarind sauce at the start.  I'm used to seeing the pao de queijo in the side bar (as I like to help myself multiple times), but they refill them when requested.  The side bar is nothing to write home about, but it's a decent supplement to the meal (though I wouldn't pay $27 for just the side bar). Overall, I loved the atmosphere.  Very relaxing dinner, great ambiance, good food.
So....much.....meat!  There aren't a lot of Brazilian BBQ restaurants in the Peninsula, so Pampas is your best bet if you're in the Palo Alto area. The meat is wonderfully seasoned, cooked on skewers, and carved tableside... and it keeps on coming! $44 will get you all you can eat meat (with many different cuts and types available) + unlimited access to the salad bar. Why only 3 stars? I came once for happy hour, and the service was downright awful. We ordered bar food and drinks in the lounge area while standing at the bar, and it took the bartender 1 hour (yes... ONE HOUR) to make our cocktails and even longer for the food to come. Summary: Good place for a nice dinner, but I'd skip the happy hour / lounge area (unless you want to wait around 1+ hours for your drink).
Came here for a work event.  We had a private room downstairs for about thirty people. Sadly we had a prefix menu instead of the all-you-can-eat but the food was still delicious! We had lamb meatballs, roasted beets and goats cheese bruschetta, and tuna tartare as our reception appetizers which were decent but nothing exceptional.  But the main event was Rib Eye Steak which was a meat lover's fantasy! It was tasty and juicy and HUGE (yes I realize this is starting to get dirty...). But if all the meat is like this for the all-you-can-eat I would definitely say it's worth it. We finished off the meal with chocolate torte and toffee ice cream which was great! Overall the food was a big success. The only (slight) downside was our server was a little snooty.  She snapped at one of the guests when he asked for coffee saying we had closed our tab and was generally pretty uptight. Overall though a good option for a private event! And after this delicious experience I am definitely excited to come back for the all you can eat MEAT!
I was disappointed when the green/red GO/stop buttons weren't real buttons but just a card u flip...But this place is an amazing place for Brazilian meat buffet. They come around to slice off meat for you until you tell them to stop. Plus, the salad bar is also super good! I kept getting scolded for eating too much from the salad bar but I couldn't help it! The grilled pineapple is AMAZING. Don't forget that.
My gfs and I used to go here a lot for happy hour. They serve nice drinks and their happy hour spread is quite nice (especially their bread plate!). With that said, their service has really gone downhill in recent months. They're typically understaffed and the servers who are present generally appear confused and like they don't care. The last few times we've been here, it's been a huge struggle to get our complete order of drinks and food. And it's not so much that the staff appears overwhelmed or stress...if anything, they look disinterested and kinda lazy. Not to sound like a self-entitled snob, but at these prices, we shouldn't have to beg 4 different people to get our drinks and food and walk over to the guy flashing our credit cards at us to close out our bill. Sorry Pampas, you've lost our business. We'll probably be giving it to Reposado down the street.
Date/Time:  Sunday - 7pm Occasion:  Birthday celebration Party of:  Five Ordered: Pan seared Maple leaf duck breast with coconut risotto.  Rest of the party ordered all you can eat Brazilian BBQ. Location:  Extremely spacious; love the look of the restaurant.  Nice area. Total incl gratuity: ~$60pp I think I've learned my lesson...I have learned that I cannot eat my money's worth at Brazilian BBQ places so this time around, I decided to go for an item off of the ala-carte menu.  I was fairly pleased with my choice.  The duck breast was extremely tender and rich.  The coconut risotto was very aromatic - a little overwhelming after a couple of bites.  It was good but I've found that risotto has always been a little too rich for my taste.  If you decide to go ala-carte, the duck would be a safe choice.  I nibbled a bit on various meats that went around the all-you-can group.  Nothing impressive with the exception of the parmesan filet mignon. Our server was extremely friendly!  She was pleasant however very pre-occupied.  There was a huge 20 person birthday party right next to us so much of her attention was tied to them.  I doubt that I would return; I prefer to stick with Espetus in SF....closer and probably a little more flavorful.
Amazing meat. The steaks were top quality, but what really impressed me was the chicken I had. Literally the best cooked chicken I have ever consumed. Fell off the bone, filled with flavor, none of the stickiness that poorly cooked chicken retains. The side bar was so-so, but I went there for meat and the excellent rodizio experience warrants a five star rating. Live music and a loud crowd made it a more lively experience than I was expecting. Not quite as romantic as I had hoped, but still a great atmosphere.
If you want mouth watering melt in your mouth meat, this is the place to be. Forget all the other steakhouses no one comes close to Pampas for the quality and the quantity of their meats. Defiantly order the all you can eat meat; the $44 meal is well worth every penny. Even if you order the entrees the portions and the quality of their meat is unbelievable. Make sure you make reservations because this place is popular. Service: A Food:  A Atmosphere: A
This review is ZERO stars for the service, three stars for food quality. I wanted to let everyone know and warn everyone about this restaurant: I just had the WORST dining service I have ever received from any mid to high-end restaurant that I have ever been to. There were five of us, and we wanted to just share a half bottle of wine, but because the server kept pushing us to get a full bottle, we accepted. (That by the way was an $84 per bottle wine instead of the $40 for half a bottle, and we still ended up with half a bottle left, despite the waiter's words that one bottle is barely enough for the five of us.) During dinner, I took three bites of my cousin's lamb entree (he ordered the unlimited meat selection for $44 per person), after which the server came over and accused me of violating a supposed "no food sharing policy," which is nowhere written either on the menu or anywhere visible in the restaurant. I informed him that I am not "cheating" the restaurant, since I did already order my own fish entree and only plan on trying another bite of the chicken that my cousin already got on his plate. Despite that, the server gave us dirty looks the entire dinner. The server then tried to make us pay for two additional entrees (which we did not order), and he slipped in a 20% gratuity on the total bill after adding tax. THERE WAS NO NOTIFICATION WHATSOEVER ON THE MENU ABOUT A 20% GRATUITY FOR A PARTY OF 5, 6 including my cousin's three-year-old. WTF! We paid them 15% and told them that they would just have to suck on that- they're lucky we even tipped at all, given the absolutely terrible service from the waiter and poor response from the manager. Other points for review: maitre d' gave us impatient looks when she saw that we are bringing a child to the restaurant. Our waiter gave us dirty looks all throughout dinner. The manager insisted that the "no food sharing with anyone policy" and the "20% gratuity for 6 people" are "mandatory," even though the restaurant failed to put either policy in writing on the menu or anywhere else to inform the customers. The fillet mignon was overdone and under-marinaded. The only decent food items were the lamb chops (which I only had two bites of). After writing this review, I got a rude reply from the waiter via Yelp disputing the facts that I stated, asking me to change this review to a more positive one, and stating that he is putting me on a blacklist. The last time I checked, CA law in fact does not "mandate" tips- tips are "by custom" 15% for "adequate" service, 10% for "poor service," and can be 0 if the customer is so unsatisfied that he/she needed to speak with the manager to resolve multiple issues. And any "mandatory" gratuity of 18% plus for groups of 6 or more should be clearly stated on the menu, which most mid and high-end restaurants that I have been to do. So honestly, since I do not plan on coming back anyway, I'm going to keep this review as frank as possible.
I really thought the half price apps and drinks from 5-7 was worth the uncomfortable seating in the bar area, but after tonight, I've changed my mind. The bar wasn't able to get a vodka tonic right....the bartender really didn't believe my guests saying it was soda water. But after scaring up some tonic after quite a wait, we were able to enjoy our drinks. However, there was some sketchy reserved event in the bar area that made me think it was an escort service for techies. It felt pretty weird for Palo Alto...more like Las Vegas.
I went for a corporate dinner. The food was excellent. The meats kept coming. The salad bar was fresh and varied. I have a couple of glasses of red wine. My only complaint is that I felt guilty for eat so much meat. I won't go here often, as I prefer to eat veggies. But it satisfied by meat fix for the year.
Came here with the boyfriend and his (super carnivorous) cousins and had an amazing dinner. They all opted for the all you can eat rodizio and I opted for the all you can eat sidebar (woo veggies, holla!).  There's a seriously crazy assortment of meats they bring and if I ate meat i'm sure I would have been in heaven.  And thankfully they had a great assortment of vegetarian sides and options that calmed my disgust for having chicken hearts, pork, and other animales brought on a carving stick to the table =\ Between the t-rexs on one side of the table to little old vegetarian me, we were all *stuffed* and happy. I'm knocking off one star for all of us being too full to hit the bars after, instead we went home and hit the sheets---boooo that
4.5! Ahh, there's nothing quite like celebrating Valentine's Day at a restaurant where servers parade in front of you with almost every type of meat that you'd like to eat. My bf made reservations for a Sun night at 8pm. The service was pretty good and responsive. At first, we got a table that was off-kilter and upon request they switched us to a more stable one. (They said it was old and they were buying a new table soon.) We both went for the full menu for Brazilian BBQ and hit up the side bar first. The side bar was very memorable... notably, the eggplant and other roasted vegetables. The flavor and marinade was sooo good. You could go all out on just the side bar! As for memorable meats, the leg of lamb with balsamic is a must try. I also enjoyed the rare sirloin tips too... I definitely had many, many servings of meat and it was just.... delicious.... thanks bf :)
I'm a HUGE fan of this place! Only have been there twice, but it really is as good as it gets! The buffet is beyond amazing, as fresh as it can get, and the meats are so amazing that i keep my card on green for more and more! Im not a big calorie watcher, so i just let it keep comin! The service is impeccable-they atmosphere is modern and classy. The noise level could go down a bit--but hey i guess we're all just enjoying great food and company. They even made it easy for my baby's stroller to fit next to the table where she wouldnt be bothered. Love this place! Thank you to the wonderful staff and wonderful people who cook behind the scenes!!!
My girl friend and I LOVE THIS PLACE. We love to go there for  lunch and during weekdays in the evening straight out of work. It's fun cz even if you are alone you could just sit with the bar. We always sit at the bar and the bartender is this really cute friendly guy. Food is good but  not that exciting. I like the service and the vibe of the place. Ceviche is a must-try. The  dry martinis are awesomely smooth and I love the bubbly cocktail. A fun place after work or for lunch with  a small drink on the side
Lunch review only. - Excellent quality meats - Great variety, very reasonable prices. - Service could be better but it's not bad. - The "bread basket" that comes for free is amongst the best I have had. The additional buffet with entree is a great value is you are super hungry but I usually avoid it. Basically you get excellent quality 5 star food at very modest prices in a great spacious ambiance.  That deserves 5 stars.
I've eaten at a few Brazilian steakhouses and this place definitely did not impress me. Some good things about it was the service was good, the atmosphere is nice and it would be a great place to bring a date but the food is horrible. I would compare their flavor to Sizzler because honestly their steak isn't good especially for the price you are paying. Their salad bar is horrible too, not a great selection, the only thing my wife enjoyed were the seasoned cucumbers. The pineapple was good too but seriously I didn't pay 100 dollars for grilled pineapple. If you want a good Brazilian steakhouse go to Espetus.
My friend and I came here for a late lunch yesterday. It was quite empty when we arrived which was perfect because we wouldn't have to whisper. When we were seated the server brought over a plate of some goodies to snack on while viewing the menu: 2 fried plantains -- yum, 2 cheese balls -- yum, and 2 fried polenta -- okay. Ordered: -- Sidebar -- I definitely recommend future customers to look at the sidebar and then make up your mind if you want it. My friend and I totally filled up on this. There is so many dishes to choose from. We definitely think this could be a meal on its own. My favorites were the cheeses, coconut sweet potato, mango salad, cucumber dill salad, and the beetroot salads were Amazing!! -- Filet Mignon Skewer (Switched for tri-tip) -- Delicious. The cilantro sauce was different than what I have tried before, but still delicious. I am not a rice fan, however, I definitely was not sad that they forgot to remove it (I asked them to). -Market Fish -- It was bass with a saffron sauce -- My friend filled up on the sidebar and was unable to eat much of her lunch. However, we did decide to indulge ourselves in desserts...I asked the waiter what he recommended he mentioned 2, and we ordered both. His favorite was the Tres Leches Cake -- which was moist, flavorful and simply out of this world. The passion fruit sauce helped balance the sweetness of the dessert. 2nd favorite was the Chocolate Torte -- My friend said it was delicious. It came with couple small pieces of Brazilian nut toffee that had bits of bacon in it, and was apparently really salty. There have a variety of the Tazo teas. My friend said their coffee was delicious. The waiter and servers were super friendly and prompt. They didn't shy away from having a conversation probably because they weren't busy. It was nice for a change.
This review is ONLY for their Happy Hour. We were a rather large group gathering for a friends birthday and I could not be happier with the food, drinks and service.   Coctails for $5 and half off the lounge menu is a fantastic deal. SERVICE: I wish I would have gotten our waitresses name because she was wonderful.  She brought us out 3 plates of fried awesomeness and when we asked who ordered them she said she did!  She also split up the check for everyone and would print out receipts for those who had to leave early.  This was VERY VERY helpful of her! Drinks:  The Classic Caipirinha was the favorite of the group but I also had the spicy Cosmo do diablo and it was my favorite. Food:  The fried Yucca fries were awesome.  Crispy outside and super soft inside.  The cheese plate was also a hit.  The fried bananas and cheese bread was also very good. In all 5 stars for sure.  Great drinks, food and excellent service.  Thanks Pampas for putting up with 12 scientists for a few hours :) **Also they sometimes  have great live Jazz music!**
Good, not fantastic, Brazilian BBQ. The meat was definitely solid, though the menu seemed heavy on lamb and I wouldn't say the flavoring was the best I've ever had.  The salad bar is cool, but nothing to write home about.  Pretty pricey considering the other B-BBQ spots out there.  Interior is chic and modern.  While not the best in existence, it's still hard to rate a solid Brazilian BBQ joint anything less than a 4.  A great meal by any measure. I'd still say Texas De Brazil was the most epic churrascaria I've been to, with their stupendous salad bars and the 30ft wine cellar with trapeze artists floating around.  The bay can use some competition, hopefully a third bbq spot opens soon.
Great Brazilian BBQ offerings, as good as the ones I had in Sao Paulo Brazil. Not cheap, but food quality / service / ambiance are worth the price tag. Be careful not to eat too fast though...pace yourself and save some space in your stomach for the variety of meat that'll come later
The service was great, atmosphere was nice with all types of folks, young to old but the meat was a-ok. Check it out, the waiter explained how it all worked and we decided to go for the all you can eat meat and which includes the foodbar (btw, they have a strict no sharing policy). The food bar had a good selection from noodles, roasted veggies, rice w/ black beans to cheeses, salads, fruits. You get what you want and come back to your table. They have a flip card, when you're ready for the meat you flip the card to the green color. The staff will stop by and offer different types of meat. The portions are small but they come by so often that you fill up quickly. When you do, you flip the card over to red and the skip your table until you're ready to gorge yourself again. The bar food tasted fine we were just disappointed with the meats, which is really the star of the show/restaurant. The majority was overcooked/chewy and way under seasoned. They offered probably 8 different types of meat selections and I only really  enjoyed two. The skirt steak was the only piece of meat that was cooked correctly, soft and tasty and the spicy chicken piece was pretty tasty as well. Dessert was good, we ordered the Acai berry crisp with vanilla ice cream.That was tart but tasty. Overall, the hubby may go back..I will probably go back and just try something off the regular menu.
I have only been here for happy hour (M-F 5pm-7pm) but it is a good one! I love their $5 cocktails, the beijo muitos being my favorite and the mango caipirinha as a close second. The ribs are super tender and the mini burgers were super tasty as well. I would also recommend trying the poblano pepper. While the decor and most of the clientele is rather "upscale", my friend happened to walk in dressed in dark sweatpants and even that was totally fine. Will be doing more happy hour here in the future for sure!
I really have no complaints about this place (other than PARKING).  Be sure to make reservations because this place can get busy and once you try it you will see why - the food here is amazing!  It is really a fun and great place to eat.  If you have ever eaten at a Brazilian steakhouse, you will love this place.  The food is better than others and the ambiance is nice.  At least on weekends, they usually have a live band playing nice music near the front window/door so you can hear them when you walk in and see them from outside. Although parts of the restaurant are a bit noisy, there is ample seating and quit a selection of different seating - it doesn't hurt to check the place out ahead of time so you can reserve where you would like to sit as well. Pampas is in downtime Palo Alto right off the main strip (University), so you don't have to travel far to find it.  Unfortunately, the parking can be a challenge because this area gets really quite busy at night with people going out to dinner or shopping, so be sure you give yourself enough time to find some parking nearby, but as for the restaurant itself, wonderful (both the staff that work here and the food)!
We liked the atmosphere and we were seated promptly at our reserved time. All meats and pineapple are delicious! Side bar is good for those who don't love meats so much. Appetizers were below expectations. The cheese breads and fried bananas were barely warm. Services and appetizers are 3 stars but the meats make it up to 4 stars.
Great ambiance & service - 4 stars. We did the all you can eat table-side steaks - Rodizio. It was good - however I wasn't blown away, but I am giving it 4 stars because I think others will like it. It just turns out I am not into 8 different kinds of meat - I had rather have a single piece of nicely done steak and a glass of wine, but I think that's just me. They do a nice job of presentation, the salad/side bar is nicely done, the service is friendly and the decor is great. I think it is nice place for a date or corporate event, however, they also have a good kids menu. The bar seemed nice and inviting (didn't sit at the bar). Overall - worth a shot.
It's such a shame to see good meat go to waste. I've had proper Brazilian barbecue with Brazilians and it is the most flavorful, tender thing in the world. If you go here, I'd stick to the much more reasonable side bar buffet, which had some good items, and avoid the all-you-can-eat barbecue. Especially given the price, it's totally not worth it. - Flank steak tasted mostly of iron and blood, extremely chewy. - Filet mignon was bland. - Currizo was dry and gummy. - Skirt steak was good the first time I had it, so I had more; second time it had an off flavor, like it had been sitting in something it shouldn't have. - Lamb was overcooked, dry and muttony. No other discernible flavor. - I almost choken on the pork loin it was so dry. Like eating cardboard. - Chicken similarly dried and charred to the point of being inedible for both cuts. - Tritip, woah, I almost gagged it was so bad. Such a shame because great tritip is what turned me on to Brazilian barbecue. This place is a waste of meat and a disrespect to the animals that died. Oh, and did I mention the wait service was slow and spotty too? Bottom line: buy a tritip or whatever you fancy, marinate for two days, and put it on the grill with your friends, then drink beer and watch it slowly become delicious over the course of an afternoon. Chimicurri sauce is just cilantro, garlic, and vinegar, so you can make that too and have the full-on Brazilian experience at home for one third the price and way more of the flavor.
S.Heart snagged the perfect reservation time here for Valentine's Day.  What luck!  I've never had Brazilian food prior to tonight.  We got Rodizio + side bar....you'd be silly not to.  My first experience was absolutely wonderful.  The various meats were wonderful.  They each had a different texture and flavor from the other. Skirt steak was my favorite.  The fresh and flavorful veggies are a great complement to all that meat.
For the meat lover in you!! My favorite is the skirt steak, the salad bar is quite nice too.
This is the 3rd time I've had Pampas. Headsup: I don't ever order anything on the menu. I'm serious. I go the route of the all you can eat. Why come all the way to high society and eat like peasants? Granted hole in the wall is freakin unbelievable compared to main stream but this place is for the elite. What better way to enjoy the evening then have waiters and waitresses bring meat to your table for you to sample and indulge. This place rocks! Word of advice: Don't bother with the downstairs veggie bar. Sure there's Gelsons version of sweet tomatoes and stuff you don't recognize. But again, you're paying $44 a head. And if you've got Korean BBQ coursing through your arteries, then you're here for the Creme Filling. Chicken Hearts, Skirt Steak, and Pineapple. Always make reservations.
We came here to celebrate our wedding anniversary and this place rocks. We ordered the Rodizio ( all you can eat ) menu and we tried ALL the meat and just about everything on the 'side bar'. Even though we are not big meat eater, we found lots of side dishes and the meats were cooked perfectly. If you like tender meat, stick with filet mignon, skirt steak and lamp chop. I am sure that I get my money back just on the amount of filet and lamb I eat. Great place to have a small to medium size party also. Don't forget to make reservation. I came here on a typical slow Monday and this place is full. I will definitely come back soon.
Terrible! Short version: - terrible service - served us cold food (..hard, dried-tofu like polenta?!) - had to constantly ask to refill water - difficult to flag down waiter - made us wait for a while, but didn't update us (didn't know if the waiter had forgotten or what..) - waiters started cleaning around us and started talking LOUDLY in Spanish.. - when boxing our four leftover foods, they dumped three of them in the same, tiny box!!! (Who DOES that?!) - completely ignored when we left the restaurant (by 3-4 people that were still working up front...) I was incredibly unhappy with the level of service at Pampas. Long version: To start with the food, our a la carte entrees and appetizers were delicious, but the initial complimentary appetizers that they served us, which were our first impressions of the place's food left much to be desired. All of the three appetizers (fried banana, cheese bread, and rosemary polenta) were cold, which wouldn't have been a huge problem had the polenta not been the consistency and texture of dried tofu. I literally was so confused while eating it, wondering what Pampas's definition of polenta was.  Later on in the night, the polenta they served us was hot and actually had the consistency of polenta, but they never should have served us the hard, dried tofu-like polenta to begin with. Now onto service: The first thing that matters to me a lot is my water glass. If my water glass always has water in it, the place wins points with me. I drink a lot of water when I eat, and it's nice to be able to eat without having to wait to flag down a waiter to ask for water. If you're charging me an extravagant amount of money for food, I expect my water glass to never be empty. It shows that the waiters are actually being attentive to your table and your needs. Needless to say, my water glass was empty too many times at Pampas. To add to that, it was fairly difficult to flag down a waiter to ask for more water, or for anything else, which also took away from our experience there. My party would be looking around for 5 minutes trying to find someone to help us, not to mention one time when we did ask for more of something, we had to ask another waiter as well because of how long it was taking. If the wait was because they were cooking more of it, then at least let us know, as most restaurants would say something and apologize for the wait instead of leaving us hanging and not knowing whether the waiter had just forgotten or not. My party had gotten to Pampas late in the night, fairly close to when it was closing, but the manager assured us it was fine and we could get a table. The service was good at the beginning of our experience there, but continued to decline steadily. Granted, it was late, but that's not an excuse to have such terrible customer service. Since it was the end of the night, the waiters started to clean up and set up the tables around us, putting out plates and glasses, etc. I can understand that. But what I can't understand was when the two waiters were setting up a table right next to us, and started talking loudly (LOUDLY, I say) in Spanish. We were still there for heaven's sake! It was so incredibly rude.. Not only that, but when I /had the nerve/ to ask for more water (I had to ask! isn't that enough?), our waiter reluctantly said he'd bring some. The final straw for me was when we asked for our leftover food to be boxed. There were four different foods: fried bananas, a pork chop, pork rib, and lamb meatballs. The waiter brought back a paper bag with boxes inside, and, anxious, I looked inside: there were only two boxes, one small one and one large one. The man had dumped three separate, very different types of foods into the same, tiny box! It was absolutely abhorrent, the cherry on a terrible-service sundae. To top off our terrible experience even more, when we walked out of the restaurant, instead of the usual greeting of thanking us for dining there, we were completely ignored by the 3-4 people working up front. If I had something good to say about Pampas it would be that the place had, for the most part, amazing food, which was cooked perfectly...BUT the service was horrendous, especially for how much we were paying. You can find just as good food at other places with much, much better service, so go somewhere else instead!
Pampas = 5 star buffet! I set up a event for 45 people in their basement style room, which is pretty cool with small windows giving you a view of the upstairs/main floor. Food: 5stars We had the "sidebar" and rodizio for most of the people, there were a couple of vegetarian people and they actually have 80% of their side bar is veg friendly and were able to make some veg entrees which worked out pretty good. Meat is wild, round after round, doesn't stop till you pass out! Price: $$$$ The place is pricey for private events but everyone had an awesome time so I cant really complain. Tip: park in the Palo Alto public garage about 1/2 block down the street.
Basically I all have to say is, SKIP & go to Fogo de Chao or any other steak place.  The place was expensive & the meat was not good quality...every piece I got had to be spit out because it was completely fatty & revolting.  I will never go back & I really wanted to love this place because I love this style of restaurant.
Food 4 stars, 1 star for the bar. We get there half an hour before the happy hour for the bar closes. I'm trying to get over there to the bar to order drinks. I ordered 3 drinks, and then was charged over 30 dollars. I asked them what about the happy hour weren't there specials? The guy said that there was only specific drinks on that menu, so I could look at that and then order. I already spent a lot on drinks and a long time waiting so i look over the menu and decide to go back to the table briefly to see if our waiter could get me one instead of flagging down the bartender again(2 of them were taking their sweet time by the way..) so i order my drink off the specials menu from the waiter, and i said ok so this will go towards the happy hour right? then he says, no only from the bar. So i'm like, okay nevermind. I go to the bar and wait again, so they run out of clean glasses and there is about 5 minutes left for happy hour. I'm like, ok....this is ridiculous. Luckily we ordered our drinks "in time" and got them for 5 bucks each. The drink wasn't good at all. What made it even worse was that when I get back to the table, there was another drink sitting there. I couldn't find our waiter and when i did i ask him, what is this drink? He's like, its the drink you ordered...i'm like i never ordered this i just asked you about it...remember? so he takes it back, and i'm like...irritated by this point. We got the all you can eat meat option, with the unlimited salad bar. The meats came out quick and there were about 10 different ones, which was good. The meat wasn't salty, a plus! I liked the bar area with all the different items, that was really good too! The coconut cous cous was delish. The only problem was they wouldn't bring out filet mignon, only once and there were 3 of us and 2 pieces left. we had to keep asking them to bring the filet mignon, finally they did. Maybe if they had a special deal i would come back here, or special occasion.
A Carnivore's Heaven!!! Usually, an all you can eat buffet style restauraunt in the bay area = substandard food and indigestion. However, Pampas is truly an exception!! I made a reservation for V-Day dinner. Upon arriving, we were warmly greeted by the hostess and sat. Our waiter came by and explained to us how the Rodizio w/ side bar worked (you go to the side bar and pick up unlimited amount of food while servers come around to your table and serve unlimited amount of meat.) The side bar alone is sufficient enough to satiate anyone's appetite. There were so many different foods and everything I plopped onto my plate tasted great!! The Veggies and mashed potatoes were perfect! But on to the real reason I selected this place: ALL YOU CAN EAT MEAT! My hunny has a huge appetite. Even after 3 1/2 years together, I am continually amazed at how much he can eat, meanwhile; he doesn't gain a pound. I know right, you just want to give him and his amazing metabolism a swift kick in the balls, just kidding. The meat was perfectly marinated/seasoned and TENDER! And the guys who come to your table and serve you the meat came around often, so there wasn't any waiting for more meat. SOOOOO WORTH IT!
Due to my limited experience with churrascarias (only other one I've been to is Espetus) I will keep this brief. The meat is fantastically inconsistent.  I was hooked on the skirt steak, but some of the pieces they brought out you could beat people to death with they were so RUBBERY! That's probably my only rant.  The selection is pretty decent and the caipirinha is solid.  Value-wise this place is winning because it's approximately 10-15 less than Espetus. Come hungry, leave comatic.
We went there on a Friday evening and were able to get reservations for 7pm, even though we called that Fri morning. We split up evenly in that the men in the party signed up for the rodizio, all the meat you can eat plus side bar, wile the women picked entrees plus the side bar. The attraction of this place is really the rodizio.  The reviews from the men on the meat was that is was tender and flavorful.  The servers came by constantly with the different cust of meat and more meat was consumed in a single sitting than I thought was possible.  Some very happy but somewat comatose men at the end of the meal! The fish of the day was good but not superb.  I wouldn't go back to the restaurant just for the fish. The side bar has a lot of variety and is a whole meal in itself.  You could easily have just the side bar and have a full meal with hot and cold options, salads, proteins, vegetables, fruits. We ended the meal with the chocolate torte dessert.  Again, it was good, but not superb.  Also, I thought the portion was a little small.  They should also have included more sauce becauce it was very flavorful but just drizzled lightly on the plate around the dessert and so you only got tiny tantalizing little tastes of it.  Should have drizzled it OVER the dessert of even provided a little cup of it for dipping.  Again, I wouldn't come just for the desserts. All in all, the format with the all you can side bar and rodizio is great and made for some very happy diners.  Will definitely be returning for that.  Make sure you eat a light lunch so you can do it justice! Parking is a pain, however.  We got lucky and found street parking just a block away but our friends circled for 20 min and eventually found street parking 6-7 blocks away.  there's a parking garage next door but it was full at 7pm on Fri evening.  Didn't see an option to do valet parking, but if you're planning to go, definitely ask if they have suggestions on where to park. Only other comment I'll make is that the lighting was odd.  We were seated in the upstairs mezzanine-like level and it's very lit up with almost white light.  I would have expected slightly dimmer lighting with maybe darker red color seating to create a warmer experience.  All in all, it didn't feel at all like a romantic place to take a date, more like a group dinner with friends.
My husband and I had our date night here, it was divine!  Having not been in there since it was "Q's" like 10 years ago it was kind of a trip to go back in; a bit of a trip down memory lane, but it is definately a different scene. Too bad we were so stuffed we didn't get a chance to try everything! The skirt steak and chicken were my favorites! My husband being swedish really liked the smoked trout in the buffet bar in the back. Very nice venue, good food...only complaint is that there was too much lamb going around, we no likey lamb...
Walking into Pampas at 5:30pm on a Thursday night, we were told by the hostess that the earliest they could seat the two of us was about 8pm. Just as we turned around to leave, a second hostess said she could seat us now as long as we were done by 7pm. Done deal!! The front of the restaurant has a bar and some couches and there were quite a number of people having after-work drinks but the dining areas (3 split levels) were still empty. Have to give it to them..decor is really nice and trendy. We were offered a menu once seated - there's Rodizio (all-you-can-eat Brazillian BBQ for $44/person + tax) or you a la carte meals. We came here for the sole purpose of trying the Rodizio so once we ordered,  our waiter told us to help ourselves with the salad bar and that the servers would be coming around with various meats. There was a good variety of items at the salad bar but only a couple that we liked. Having tried a few different Brazillian BBQ restaurants before, Pampas didn't quite match up, unfortunately. First of all, the meat servers didn't come out for a long time after we'd gotten our sides and finished them. And when they finally came out, the meats were either dry & tough, overly-salty, bland or tasted weird. There was a small bowl of "tangy sauce" on our table that the waiter said goes great with the meats but it just tasted strange. And if meat is seasoned well, it shouldn't require "sauce". The only meats I thought were good were the sirloin and lamb chops. But what IS great is the grilled pineapple! That was the best thing of the night!! Super sweet and warm....deeeelish!! Overall, service and decor is great but I don't know if I would come back because the food just wasn't worth it. I'd rather pay a little more for Espetus in San Mateo.
Our party of 3 ate here 7/31/2011, and enjoyed it tremendously.  Since we had never eaten here (or at other similar Brazilian steakhouses) we all elected to try the Rodizio. This is a different style of food preparation and presentation. First, the server brings a plate of little fried thingies, just as most restaurants bring a bowl of bread with butter and/or oil. The square thingies were a slightly spicy cornbread; the round puffy thingies seemed to be in the popover family; and the sausage-shaped thingies seemed to be in the banana-fritter family. Then (again if you are doing Rodizio) the roasted-meat bearing men start coming by.  The night we were there, there were two lamb selections (leg of lamb & lamb chop); two pork  selections (pork loin and pork sausage) five beef selections (top sirloin; filet marinated two different ways; tri-tip; and skirt steak); bacon-wrapped turkey; chicken thighs seasoned two ways,  and pineapple. The men offer you a cut or a piece which you can accept or turn down. The side-selection bar is both familiar and unique.  The night we were there, the right-hand side was a conventional salad bar and the left-hand side was an array traditional Brazilian side dishes and composed salads  I should have counted, but I didn't.  I particularly liked the slightly  spicy fruit salad, a coconut couscous,  and really sour marinated cucumbers. I couldn't pick out a favorite of the roasted meats.  I wish I'd had more room for everything.  They were all delicious.  I like really rare beef and lamb and one of my dining companions prefers far more well-done -- the servers were able to meet both of our preferences depending on how carved. As other reviewers have mentioned, this isn't a low-cost dining option.  The base price for the Rodizio is $44 per person.  Our bill wasn't far off that as we only split a bottle of wine, no cocktails and no dessert (too full!). We will be back for special occasions.
I've been wanting to try Brazilian BBQ for quite some time. Pampas is my first churrascaria experience and I was not disappointed! The interior is beautiful---very modern. We came on a weekend so there was even a live band. The salad bar was nice. Everything was fresh and organic but I wouldn't pay $27 to eat that. We opted for the Rodizio ($44). It is a meat lover's paradise! Servers come around all night with endless skewers of meats. We also got a glass of Reisling and Sangria-Rio. The Sangria is very delicious! Can't even taste the alcohol! The best cut was Fraldinha (skirt steak). OMG. it was the best---most tender and juicy. I think I'd die and gone to heaven! My other favorite cuts are Picanha (top sirlon), Medalhao com alho (tenderloin filet w/ garlic and herbs), and Maminha (tri-tip). I LOVE the grilled pineapple! It is so refreshing to eat between meats. I normally don't eat it but it was so sweet and tender, I had 7-8 slices! Some of the others, I'd pass on. The leg of lamb and lamb chop was too gamey for my taste. You should definitely try a little of everything to first to see what you like. At $70 per person (w/ tax, a generous tip, and a drink), it is a splurge but an amazing dining experience. I can't wait till my next visit!
The short and sweet of it all. I will go there again and again and again. It was everything and more that I expected...
Pampas is yummy..and a good deal if you go for Happy Hour. Two of us spent about $45 for a few hours of good drinks & tasty Brazilian food. Definitely going back!
OMG, meat galore! I don't know why but meat served on large skewers and cut at the table sounded extremely appealing for me. I honestly had no idea what to expect, but I knew that I needed to try it! Who could resist an all-you-can-eat meal with endless amounts of meat carried to your table!? We made reservations that day so our dinner was at 9pm. Usually I would complain about having such a late dinner but it ended up being perfect. Around this time most parties were clearing out so my boyfriend and I were served freshly grilled meat and most of the attention was on us! We both got the Rodizio meal which includes all-you-can-eat of thirteen different types of meat and the side bar. My boyfriend and I thought we had this meal all figured out. We decided to eat minuscule servings from the side bar and focus on just eating meat! Even with this plan our tummies were filling up by the time we had tried all thirteen meats but we couldn't stop eating! All the meats were delicious and very flavorful! It was easy to identify the different flavors and all of them had their own unique flavors. My personal favorites were the top sirloin, spicy chicken, pork loin, and the skirt steak. The steaks all melted in your mouth and I think my eyes lit up after trying each one! If I had to choose one favorite it would have to be the skirt steak! I think I had like 4 servings of it! So delicious! From the side bar I would suggest the grilled zucchini, broccolini, and the smoked gouda! I love the ambiance of the restaurant! It's very modern and intimate. There is a dining area on a loft and a bar downstairs. When I arrived there was live jazzy music playing which made the setting even more fun! Also, the waitress and servers are always very accommodating. Our waitress made sure we tried all the different meats and asked us which ones we would like to have again. Everything about this place makes me want to go back again! Pampas is worth the price!
Brazilian Rodizo style grilled meat - all you can eat.  Also has a normal entree option. I had an entree and my friends had the all you can eat option.  Normally the churrascarias will have problems keeping the meat juicy and cooked medium rare as it cycles around because they have to return it to the kitchen to put it back on the heat. At Pampas they did not have this problem, it was all juicy and medium rare.  The skirt steak was the tasty-est thing I had!
This place is alittle pricey at about $45 (?) a head for the rodizio but it rocks. It's a place you take someone to to impress them with your cool dining choices. There are pickings for about half the price with a veggies and meat side bar but to get the full Brazilian affect, you need to have the men wandering around with racks of meat. And they are generous with the helpings (I've eaten here three times for dinner, (once for drinks even though I don't drink) and they really don't make a big fuss if you share the meats with your friend who might decide to spring for the cheaper side salad option but don't overdo it). It's all you can eat if you flip your card for them to keep offering you food. (Oh, and if you get greedy and can't eat all that's on your plate, they'll even give you a take out container. I am sooo cheap). if you like lamb and beef, this is your haven. The decor is oh so cool Palo Alto with exposed high ceiling beams and oh so cool bar right at the door with oh so cool lighting at night. The loungy area is small and again up front where the bar is. It got kinda crowded over the weekend with a dressier and varied age crowd. The wait staff is professional and efficient. And I remember live music.
Went there tonight with my friends for a Radizio style dinner. One obvious advice: be careful with the side bar, leave more room for the meat. Oh, the meat was fantastic. The waiters keep coming every couple of minutes offering you more meat until you surrender and raise a red flag. You need to have a good stamina to get through this. This is not going to be a light comfort dinner by any stretch. :) The establishment itself is very nice, cozy and on an upscale side. Would definitely recommend.
Amazing dining experience! The wait staff was diligent and kind. The food was delicious, everything truly did get better and better. I can't believe I ate so much food, I couldn't stop. ALL of the meats they served were cooked to perfection, juicy and flavorful. My favorite was the top sirloin. And not all salad bars and buffets are created equal, the food at the salad bar is super fresh and so amazing. I recommend the coconut couscous. Bottom line: You get what you pay for at Pampas.
As a 'pescetarian', one may say that I shouldn't be reviewing this place, as all they really have to offer is meat meat meat. I had the market fish (sea bass) which was cooked well and quite tasty. The low score though is for the waiter we had for the evening - white guy with glasses - what is your problem? Unfriendly, cold, unattentive...it took you three rounds to our table for me to get your attention for a drink I'd like to order. "Any questions?" and then would walk off. Our table theorized that you're either just trying to pay your way through medical school and apathy has taken over, or your girlfriend had just broken up with you. You also brought out a drink we didn't even order, and merely just asked if they had it? Hm.. As it was my brother's birthday, we had brought him a small cake and upon asking to bring it out later, they were kind enough to put a small candle in it but no plates or even a knife? Had to flag our waiter down again for this minor detail. Needless to say, none of us will return.
My wife and I had reservations this evening - an impromptu date night.  It was great!  I'm a steak lover, meaning everything needs to be perfect - the cut, how it's cooked, the wine etc.  Everything was perfect and the waiter's advice on the pinot we ordered was spot-on, it literally made the meal. Pampas is hands-down the best place in the valley to go for steak and ambiance.  Their bar is probably the most attractive in Palo Alto (my wife and I had a drink their before dinner).  And the food is killer.  The green beans were excellent, and the steak - OMG!  It was a perfect meal...seriously. Pampas rocks...it's as good as it gets!  We'll be back....
Celebrated the SBBF Brad C.'s birthday here. He's mentioned this spot a few times so I just asked him where he wanted to dine for his bday dindin and for a carnivore...this is the perfect restaurant to go to. This place is super chic and trendy. Love the design of the restaurant and the bar up front when you walk in is very loungey as well. Pampas is known for their All-You-Can-Eat Brazilian meat w/ the sidebar as well. Brad C. of course had to go for the all-you-can-eat...I on the other hand was not in a heavy meat eating mood so I ordered myself a delicious fish entree. Bread before meal: on the plate there were 3 different types of "bread" for you to munch on. My fave was the cheese fried bread, soooo yummy! Drinks: SBBF went with his usual gin & tonic, I went with the strong ass caipirinha. Had me buzzed for a good 15 min. during dinner, shoulda ordered another. Sidebar items: Once again, I did not add this to my entree for an extra $12, cuz I figured I better save room for dessert. But the SBBF did let me munch on some of his mozarella that he brought back from the bar. Really fresh and good. My entree: I literally ate everything off the plate, the fish was cooked to perfection. Flavor was amazing and the portion size was perfect, not too pretentious and not too overwhelming. Meat: Brad C. felt like he went overboard with the meat. Every time one of the waiters came over to cut off some meat, the SBBF's eyes were seriously looking like he was horny for some meat, and not my meat! Haha. He also cut a piece of some of the lamb and chicken that they served him for me to try. Extremely delicious!! Ssssssh! Not supposed to eat the meat unless you ordered it, but who gives an eff?! I'm asian, and that's the ghetto fab way of enjoying things for free. ;) Dessert: I had the tres leches w/ fruit which was super yum. And the SBBF had a complimentary dessert for his bday! Thank you Pampas! We had an amazing time and I'd definitely like to come back sometime soon!
the meat is very good, the ambience is nice. i like the salad bar as well. i sometimes get just that because i am not a big meat-eater. the desserts are also great!
FYI - The company that operates this restaurant filed for bankruptcy protection on Monday in San Jose.  However, it appears that the restaurant is still open, at least for now.  Hopefully it will successfully reorganize. http://blog.ch11cases.co...
I thought Pampas was really good.  It is definitely an experience and like other "experience" restaurants, it is the kind of place that I would visit less frequently than a typical restaurant. The meat was high quality and so were the accompanying cheeses, veggies, rice, etc... I have had lunch here too where I didn't eat the meat on a skewer, that was pretty amazing as well.
Fasting for a week beforehand is recommended. $44 for all-you-can-eat rodizio and sidebar truly makes it worth it if you have done so. What a beautiful restaurant, with such a great open upstairs area that easily accommodated our party of 25+. The executive chef came around to chat with all of us, and even shared a new tamarind sauce he had concocted -- which was delicious, by the way. What seemed like endless skewers of succulent meat came around our table over the course of 1.5 hours (they'll keep coming until you flip over your disk from green to red signaling: STOP!). I didn't even make it to the huge sidebar downstairs, although those who did raved about it. The basket of baked cheese bread and fried plantains and polenta were the only non-meat items I had, and I inhaled them because they were so good. If I had to limit my meat intake, I'd have to narrow it down from 14 to these 4 favorites: - lamb chop - linguica - pork tenderloin with spice dry rub - turkey breast wrapped in bacon (mmm.... bacon) I'm currently on a veggie diet, so please don't have a birthday party at Pampas for another month or so. Thanks! I'll be there for cocktails though. Man oh man, those are some strong caipirinhas.
Meat on a Stick..........God, you just have to love the simple things in life, and it doesn't get any simpler than barbecuing various cuts of meat, spiced and marinated in a true Brazilian style. Pampas does a great job of keeping this caveman cooking style alive. We all had the Rodizio which includes a smorgasbord of buffet items, Brazilian style. Gentlemen walk around the tables with swords of meat and give you as much as you want. The top 3 best choices of meat from our table were: 1. The Parmesan encrusted Filet Mignon 2. The Turkey wrapped w/ Bacon 3. The Skirt Steak Slices They also had a fantastic cold cucumber soup and a wonderful Chimi-Churi salad dressing. We had a spicy Malbec wine from the Mendoza Valley in Argentina which complemented the South American flavors. Tip: Don't eat breakfast or lunch, get nice and hungry because the meat never stops coming, and you do not want to stop. My only complaint was the "unkemptness" of the restrooms, that men's room was tore up. I believe a restaurant owner should know, if you own a Meat Buffet Restaurant where 50% to 60% of all the male customers are getting the "Meat Sweats" all night long, the restroom is going to get hammered on a nightly basis. You really should have the restrooms looked after on an hourly timetable. The food was so good, I'm not even going to dock them a star. Just Go.
Usually when I'm at a churrascaria, I tend to focus on the many different ways beef is prepared. This is also true at Pampas, but make sure you get your tongs on some of the pork loin, especially if you can get an outer piece with a nice crust. It's sweet and spicy and was my favorite meat of the night. The picanha is really good too, and if you end up there with hard-core churrascaria fan Bryan K., you can watch him down serving after serving after serving after serving of picanha (and basically anything else on the menu). For a skinny dude, that boy can eat! I normally ignore the salad/side bars at churrascaria's, because I'm there for the meat, but I've been trying to make my meals more balanced lately...if you know what I mean. Luckily, Pampas has a huge bar with an incredible variety of salads and side dishes to complement the meat. I even had two different kinds of roasted beets (red and golden). When was the last time YOU ate beets? For dessert, we got the chocolate torte, which was okay, but the little pieces of bacon Brazil nut brittle were pretty nice. Yeah, that's right...I said bacon brittle. You don't notice it at first, but after you get done eating the brittle, there's these little chunks of bacon left that you can savor before sending them down your esophagus for digestion. Overall, the meats were really good, and the service was attentive and on point. The only complaint would be that the beautiful swords of meat weren't coming around fast enough, but I'll chalk that up to it being the opening weekend, and I'm sure they'll work this out over time. At $44 for the all-you-can-eat rodizio and sidebar, it's a better value than Espetus in San Francisco and worth the extra money over what you'd pay at Cleo's in San Bruno. Why? The quality and selection of meat at Pampas is simply miles of ahead of both places. It's not quite in the same league as Fogo de Chao in L.A. or Churrascaria Plataforma in New York, but for the Bay Area, it's in a class by itself.
Here's a little background. On our 2nd date, my now-husband took me to a steakhouse, figuring he could suss out immediately if I was a strange California vegetarian...since East Coasters seem to think that most California's are only tofu-lovers. Imagine his glee when I quickly ordered up a medium Filet Mignon, and proceeded to tear it apart with my teeth, hands, feet...whatever was available. Fast foward 8 years. Pampas has been open a month. Of course we HAVE to go, like immediately. As two now-happily-married carnivores, whenever we go to places like this, we get all nostalgic like...'Awww remember when you thought I was a soy-loving vegetarian?' (Not that I have anything against vegetarians, I just would make a really horrible one!) So into Pampas we go with my mango-loving-soul-sister and a friend we haven't seen in a while. We got a huge table, went straight to the Rodizio on the menu. Found the side/salad bar, couldn't figure out which side to start on, to some sour-looking-lady's chagrin, ordered a couple of bottles of wine and that's basically all she wrote...or rather all we remember. Who knew there were so many types, cuts, marinades for meat?? Us, apparently. I think we tried all 14 options and if not all 14, then at least 12. Liked the funny little round cheesy bread though at first you smelled it thinking, what the heck is this?? We didn't bother with appetizers or much from the side bar, thanks to Yelpers saying to steer clear and just go straight for the...MEAT! Our waitress was really amazing, and so were the guys who came by all night long with their skewers, knives and our coveted meat. They were chatty and accommodating...when we asked about something they'd always bring it by the table the next chance they got. And the PINEAPPLE. Apparently, it's so popular that the little pineapple guy can go through 5 pinas in just one jaunt around the restaurant. One thing I'd love to see change is to give each diner their own red/green button...because when 2 of us were done, but 2 weren't...we felt so bad telling the crestfallen-meat-guys no no no....and then you end up with more on your plate that you can eat. If I could flash a big red button saying STOP, it'd be no questions asked. Overall though, a great experience, great value, fabulous venue...who knew that Q could clean up so nicely? It's hard to believe this is the same venue. Oh and for those wondering...we went at 7pm on a Saturday and there were a few young toddlers at tables with parents. The really cool thing is that the restaurant has these little fun orange DVD players, they will hand them out to help keep your kidlet occupied. The fab result for those of us without small +1/2's is that we didn't hear one crying or restless child our whole dinner. Perk! They also had a sweet live jazz band playing in the swanky lounge area on Saturday night, which set the mood for lots of wine, great conversation and some fabulous protein-packed meat.
$44/person for the "Rodizio" ( http://www.pampaspaloalt... ) all-you-can-eat. My favorites were the top sirloin, the filet mignon, the tri-tip and the skirt steak (even the chicken hearts!). Every other item was still pretty good, but started tasting salty after 1.5 pounds of meat gluttony. Oh so worth it though. And, this is without factoring in the appetizers, the quality open-bar salad items ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ) + grilled pineapple ftw, and dessert. Yep, everything was good, no complaints about the food as the stuffed belly can attest to. The caipirinhas were $9 and a bit sweet (albeit from a palate that prefers alcohols neat or -tonics), but strong. Also, they waived the $20 corkage fee for the bottles of wines, which would have cemented five stars. Lost one star only because they didn't think we'd stay over two and a half hours (we were expecting three hours, minimum)...as they "needed our table for the next party" (though they did offer free drinks at the bar to make up for it). However, our server Yvonne was great! This place is good for a getogether, like with friends that you haven't seen for a very long time. It is also good for a guys night out. The hostesses are attractive. The servers are all friendly. The place is on the fancy side. Combine all of that and it's a great place. Pricey for a meal ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ), but worth it. Bonus review: This Richmond Grove '02 Limited Release Cabernet ( http://static.px.yelp.co... ) was great. Made in southern Australia's famous Coonawarra region - the "best cabernets made in Australia" - it is smooth and aromatic, but not overpowering...I'd definitely go out of my way to get more. But it's not feasible, so recommend finding someone who's visiting Australia to bring a case back, yeah? Milestone: first ROTD, lol.
*** The 700th! Review!!! *** So for our anniversary, I succumbed and let my cavewoman ways out... Short of getting a club and wearing fur, I sinked my teeth into all the meaty glory that Pampas had to offer. Now being a huge Fogo de Chao and Rei do Gado fan, I was eagerly waiting a chance to hit up the newly opened Pampas... since now there is a Churrascaria semi-close by to home. The decor was modern sleek and slightly minimalistic. The split level seating maximized the warehouse space... however girl sitting on the ground floor should really keep their ankles crossed (don't pull a Britney!) so that the diners on the lower level won't get an eyeful along with meals. That's the only downside to the set up... We sat down, and got a basket of breaded goodies... including fried plantains. OMIGOD I LOVE FRIED PLANTAINS... I could eat that all day long... Once Sam gets his deep fryer I think that's what I'd cook... Fried polenta (not a fan... too dry and chewy. must leave room for meat!), and the cheese bread... too heavy, again. must leave room for meat. Now the meaty goodness... Picanha - Omigod... one of my favs... perfectly seasoned, I asked him to cut off of a freshly uncut one so one side had the seasoning and also it wasn't bleeding its juices down the spear... it was juicy and perfect and made my stomach very very happy... Maminha - Another favorite... I could eat this all day long... Lamb Leg - This cavewoman doesn't touch lamb. Nuff Said. Lamb Chops - Lamb chops are still part of the lamb. Again. Cavewoman no like lamb. Pork Tenderloin - The spicy one was good actually tasted kinda gamey for pork, the cheese one was horrid. I hid it in a bowl of gazpacho. Sirloin Filet - The garlic herb one again was divine... I could eat nuggets and nuggets of these... the cheese one was hidden in the chimichurri sauce. Roasted Chicken - Ran out of soups to hide it. Cut it up into little pieces and the server took my plate away. Spicy Chicken - Very very good... unfortunately it was at the end of my meal. :( Linguica - Hm... filler. Had a bite of it, plenty flavorful, but it was delicately placed on my "go away plate" Ham and pineapple - LOVED it... it was like a good Hawaiian pizza sans carbs! Turkey w/ Bacon - Okay... how can anything wrapped in bacon NOT be good? Hell you can roast a long lashed doe eyed Bambi in bacon and I'd be all over it. Skirt Steak - YUMMAY!!!!!! Everything that could be eaten on the raw side came out perfectly medium rare... juicy... bleeding. The white meat came out cooked, yet still juicy. WOW!!! Since on my opentable reservation I had commented that it was our anniversary, they gave us complimentary champagne... Ooh la la! Some refinement to the cavely carnivore ways!! (Yes I did use my fork and knife...) Our waiter was uber cool since I was totally missing the fruit bar that Rei do Gado has... and he managed to get the kitchen to slice me up a plate full of mangos!!! Not to mention I really really miss Rei Do Gado's grilled pork ribs... *sighs* Pampas did me proud for providing all that meaty goodness... Unfortunately they did charge me for the bread plates... and at a request of a refill of plantains, they charged me 18 total! YOWSERS!!! All in all... it was a lovely evening... and I walked out as lady like as I could... without being rolled up the stairs to the car.
K...EVERYONE sing along, "Plop Plop Fizz Fizz oh what a relief it is"  Do you remember that commercial..."I CAN'T BELIEVE I ATE THE WHOLE THING"  That's how I felt last night after leaving "Pampas"! Our very good friends Lynda and Skip treated us to dinner last night and it was truly a treat.  Pampas is the perfect venue to sit back, enjoy the plethora of meat, great company and good wine.  I haven't eaten this much in a long time. Initially I was a bit skeptical, because Rose does not eat beef or pork but with the abundant side bar and the excellent chicken and her main course of Halibut which she really enjoyed there were enough alternatives for her to really enjoy her meal. Bottom line...Pampas is like Todai but for meat eaters but a hell of a lot better!  We will definitely be back!!
The service here is incredible, however  I cannot say much about the pace of seating, but I would highly recommend to make a reservation. At $42 per person for the rodizo, I would say it is an expensive eat, however the variety of food they provide is really something. Favorites: The mango puree for the salad as well as the selection of creative salads infused with fruits as well as flavors not usually found on the american palette. The Tri-tip, is a MUST TRY, it falls right off the skewer and it simply melts in your mouth This place in general is filled with busy Palo Alto business men and women trying to impress clients. However it is obvious that their clients are impressed. The reason for the four stars is because of the price, however if you have the money and the appetite, I fully recommend Pampas Palo Alto
How can someone not like Brazilian steakhouses?  Well I guess if you're a vegetarian I could understand but for the meat lovers Pampas is a great selection.  We went here this past week with a very large group from work where we owned the upper part of the restaurant.  I didn't think the restaurant was going to be able to handle such a large group of us but it definitely worked.  It felt like we actually had the whole place to ourselves. My recommendation for any steakhouses like this is to not fill up on the salad bar as there is a lot of meat to consume.  Everything was very good and all of the meat had a good flavor. I noticed that they even had a third floor below where we were so this restaurant is pretty large and a good choice for any size party.
After hearing about this place from Michael C. for several months now, I finally got a chance to go hear when Akemi D. organized this for one of our company dinners. The place is clean, modern, and trendy enough for the young and wealthy, but it's fun enough for just about anyone. There really isn't too much to add that everyone else hasn't already said.  There are a bunch of different meats they bring out on very large skewers and they go around to each person offering the various meat types.  Some of the meats were a touch bland, but most were very tasty.  Some that stood out particular are: spicy sausage, spicy pork, leg of lamb, lamb chops, flank steak, sirloin, two types of chicken (one spicy and one with white wine), ham and pineapple....the list goes on.  And then there's the side dishes.  Be careful with those.  They look good and can fool you into becoming full before the meat arrives. There's also a disc like a hockey puck on your table with one siide red and the other green.  when red is facing up, it means stop bringing the meat.  and when green is facing up, it measn keep it coming.  As far as i could tell, they didn't really pay attention to that part, cuz even when we set it red, the meats just kept coming. Oh god....I'm so full.  Really. Oh yeah, the bill....the bill is steep.  Stay away from the expensive wines because that will quickly run you close to a $100 meal, or over.  Play it safe and you can have a great time for about $50ish or $60ish a person
I'm so heart broken right now! They stopped serving the meat skewer buffet for lunch!   Dammit!   I had a light dinner last night and skipped breakfast this morning!   I was so ready to throw down! For our my co-worker's birthday luncheon, I had no choice but to dive into their vegan bar and order the New York Strip Steak.    So unfair! Highlights from the vegan bar: - Mashed potatoes prepared in coconut milk - White wine mushrooms. I still feel robbed.
Anyone ever loosen their belt up by two notches in a fancy restaurant before?  Just asking!  I'm... Read more 
Hopefully the curse of the old Q space is over. Pampas has transformed the abandoned brick building into a formal somewhat post modern venue. There's a lounge/bar area up front where you can participate in a smaller menu, imbibe, and watch whatever local game's on. Otherwise you can move down either side of the restaurant along the walls or head up to the upper tied located in the center. Lots of dark woods, glass and white linen go throughout. There are two MC Escher-like chandeliers of swirled metal that hang above everything. We were seated at one of the larger tables along side the left wall within hoping distance to the fairly extensive salad bar. I had brought pretty much the whole operations team from my company and if you know operations people, they are some hard hitting, big time meat eating folk. After looking at the menu the choice was easy; hit up the unlimited rodizio and side bar. You have a choice of eating at the side bar only for significantly less in addition to the choice of Seafood skewers, and single entrees. The menu is as follows: Apppetizers: - Crispy polenta crusted calamari with peppers and pineapple -Steamed clams with Linguica -Prawn Cocktail with malagueta pepper (one of my faves) glaze and avocado relish -Vegetable empanadas with curry, parmesan, and smoked tomato ouree Entrees: -Ribeye steak with potato-butternut squash puree, celery root and pearl onions -Alaskan Halibut with potato gratin, passion fruit and crispy beets -Duck breast with orange-star anise glaze, dried cherry risotto, endive and walnuts - Garbanzo stew with eggplant, tomato, ginger and couscous. So you see this is a tale of two separate restaurants. All the above doesn't involve the rodizio at all which has: -Picanha - Brazilian top sirloin -Maminha - tri tip with rock salt and olive oil -Cordeiro - leg of lamb marinate in yogurt, garlic, mint -Lamb Chop - marinated with garlic and ginger -Lombo1 - pork tenderloin with a dry run -Lombo2 - pork tenderloin with parmesan -Sirloin1 - with garlic and herbs -Sirloin2 - with parmesan -Frango - chicken legs/thighs marinated in white wine and herbs -Frango Picante - chicken legs/thighs marinate with garlic, spicy peppers, and vinegar -Linguica - Brazilian pork sausage -Presunto - ham slow roasted with pineapple -Peru - turkey breast wrapped in bacon -Fraldinha - skirt steak with onion and herb Needless to say this is a lot of meat for the unlimited rodizio. If that's not enough for you there are seafood skewers in addition that you can order a la carte: -Lobster tail -Prawns with olive oil and lemo -Scallops with garlic -Scallops wrapped in bacon Actually I think you make this 3 restaurants in one depending on how you break up what they offer, with the 3 menu sections being the most obvious. Between the 10 of us (who've collectively been to about 35 different churrascos), we  tried all of the rodizio and then sprang for some dessert, with one of them notably containing bacon, if you didn't get enough meat already. It was pointed out to me that their dessert chef is on top chef but since I don't get Bravo I had no idea. I did recognize however that we were seated next to the owners, GM and another manager who we got to talking briefly. Very friendly people and they were definitely glad to see how full their opening night is. They told us that come May 12, you'll be able to go here for lunch. The service was definitely top notch, they were trying their best to please though there were some small hiccups here and there but nothing major. I think for those who think Cleo's or Espetus up north is  too salty, this place will fit the bill. I actually thought some of the cuts were undersalted but then it depends on how close to the crust you are because the skirt steak, picanha and Frango  were perfectly cooked. I wish I could remember some of the sides but I wasn't really paying attention to that. Lots of traditional and some various fusion selections; all very fresh. I think after a couple of weeks they'll have everything ironed out and I'll be returning for again for the regular entrees, again for the seafood skewers, and then again for the rodizio. :) 4.5 stars. ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- New Brazilian Churrascaria taking over the site of the Q Cafe.
Simply scrumptous! Love the rodizio bar! Good wine selection too!
So, I've been to Cleo's in San Bruno, Espetus in the City and now Pampas in the PA.  Each Brazillian Steakhouse I go to, the bar just keeps getting raised higher and higher. I previously mentioned that Espetus is "Phenomenal."  Well, it is, and I stand by it!  But, Pampas...geez....can you say, "Super-Phenomenal with a cherry on top?" Took the s/o there last Tuesday for dinner and apparently they had some wine tasting going on.  Looked fun actually, I might have to check that out the next time around. Of course, we did the Rodizio and headed straight for the side bar.  Whoa...that plethora of food was awesome!  I loved the variety of salads they offered, antipasto and oh snap...they served up grilled cantaloupe.  Wrapped a piece of prosciutto on it and it was so damn delish!  They also had grilled (I think it was grilled) pears.  I couldn't stop popping them in my mouth!  They didn't have any meat entrees in their hot food section of the side bar, which didn't bother me.  All I got from that section was rice. Anyhow, commence the parade of meat.  Their beef, man it was a flavor explosion in my mouth!  I especially loved their sirloin with garlic and the sirloin with parmesan.  The pork loin was coated with some sweet, cinnamon-ish type of spice and it almost tasted like a holiday ham...I loved it!  They had served up some chicken legs, I forgot what it was called but if you're familiar with the Filipino-Style Chicken Adobo, it tasted very reminiscent of it.  Then again, like I mentioned in my reviews for Cleo's and Espetus, I suggest sticking to the beef, get your monies worth! :) My only disappointment was with their roasted pineapple.  I think it was overcooked so it came out dry and they didn't spice it up like they do at Cleo's or Espetus but, the sweetness of the pineapple made it all better! Also, they have THE BEST Cheese Bread!  They will replenish your plate without any hesitation! Service was also "Super-Phenomenal!"  Initially we had one server assigned to us but over the course of our meal, another server came into the scene.  Every time we left the table to go to the sidebar, our napkins were nicely folded, utensils arranged and table was spotless upon our return.  Also, our glasses never went empty...which is awesome because we drink our bevs pretty quick.  The Exec Chef, (Assistant?) Exec Chef and I'm guessing the manager even came out to our table to check on us. What's funny is that during our meal, one of the bussers was at the table next to us and I asked him where the restroom was.  Rather than point to where it was, I kind of was thrown off as he literally walked me to the door of the restroom. I really, really, really like Pampas!  I like it even better than Espetus, especially since it's so much closer to home.  I can see myself going here at least once a month or maybe twice...every payday!  Yeah, some past reviewers have complained that $45.00 per person is steep but, you get what you pay for.  $45.00 per person at Sizzler, then yes, you'll hear me complain...is Sizzler even still around??  hehe! One thing to note, it can get LOUD in the restaurant.  I'd suggest Pampas is a great place to have a fun, group dinner than a romantic, quiet dinner.
Although I'm neither a frequent meat-eater nor all-you-can-eat kind of girl, I'd definitely come here again to have the unlimited Rodizio for the following reasons: 1. So many different types of delicious meat on sticks to choose from. 2. Expansive side bar with a wide variety of side dishes and appetite enhancers. 3. Complimentary cheese bread! So good! Too bad this is not unlimited. Of course, I'd have to have my personal assistant/slave with me to cut my meat into bite-size pieces ready to stuff into my pie hole. My favorites were the skirt steak, chicken hearts, and tri-tip. Our first piece of tri-tip was cooked to perfection - expertly seasoned and cooked medium rare. Heaven! However, our second piece was well-done, under-seasoned and a big disappointment. Booooo! Overall, it was a good interactive dinner experience. I really enjoyed the hunky men carrying big phallic hunks of meat on sticks, and then I'd turn my head to the left and my slave would be shoving delicious meat into my mouth. My life is so hard!
Happy hour M-F from 5-7!  $5 glasses of wine, specialty cocktails and a half price menu.  Also, I recently tried the all-you-eat side bar only for $27 which is first class.  Great for vegetarians but also a few meat selections as well like salami.
For $44 per person you get all-you-can-eat rodizio and salad bar.  There are about 10 skewer... Read more 
My recent meal at Pampas was superb: I really liked the food, ambiance, and the relative value.  Having chose it for my brother's bday with the familia, I left satisfied. So why just 3 stars?  One word = SERVICE (-1 star). It actually angers me that a place that does so many things right can screw up big time in this one area.  In fact, the service deficiencies are all in one, and only one, department : the WAITERS. I'm not sure what the waiters do here: maybe take a rare a la carte order or bring a drink from the bartender.  They disappear for long periods of time, yet, undoubtedly, take a cut of what we diners leave as tip. So we had THREE (yes, three!) waiters our night.  Here is their story: The 1st waiter was downright weird and odd, cracking strange jokes and with a strange affect.  After we had been seated, we literally waited for 10-15 minutes as we were ignored and the bus boy walked past 3 times with water, but did not fill our glasses. I finally had to flag down our waiter and he then proceeded to fill our water glasses after asking if we wanted sparkling, bottled, or just tap water.  It must be company policy to have the waiter serve the first round of water so that very question may be asked, because the bus boy was excellent in filling our water after that. When we said tap water would be fine, he made an off-hand joke that he couldn't promise that we wouldn't get a third eyeball from drinking Palo Alto tap water.  I guess he was trying to be funny, but it came across as more creepy. Tired of the bad jokes, I said we were ready to order.  Rather than explain the Rodizio concept or ask if we had ever had Brazilian BBQ (my parents had not), he said he was ready too and he expected us to get the Rodizio.  This was our first visit to Pampas and I at least expected some explanation about the style of dining we would be doing as well as some alternatives.  Nada. We all chose the all-you-can-eat option and we never saw that 1st waiter again. The meat servers, unlike the waiters, were awesome.  Appearing almost instantaneously once you chose Rodizio, they were very attentive, had great explanations about each meat cut, and were not fazed by excess photo taking! The manager/host was awesome too and remembered to ask who my brother was (since I had written it was his birthday on my Opentable reservation) and would later bring out a nice surprise birthday cake. All this was beginning to make the 1st waiter just a distant memory. ...but then stepped in our 2nd waiter.  He actually was extremely nice and asked several times if everything was to our satisfaction.  He asked if there were any meat dishes we wanted to try and made sure they were sent our way.  He even changed my mom's finished plate and gave her a new plate.  For the first half of the meal, our dishes had largely sat there, unless a bus boy came along with water and cleared the plates. I was beginning to think, "Cool! This is how waiters here are supposed to be!"  Too bad he came near the end of the meal, but I was still glad to have him. But then our 2nd waiter disappeared too.  He handed us our dessert menus, said he'd be back, and never came back.  After ~20 minutes with our dessert menus, I flagged down two bus boys and asked if they could find our waiter.  The bus boys were all super friendly and each said our waiter was "on the way." (kinda like "the check is in the mail") Where the heck had our nice 2nd waiter gone!?!  And for that matter, where the heck had our strange 1st waiter gone!?!?  And why wasn't there even an introduction like, "hi, I'm Nice Frank...I'll be your waiter from now on as Strange Jim's shift is finishing." At this point in time, I was getting extremely frustrated.  I was actually going to leave and NOT order desserts.  But having talked to the manager, I knew they might be bringing out a surprise birthday cake with our dessert orders, so I had to order. Frustrated, I flagged down the 3rd waiter.  Just wanting to know where our 2nd waiter was, I asked her if she could find our waiter, since the bus boys had not been successful.  Surprisingly, she didn't flinch nor did she seem surprised.  She just replied, "just give me the order."  What?!?  Does this happen all the time??  No, "oh, let me find him and see where he went?"  Do they take 60 minute breaks and cover for each other as they smoke in the back room? I then told her I had some questions about the desserts and she rushed through some half-hearted explanations as if she was getting off in 10 minutes and just covering for disappearing waiter #2. Interestingly, we never saw her or the other two waiters ever again.  All our desserts, tea, and coffee were brought out by the manager.  As was the surprise birthday cake.  The End. Pampas: The Mystery of the Three Disappearing Waiters
Ambiance Modern flair, lighting, layout, and the bar are quite impressive.  A great place for birthdays indeed!  We had a party of ten upstairs, well accommodated. Service Jorge and the boys kept coming around with spit roasted meats on skewers.  They even came around when our button was on red/stop.  They brought out all of our requests, and were very gracious in doing so. Side bar Even though the sides were minimal in my dining adventure, my favorites were the grilled pears, mushrooms, artisan cheeses, and the black beans with pieces of beef shank cooked with bacon fat.  The grilled plantains at our table weren't bad either. Meat My top choices were the top sirloin, tri tip, and skirt steak.  "Juicy perfection" is a good way to describe them.  The texture (fat) and taste of the top sirloin was irresistible.  I'm also a fan of their chicken hearts. The pork loin and chicken were just okay...and spicy.  Sausage reminded me of my breakfast choriso.  Leg of lamb was chewy and gamey.  Lamb chops were better and more tender.  Filet mignon was rather dry and lacked some taste. Dessert I can never complain about dessert, really.  I got to taste their tres leches cake, coconut flan, and chocolate torte...and they were all delightful and refreshing.  But if I were to pick one of them, I'd probably go with the tres leches cake with tropical fruit and sauce. Overall We had a wonderful time....and that's the bottom line!
If you are a meat lover, this is the place you have to eat at.  They come and bring you many varieties of meat such as garlic chicken or bacon covered chicken, all sorts of beef, and much more!  They also have a large variety at their all you can eat salad bar.  This is definitely one of my favorite places to eat.  It's pricey here but well worth the money for all the food and the quality.
Went here for the boyfriend's birthday and it was nothing short of AMAZING! It is really expensive but it is worth every penny. The service was great, I had a reservation and ended up having to be a little late but I just called in and said I was running late. They were really nice about it and didn't give me a hard time at ALL! My faves would be the pineapple and the chicken hearts!
Come very hungry! But it's worth your money if you like trying different cuts of meats. I have been here twice and have enjoyed it both time. Don't laugh, but I really liked their salad bar :) It was well stocked and had good selection of higher quality salad selection items. Make reservations so you don't need to wait. There is a parking garage next door to make it convenient for diners. I would come again... especially if I am hungry and can eat ALOT! ;)
Out of the many churrascarias I have tried (both in Northern and Southern California), Pampas would have to be my least favorite. Overall their salad bar and sides were on the average side in terms of taste, and the selection of salad wasn't as big as I've experienced at other churrascarias. A few of the meats I tried were not seasoned enough, while others tasted a little dry. I would have given this place four stars for the atmosphere, and service, and overall ambience, but I just can't say that "I'm a fan!"
I am a full-blown carnivore. I LOVE MEATBEEF! And this is the place that satisfies those cravings again and again and again. I'll splurge on the rodizio prix-fixe on special occasions such as my birthday last year. However, my favorite here is the happy hour at the bar. I know, here I go again with my happy hour, but who can beat $5 amazing tequila and cachaca cocktails ranging from spicy over citrusy to sweet?! Happy hour food displayed on the bar menu is 50% off until 7pm. They have an amazing meat platter that consists of 5 different meats (chicken, turkey, beef, pork, etc.) and grilled pineapple along with rice. You get two cuts of each kind of meat, so it's a big carnivorous mess that can be shared among two people along with an appetizer. Here is the kicker: this plate usually costs $28, but during happy hour it's only $14. Needless to say, my boyfriend and I eat a ton of meet here, get crazy drunk on tequila (him) and cachaca (me), watch some sports on the bar TVs and go home stuffed and sleepy.
This place is a CARNIVORE'S DREAM!   How can a woman not love men walking around with big swords of meat!  Wait, that sounded kind of dirty. The service and the ambiance was great too.  $44 dollars for unlimted side dish/salad bar and eleven different grilled meats.  Not bad at all! There were four of us and we loved majority of the grilled  meat selections with the exception of a couple.  My personal favorite was the turkey wrapped in bacon(mmm...bacon),  pork with parmesan, spicy chicken, and the tri tip. We ordered four of their desserts and the coconut flan was our favorite hands down.  We practically licked the plate.  Nothing like a good food induced coma.  I can't wait to go back!
Food: 4 stars Service: 4 stars Went here for a pre-New Years carnivore binge for the Rodizio ($45 per person). Different varieties of all-you-can-eat meat brought to you fresh-cooked on metal skewers. Go watch a Jason Statham movie afterward and punch a bear in the face to complete your guy night. An early reservation helped. We got first cut of pretty much everything on the menu (lamb chops, leg of lamb, chicken, pork loin, skirt steak, tri-tip beef roast, fillet Mignon, pork sausage, bacon-wrapped turkey, & grilled pineapple). The meat started being a little undercooked toward the end of the meal as more people were seated and required faster service. I'd definitely recommend arriving early for the best food. The salad bar detracts valuable stomach volume for more meat. Sure, there's a good selection of pungent cheeses and other balanced/flavorful sides, but let's be honest: you're here to re-enact that scene from Planet Earth where the pack of lions runs down and eats a gazelle. Minus the running. And the gazelle is some sort of hybrid beef-pork-chicken-pineapple creature. Waiters were pretty attentive and made sure we received multiple helpings of our favorites from the meat selection. They're not stingy with the portion sizes either. I'll definitely go here again when the mood strikes.
Sorry to go against the flow, but I wasn't impressed. Maybe I've set the bar too high from visiting world class churrascaria from Houston to Chicago to LA to Tokyo. If I had never been to a Brazilian restaurant before, I would have thought the place was gosh darn, gee whiz fantastic. Ambience: 5 stars. Warm and inviting chic modern dark woods and sleek lines. Not cavernous but instead separated out over 3 levels for a better sense of intimacy. Salad Bar: 4 stars. Strikes a great balance between fresh stand bys and some distinctive additions. Flow could have been better. Usually a salad bar of this length can be approached from both ends. This one was only approachable from left to  right. Even though they had salads and such on the far ends (as well as plates?) and main course sides in the middle, the dressings were only on the far right end. Allot of confusion reigned as to which side people should approach the bar without bumping into each other. Waiter Service: 5 stars. Cordial and attentive. Drinks/wine list: 5 stars. As long as they have strong caipirinha  and decent malbecs by the glass, I have no complaints. Live Music: 3 stars. I know i shouldn't dis any place that has live music -- ever, but you can only really hear the band at the bar up front and I could swear that their repertoire was limited to the 12 tracks on the Getz/Gilberto album. Rodizio (meats): 3.5 stars for distinctive selection/variety. I thought the linguisa sausage was especially tasty.  Besides the skirt steak and the overly rare top sirloin or two, though, old standbys were few and far between. Where was the ribeye and non-specialty sirloins? One more ding for the fact that the thicker cuts were well cooked on the outside but bleeding raw just under the surface. (Just check out their website: its like they are advocates of bleeding raw.) I'm a big fan of rare, don't get me wrong, but my wife prefers more well done (don't ask me why, but i've learned to live with it). The nice thing about many a top churrascaria is that they have something for everyone and can carve for different tastes. Meat Carving: 2 stars. I'm being generous. None of their servers seem to have ever come close to a finesse demonstrated by many a passador found elsewhere. Most didn't even weld a sword but merely a dinner knife to cut and push. When they did use a sword, it was clear that none had ever used one before. They would try to make a thin slice but fail and have to start over.  Next time you go to a top churrascaria, you'll be amazed at how nimble and fluid they are with a sword. Sorry to be a party pooper. Give me Espertus in SF or when it opens in San Mateo who knows when.
Read EVE K's review. Seriously. What differs with my experience? I joined a magically sweet duo who allowed me to tag along on a 3rd carnivore date... The jazz band was playing music and thus the main door was camaflouged. I passed it twice, and probably would have entered in the middle of the set.  My dates had arrived before me and they noticed my flustered state.   No problem-O... I was greeted with smiles, sweets, and hugs! ADD ON: This place is certainly "smaller" than those crazy joints in TEXAS. In other words, the salad bar is smaller and the meat guys are slower.  NO matter, the Latin speaker at the table ensured that we were hit with meat as frequently as possible. They give you this green go button, and ours was ON. Also, if you have pork issues, this place has various types of meat.  You can get your fill via the Rodizio, so don't hesitate.  Go big or go home. No warm cheese bread.  We were given more! We were greeted with fried bananas, polenta, and cheesy puffs.  They were great. Great for families-surprisingly!  It looks like they rent portable game sets for the rugrats....so bring 'em along! Red wine is a must here, so if you are a wine addict like me, then this is your kinda place!  Pampas did not let me down, and the staff was AWESOME, especially the friendly meat servers...what are they called again? CHURRRASSSCAAAAAAAAAAAAA Lives Strong in California, via Palo Alto!
Nothing like eating with the crew; especially when rolling 25 deep to a relatively posh place, but then again this was a special occasion. And there's no better reason for me to kill my work out regimen than to see all of them together in one place yet again. NVM the very appetizing rabbit food downstairs. If you came here, then you most likely came for the meat. But if you really must eat some flora, then at least wait till after you've had your body's weight in grilled perfection. The staff was on top of things, the decor was minimal yet appealing, and the exec chef was inspiring and innovative (new tamarind sauce). And last but not least...the flame kissed deliciousness was endless. Remember two things 1) Green = stuff my face 2) Red = leave me passed out on my plate There is something to be said about a restaurant that can still function and serve their other clientele despite while being in the midst of a Yelp Attack!!! "25 people? oh yes...let me lead you to their location above us." "That's right, Dom B*TCHES! And I don't give a F*CK!" *Breaking wine glasses (Van showing off his superior strength again) "Next round is on me!" *back downstairs to the well appointed bar and other typical....lively behavior exhibited by Yelp's one and only SVC   - living it up because...well, let's face it.... after a couple...or rather a lot of drinks, nothing else really matters.  XD 4 stars to Pampas for keeping it all together *just in case...happy birthday Cindi!
Lately, I've been terrified of AYCE places, but I've been wanting to try Pampas for a while now just to compare it to other churrascarias I've been to. Oh to hell with the dieting, let's get our grub on! With the holidays around the corner, make sure you're stocked up on stretchy pants and you're good to go. Arrived around 6ish on a Tuesday evening and the place was pretty empty, except for the bar. With discounted appetizers and $5 specialty cocktails from 5-7pm, there's no wonder everybody made a quick stop for drinks before grabbing a table. I ended up with a glass of Sangria Rio and, to my surprise, was a very pleasant drink for my taste buds. I'm always a sucker for any kind of sangria, but the peachy-pineappley flavor was a hit. I took a sip of my fellow dining companion's Samba-Rita and it was super strong and smokey. Thanks, but no thanks. Promptly seated in the upper level, we instantly turned our ridizio button to green signaling all the skewers to come our way. Took the liberty to try everything once before getting seconds on the good stuff. I was very disappointed with the first batch of filet mignon cubes that came out. Great flavor, but way overcooked. Rough and tough filet mignon is a sin to me. Luckily, they redeemed themselves with the second batch grilled to medium rare perfection. The juiciness of the tenderized meat melted away with each bite as I salivated just thinking about the delicious ingredients that created such a delightful treat. I preferred the garlic & herb cubes over the parmesan, only because I felt the cheesiness was a bit overpowering. My favorite of the evening had to be the picanha (Brazilian cut of top sirloin seasoned w/ rock salt & olive oil). Inspecting all 3 cuts on the skewer, I always went for the rarest one and oh my...the redder, the better. Everything else was honestly only so-so. I would pass on the linguica and bacon-wrapped turkey. Both were super dry and bland. After all, it is a Brazilian STEAKhouse, so get the steak. Overall, the meal and experience was enjoyable, but I'd stick with Espetus over Pampas any day due to the inconsistency in the cooking of the meats. I didn't like the feeling of having to check out how the steaks were prepared before agreeing to a taste. Also, Espetus serves ribs, prawns, & chicken hearts. Regardless, Pampas is a great, classy-feeling churrascaria for the South bay patrons who don't wanna make the drive all the way out to SF for Espetus. Will I be back? Perhaps for a special occasion, but I'll make sure I come with a heartier appetite to get my money's worth.
I've been to a few Brazilian all-you-can-eat places, and Pampas is my favorite!  $44 may seem pricey for their "Rodizio" option, but after you try everything they have to offer, you'll understand why I say that it's a great deal! I think 10-12 different meat options are presented to the table, and at the end, you can request your favorites to come back.  My finale is always tenderloin filet with parmesean.  Along with the meat, there is a salad bar that is filled with so much quality stuff that it can serve as a meal on its own.  Some of my salad bar favorites include the smoked trout, grilled peaches with queso fresco, and the marinated mushrooms.  In addition to the meat and salad bar, there is also cheese bread, polenta sticks, and fried plantains that are served at the table.  The cheese bread is amazing.  I break it in half and put the meats in it to create unbelievably delicious sandwiches. I can't say enough great things about this place.  The ambiance is great and the staff is so friendly.  Each time I've been here, the meal lasted more than 2 hours, and I've never felt rushed.  I can't wait to go back!
Here is the rundown. -The Rodizio is what my family and I ordered, and it is absolutely amazing. What happens is you have full access to their "salad" bar, which has a bunch of different foods (ex: pasta, rice, mushrooms etc...), and they come around with skewers of meat that you can choose from. There are about 12 assorted meat skewers and 1 pineapple skewer. The meats vary depending on what time of day you go. It is all you can eat, but don't waste all of your stomach space on the salad bar (as amazing as it is), you really want to save room for the meats. This overall meal is about $40 per person, but it is worth every cent. -Attention all sweets/sugar lovers! Do not buy desserts here! Go somewhere else. They are not worth the cost and are only mediocre. If you are really tempted, the only one i like is the assorted sorbet. It is the cheapest and tastiest option on the menu. Overall this is a great place to go with family in town or to go out to lunch with friends. I would recommend this restaurant for groups because of the way the food is served. Go here on an empty stomach! Recommended Meats: Lamb, Sirloin, Filet, Chicken, "Beef Nuggets"
I was in meat heaven. Pampas was definitely worth the $44 all-you-can-eat rodizio (different meats on skewers) and side bar.   The side bar has so many delicious options it was hard not to stuff yourself just on the side dishes.   My coworkers brought me here for my birthday dinner and it was absolutely delicious. I loved the ambiance and decor.  Before we sat down for dinner, we had some drinks at the lovely bar.   When we were seated, we were given a basket of breads, polenta, and more.   WOW...these were so good.  I had to really force myself not to eat too many since I still had the side bar and rodizio to come!   The meats were fantastic, but I definitely preferred some over others.  (they had bacon-wrapped turkey!) You don't have to do the Rodizio and/or side bar when you come to Pampas.  They also have several entrees available.  I even heard from someone that their desserts were amazing too. I would love to come back to Pampas again for another fantastic meal.
Usually I debate the stars a restaurant gets. This time I went right for the 5. This place is awesome. It's on Alma right near University Avenue. Park in the public parking lot on the corner. The decor is modern and pretty. You can happily bring a date or a business group here. Make sure you have reservations though. We didn't and had a choice between eating in 45 minutes or sitting at the bar. The place is HUGE and was still crowded. We ended up at the bar and it was quite nice. So if you forget to make a reservation this is a viable option. Start with the drinks. I had a Gaucho. It's a Brazilian drink with Sagatiba cachaca, Canton ginger liqueur, mango, lime, and spice. Sagatiba cachaca is a Brazilian run with a slightly sweeter taste and a wonderful aftertaste. If you like rum (and I really do) you are in for a treat. rum and ginger are an amazing combination. My friend went for a red wine and it was quite nice as well. There is an extensive drink list. We'd never had Brazilian food before so asked what the traditional foods were on the menu? There is a $44 all you can eat meat option. That seemed too big for us so we went for the mixed grill for $28. We combined that with the poblano for $8. Poblano is described as a pepper with cheese. If you like the Mexican version you'll be even more pleasantly surprised with this. Our two dishes were served with a platter of cheese bread (think puff with cheese baked inside and you'll come close), fried banana, and polenta. For dessert we split the coconut flan. This is a small portion with vanilla bean shavings and toasted coconut on top laid in a caramel - vanilla sauce which has been cooked with the flan. A wafer infused with fresh vanilla comes with the dish. I didn't think you could get heaven in a non-chocolate dessert. I have been corrected. It was amazing. We had nice, strong coffee with the dessert. The we hobbled away absolutely and completely stuffed to the gills. The service was attentive. Our waiter was able and willing to answer questions about the menu in detail. Food came quickly. They even asked the chef for the details of the dessert when I asked about it. There was a live Brazilian band playing. wonderful music with just the right level of sound so talking was very possible. I'll be back. I want to try all the other desserts on the menu. And those other main courses too. This place is pretty close to my idea of perfect. It's a little expensive but it's worth every penny.
Ambiance/Decor: The ambiance and decor are nice & quite aesthetically pleasing.  Just being there made me feel all fancy!  The whole restaurant (decor, food) creates this well-fed, upscale feeling.  Mmmm. Side Bar: Pretty tasty!  A lot of standard items, but I was surprised to also find croquettes, coconut couscous, prosciutto, fruit cole slaw, and an assortment of hard cheeses. Side Dishes: At the table were plates of cheesy bread puffs (DELICIOUS - a kind of airy biscuit that I've seen only at these Brazilian churrascaria-type places), fried banana (pretty good), and fried polenta (pretty good). MEEEEEEAT: There were 13+ different meat selections.  My favorites were the parmesan-crusted filet mignon and the sausage. Other selections include: tri-tip, top sirloin, skirt steak, lamb chop, leg of lamb, bacon-wrapped turkey, chicken heart, spicy chicken leg, herbed chicken breast, coriander pork, filet mignon w/o parmesan.  Impressively, the chicken was super-moist. They also bring by skewers of roasted pineapple - so good, don't pass this one up! It contrasts really nicely with all the heavy, salty meat that you're eating. If you have a large group, then your table gets one red/green card to flip whenever your group is ready/not ready for more meat -- for smaller groups, each person gets an individual card. Minus 1 star because: * it's pricey ($44 for rodizio all-you-can-eat), especially if you don't have the appetite of a football player. * sadly, pork ribs weren't included in the unlimited meats... they're a separate appetizer.
Puck Green Side Up. $44 dollars!  Too pricey. You need to have an attack plan to eat here.  Here's mine: Skip lunch. Nod politely as the waiter expels the virtues of the salad bar.  Once the spiel is over flash a big smile and ask to start with the meat. Pace yourself with the cheese bread.  (It's harder to do than you think) The churrasco/rodizio has a large selection (14) of meats.  Try a little of everything.  You don't have to finish the stuff that's just meh (and there is a lot that's just meh).  Ask for more of the stuff you love.  The servers are excellent and will bring you more. Favs: Maminha tri-tip, the skin on the Frango chicken, pineapple and cheese bread. Puck Red Side Up.
So I got a call back about two days from the owner, apologizing about the incident, told me he would be looking over the cameras and try to find out who this person was. I would think I'd get a call back after two days? Or he would of atleast asked for my gf's number to speak with her personally. He asked me to describe the server, which isnt hard to eliminate who the person was... lets see asian guy (no), white guy (no), three hispanic guys... one looked a lot younger didnt know how to even cut the meat right (must of been new) (no), one longer hair (no again)... lets see 6 feet guy, lighter brown - short maybe spikey hair, think he had a facial hair, not too skinny, but more on the built size... that would be him. i wish i got their names. yeah he even jokingly said "I HOPE IT WASNT MY BROTHER." Maybe I havent got that call back, cause it was his brother... Honestly, u could of just gave my gf a refund for the dinner, cause it wasnt that great. I dont get how you can say you'll call my gf when you never asked for her number.  Saying sorry to me really doesnt cut it, it should be my gf who gets the apology. Only positive thing I can say about this restaurant is that its clean and the decor is nice. Don't waste your time or your money! Oh another thing, he said "Wish you guys didnt put up those harsh reviews." well then whats the point of having yelp? for customers to express how they feel about the food, the service and even the management of the restaurant!
DAMN, i waited a freaking month for this place to roll around... went here for our anniversary. I... Read more 
I was taken here for a farewell luncheon with co-workers. I had never been here and was looking forward to checking out the place and trying the food. The majority of the reviews are of their rodizo service, so I'm happy to share with my fellow Yelpers how their lunch options are. As mentioned above, because they do not offer the rodizo service at lunch, we ordered entrees from the menu. The side bar did look appetizing, but most of us, women, were afraid of getting too full! Here's the lo-down: -panini ($12): not tried -prawns ($11): not tried -daily market fish (CA sea bass): from those who ordered it, their plate was spotless so I would imagine it was scrumptious -filet mignon skewer ($13): cooked to perfection and without a wooden skewer so you don't have to worry about the possibility of losing a piece of meat! It was seasoned with garlic and the green dipping sauce is heaven...lime and cilantro (?) puree brings out the flavors of the marinated beef. -tuna ($16): seared perfectly as well and on top of a miso flavored bed of chilled noodles Even the complimentary bread basket and dessert were amazing. You could hear the "oohs" and "ahhs" as we dined on our meal. Service was sincere and accommodating (even though we were the only party in the restaurant on a Monday at noon) and if I get the chance, I know I'd come here to try the dinner. Parking is 2 hrs on the street or 3 hrs in the lot next door to Patagonia. Ambiance is chic and soothing and I'd like to hangout in the bar area on a Friday or Saturday night and see what the place is like. Maybe another time...
Pampas is a great place to celebrate a birthday, anniversary, promotion, or any occasion. They can accomadate fairly large groups. This place is an alternative to another Brazilian restaurant if the trek to SF is too far for you. The decor and ambiance of the restaurant set the mood. I like the overall modern/zen style of the place. The bar and lounge is fairly roomy with comfortable sofas and loveseats. The upstairs loft is spacious and good for parties. As for the food, $44 per person is a bit on the pricier side, but it is totally worth it if you a true carnivore. $44 gets you the all you can eat meat and sidebar that consists of an assortment of salads, soups, appetizers, rice, sides, and condiments. The meats are delicious! Some of my faves are the tri tip, sirloin steak, bacon wrapped pork (anything wrapped in bacon was a PLUS), parmesan crusted beef and pork. All the meats were succulent, tender, and juicy. Every bite was a meat orgy. Even if I took pleasure out of every bite, my only complaint is that I found some of the meat to be more on the salty side. Perhaps, maybe they should tone down on the salt if they can. I found the saltiness over power the taste and juicyness of some of the meat. In addition to the neverending servings of meat, we were also given sides of cheesy bread and polenta. The cheesy bread was delicious that I found myself hogging it all on my side of the table (Oops, my bad for not sharing). 4 stars overall for food, service, and atmosphere. If I have out of town guests visiting, this is one of the places I plan on taking them if they have never tried Brazilian dining.
Last night was my first real Brazilian dinning experience and I loved it. The decor of the restaurant was sophisticated and 1st class all-around. I can picture this place being located in the trendiest spots in NY or LA. The bar in the front was spectacular; quite a site to see I must say. The wait staff was exceptionally friendly and helpful too. Now about the food...the food was excellent. High quality and fresh. I had what I'd call the Brazilian buffet (side dishes plus having the meat guy cut the meat at the table). The sides were fresh and tasty and the meat they cut at the table was exceptional. There's a "meat puck" located on the table that indicates if you'd like them to continue to come over with more meat. You can flip it to green or red to indicate you'd like more meat or I've had enough respectively. When the waiter was describing how the process worked he mentioned "if the meat becomes too intense" flip it to red. I was dining with two other big meat lovers and we laughed at that notion. Boy did we eat those words (literally). 30 minutes later, we were flipping that sucker to red and keeping it there. The meats were so good we couldn't stop eating. This is a great restaurant and especially good for groups or business outings. I highly recommend Pampas.
The bf and I wanted a low key anniversary dinner so we settled on Pampas, since he constantly raved about the all-you-can-eat Rodizio since going there with his boss and friends.  We made sure to arrive early, and find parking to avoid any stressful situations that would ruin our occasion.  Parking was a little confusing w/ finding where the ticket meter was, but it was found soon after. We arrived right as the doors opened for dinner at 5pm...  we were greeted and seated promptly and given menus even though we knew we were going to do the Rodizio for sure.  I ordered myself a glass of Pinot Noir [theirs wasn't too shabby] then perused their IMPRESSIVE salad bar.  The bf yelled at me and told me not to fill up on the salad, so I had to exercise restraint.  The salad bar had tabouli, olives, cheeses, asian noodles, smoked trout, and many more things that I could have tried - had I not been there for nothing but meat.  Everything at the salad bar was delicious though! From that point on, it was an onslaught of non-stop meats coming our way.  I sampled everything they had to offer, and my advice would be to steer clear of the chicken and make your trip worth it... do beef and lamb every chance you get.  I'm a sucker for lamb, but the rack of lamb is what you want - NOT the leg of lamb... [it was too salty]  I probably had 3-4 rounds of the rack of lamb w/ their balsamic sauce before I called it quits.  Also, the fillet mignon w/ crusted parmesean cheese was also impressive. To cleanse the palette in between foods, they also serve up grilled pineapples - which are TO DIE FOR.  I never realized how much I liked pineapples until now, and it really helps you digest everything a little bit easier.  I absolutely LOVED it. For dessert, we had the coconut flan and the chocolate coffee cake - both were good, but do not have the coffee - then switch to the coconut flan - it will make it taste bland in comparison.  Not that it is bland, but the coconut flan was exceptional for maybe someone who does not like anything too sweet.  Both were good in their own respect. Def. a nice place to come for dinner.  I'll have to find another excuse to celebrate so I can come here for their lamb...
So over the years, I have been to several churrascarias around the world, with the first being in Tokyo, Japan.  I haven't been to Brazil before, so I really have no way to make a proper judgment of the authenticity of the food or caprinhas.  ;-) That being said, of the different places I have been to in the past, Pampas is right down the middle for the price, quality, and selection.  Earlier this year, my friends and I had visited a Pampas in Las Vegas, and we were really impressed with the service level, which was equally good at this Palo Alto location.  Actually, in Vegas, it was too good that we actually had to use the stop light, but this time, the pacing of the meats coming around was much more manageable. Some of the meats were a bit too salty for my taste, but in general, everything tasted really good.  I think my favorite of all the cuts was the lamb chops.  Mmm... Pineapple and ham was my least favorite. Although not the main attraction, the salad bar was actually not too salady... I kinda depend on that to help me push the meat out, but there was not too much in the greens department over here. The waiters were all pretty cool, and kept coming back to check up on us to make sure we had tried everything, and to ask us what we would like to have come back to us. Overall, the experience was good, and I definitely will find a time to come back again when I lose the weight I just put on... :D
It's with great excitement that I appoint FIVE stars to Pampas and celebrate my 100th review! Eating here is truly an experience.  As it was my first time at Pampas, we chose the Rodizio menu which allowed us full access to their side bar as well as an unlimited selection of meats. This is a fantastic place for a couple or for a group. Definitely expect to be there for a few hours. What makes this experience fun is the variety of salads, vegetables and other dishes at the side bar as well as the magic red/green "button".  We joked that it was the easy button... as soon as you flip the button over from red to green, carvers in green chef jackets come to your table nearly immediately procuring different meats on large skewers.  Until you flip that "button" back, they will continue to come.  For larger pieces of meat you'll put to use the small personal tongs to grab the top portion while the carver completes his cut. Our server came over and took our drink order. I thought I'd try out the Alma which resulted in an alcoholic smoothie. No, not thick - just reminiscent in taste. After this, I changed it up to a gin dirty martini. Next their "bread" arrived at the table consisting of crispy polenta, a cheesy roll/biscuit, and a fried panko crusted banana. After filling my plate at the side bar with baby spinach salad, red and yellow beets, julienned carrots and a banana vinaigrette, tabbouleh,  grilled peaches, sautteed button mushrooms, hearts of palm, Spanish olives, collard greens, balled watermelon with a hint of fresh mint, and mashed potatoes that I could've sworn were perfectly whipped with coconut milk; I returned to our table, flipped the "button" over and tried the Lombo (spicy pork tenderloin). As it was slow roasted, the juices and flavor was amazing. Next up was the Fraldinha (skirt steak with an onion herb marinade)... again aromatic and perfectly cooked.  That was quickly followed by the Sirloin filet with garlic and herbs, Tri-tip, and Presunto (black forest ham with grilled pineapple).  When the  Frango Picante (chicken legs marinated with garlic and spices) and Frango (chicken legs) came by.. I had to decline. Are you kidding me, I would've LOVED to try it however did you read everything I ate? So I found a skosh more room.  I had a double espresso and their chocolate torte with caramel ice cream (HEAVENLY) and a brazil nut toffee with bacon and smoked sea salt. See, I wouldn't have consumed any more... but bacon was mentioned. I'm a sucker for bacon. Turns out I chose well... the toffee was amazing, the caramel ice cream was stupendous.  The torte itself, meh - nothing to write home about, but the aforementioned made up for that. Our server, whose name escapes me at the moment! was fantastic; funny, confident and good looking. :) Needless to say, I left absolutely satisfied.
i have to give this place 5 stars.   The service was really great and the salad bar was the best I've ever seen.... seriously, a GUY could feast off just that alone!  But the GUY is there because people keep coming by his table with small but incredibly delicious slices of MEAT!  The GAL has plenty of choices, too! But I'm grading off 4 dudes out to celebrate a birthday... Seriously, we had the Rodizio plan which meant servers came by periodically with various cuts and preparations of meat from turkey to sirloin and tri-tip.  It was all really perfect and delicious.   The wine menu is very complete and the decor is nice but relaxing.  It is a different way to dine, but the way they do it is not intimidating or confusing.   I mean, you're enjoying your wine and some dude walks up with a sword loaded with skewered filet mignon and ask you if you want some.... is that so hard? Go there.  You won't regret it. (I forgot to mention that the meat people, they KEEP COMING until you surrender)
I went for dinner last Wednesday around 5:30pm. It was quite empty only about 3 tables. Ive been to original Brazilian steak houses in Brazil and other parts of the world, but I guess its only fair to compare Pampas to local restaurants like Espestus in San Francisco. -Service: Was perfect, the staff was very attentive making sure we always had clean plates, napkins, and if we needed more drinks. -Price: $44 per person for unlimited steak - salad bar. (I actually enjoyed Espestus salad buffet bar much better, greater selection, with better quality food, and amazing seafood!) -Food: Im sure because the place had just opened for dinner it took about 15-20 minutes for the rotation of meats to start. The meats were great, exactly what you would expect 14 different kinds, and please make sure to try the chicken hearts there really good! However, as mentioned above the salad bar was decent but not great, or maybe I just had higher expectations compared to Espestus & other Brazilian restaurants i have visited. Their drinks are small but they do make them quite strong. Overall, I enjoyed our dinner and I would come back due to the convenience of the location to me. However, I still prefer Espestus in San Francisco but besides a $5 dollar difference in prices, salad bar, and Brazilian waiters there is not much of a difference between both places.
Angie and I have been to Pampas 4x now, so long overdue for a review. Let me caveat, we have never actually been to the diining room, just 3 Happy Hours and their World of Wine tasting last night. Their Happy Hours are worth attending. Half price on drinks and all appetizers. "apps' include small things like the mixed grill plate, normally $28, $14 during HH. Many great cocktails, good wine list. Some nights have live music. Their World of Wines event last night was amazing, I will be better prepped next time. It went from 5-9 and for $25 poured over 65 wines from Argentina, Oz, NZ, and CA.  Quality stuff with knowledgable pourers/distributors, and excellent bottle/case take home prices. It was a wine lovers paradise. One of these days, I will actually go eat meat until I blow up too :)
Wow, a new trendy place that doesn't suck!!!! I've always loved the brazilian steakhouse concept, but only ate at one, and it was terrible.  But, something moved me to give Pampas a try--ok, well, that something was all you can eat meat. For a brand new restaurant, this place was super smooth.  The atmosphere was very classy (not like a dumpy all you can eat dive), the staff very nice and the experience efficient. We were there barely over an hour, and ate a ton and never felt rushed, nor like we were waiting. The salad bar is extremely good, with it's share of misses.  I thought the mashed potatoes were rude, but the black beans and mushrooms, mixed together, now that was heaven.  Lots of nice veggies and really just more food than I could comprehend.  Some items were a little "buffet-ey" you know,  a bit wilted, a little meh, but largely it was great. The meats were all good, and I liked the beef items over the others, but that's me.  The leg of lamb was a bit dry, but so what.  The pork and pineapple was surprisingly good. Servers were by quite often and I think virtually everything on the menu came by.  Also, servers asked if we wanted something new and would respond to prompts for it right away.  We drafted off a table of people next to us who were not shy in asking, and things just kept coming and coming....think the secret is to not be shy. I guess one suggestion I'd make to dinners is don't bring a veggie here--salad bar is fine but it's all about the meat.  To that end, eating red meat is also a requirement for real enjoyment.
To be brutally honest, when BF came up with the place for a large group dinner, I secretly rolled my eyes. I mean, how good can Brazilian BBQ really be, judging by the heaps of dry meat I've forced down my throat over the years. Now I'm secretly biting my tongue. This place is amazing! AWESOME meat, impressive wine selection, posh dcor, good service, roomy for large groups - what's not to love?! Oh and did I mention free salad bar? Unless you have some weird allergy that makes you break out in sweaty warts Dom Woganowski style when you eat red meat, you should go for the all you can eat Churrasco which comes with unlimited trips to the free salad bar for $44 per person. Why won't I stop mentioning the free salad bar? I'm glad you asked, because it is only the best free salad bar ever. The noticeably fresh gourmet selection includes, in addition to the obvious, Mozzarella + Tomato, olives, anchovies, and, well, I don't remember much else because the MEAT CAME! There are about 13 types of meat, varying from beef to chicken to pork and ham to lamb, sizzling in various seasonings and sauces. Our favorite, hands down, was the Fraldinha (skirt steak w onion herb marinade). The thick layer of pesto like marinade was hearty and satisfying. The Maminha (tri-tip slow roasted w rock salt and olive oil) was also tres yummy. Many in the group enjoyed the Presunto (ham slow roasted w pineapple), and also the Lombo (pork tenderloin slow roasted w spice dry rub) ... oh my gawd. Slightly sweet, just enough spice to flirt with the back of my tongue. There was also the Sirloin Filet w garlic herbs - a nanometer too salty, but excellent bold flavor and surprisingly tender for a sirloin cut. NOTE:  The same dish might taste slightly different each time it comes out. For instance, the Frango Picante (spicy chicken) was juicy and spicy on the first round, but then dry and saltier on another round. Washed everything down with a bottle of waiter recommended Malbec - heaven! DESSERT: - Chocolate Tort w Bacon Brazil nut toffee. The description scared the living crap out of the non foodies in the group. But soon they realized it was just a badass brownie topped with ice cream and a toffee chip. - Blueberry Acai Crisp w ice cream. Great crisp with fresh fruit. Slightly too sweet.  But so am I, and nobody seems to mind.
WARNING: One should not take a vegan to this place... this would be like bringing Elton John to the Playboy Mansion Luckily, I am not a vegan, I am a meat-loving beast, and I loved this place!  The meat is so juicy and cooked perfectly as opposed to Espetus, who serves a dry piece of meat now and then.  My favorites were the sirloin, the chicken, lamb chops, linguica, and turkey wrapped bacon (I know...that's basically the whole Rodizio menu).  The tenderloins, however were somewhat dry and forgettable. The service was exceptional.  Our waiter Ricardo was very attentive and always checking up on us.  However, I did find it funny when he suggested that I try a beer called Fantome which he said was "very, very good."  But later, he asked me if I liked it, confessing that he never actually tried the beer before. The side bar was pretty good, but not worth the "side-bar-only" price of $27, if you just get it without the Rodizio.  Honestly, I tried not to fill up on the side bar, so I can fill up on the meat.  I stuck with the basic black beans and rice.  But the beans actually have pieces of juicy sausage in them, making them extra yummy.  But one thing that was weird about the side bar was that the line went both ways, leading to moments of awkwardness whenever two people met in the middle and fought over the beans, rice, potatoes, etc... Besides that, I can't wait to make my next visit to Pampas.
Came here for a birthday party last night and the food was amazing!!! I am Brazilian so I have a very high standard when it comes to Churrascarias and this is the best one I have been outside of Brazil. Their parmesan fillet mignon is to die for...not to mention their black beans, rice and farofa that that are very authentic! Also loved that they serve Pao de Queijo (cheesy bread) as appetizers! Ohh can't forget to mention the awesome Bossa Nova music!!! People ask me where to go for Brazilian bbq all the time...and now I can tell them where to go!!! This place is definitely worth the $$$. Great food, great music and great ambiance!!! I was very impressed!
My new favorites: -skirt steak -chicken hearts -filet mignon -leg of lamb Stay away from: -Lime Chicken, so rubbery, and NOT flavorful -Both types of pork are dry and overseasoned -Top Sirloin is CHEWY and salty. So sad, all the round marble rodizio indicators are now gone, they are using double sided PAPER coasters now. For the # of items which are pleasing to my palate, I don't think Pampas will be on my regular rotation anymore, it's my 3rd time and the initial charm has just worn off.
Pampas, like most all-you-can-eat has a method to get you stuffed before the GOOD stuff comes.  Ah,... Read more 
My older brother's bachelor party introduced me to Brazillian Steakhouses originally. That was down in Burbank, CA, and many years ago. I am still full from that experience. When I got down to Stanford to work, this go-around, my coworker remembered I had mentioned wanting a good steak. Him: "Dude, I've got three steakhouses for you." Me: "You da man." Him: "--And you'll love this: They're all in one location." How is that possible, you might ask? And if you don't, well, I did, and thus my storyline advances. The Rodizio. That's how. We ate little breakfast, and no lunch, to prepare. We further tortured ourselves by spending an hour at Fry's before dinner, shopping for needed electronics equipment to nerd out over in temporary office. The wait in Fry's line next to all the goodies was excrutiating. My coworker finally broke down and bought one of those chocolate oranges. We tried to resist snacking pre-steak, but couldn't. I mean... who can resist a sliver of orange-chocolate deliciousness? Into Pampas we went, at a table we sat, and two Rodizios we ordered. We headed over to their salad/extras buffet and got a small amount of vegetables and carbohydrates to help fool ourselves that we were having a healthy dinner. Then we sat back down, turned our 'button' to green, and on came the parade of meat. Sirloin. Filet Mignon. Lamb. Turkey, wrapped in bacon. Chicken hearts. Chicken thighs. Some other kind of beef. Sausages. Another kind of beef. I mean, no effing kidding my cholesterol is at deadly levels. The place is classy. Warm colors, candle light, really cool design. The servers are friendly, service is great. This is a great place for a date, for a business dinner, or to just go treat yourself to an extraordinary amount of meat. And vegans! You'll love this! ... oh wait. No you won't.
What a totally fabulous meal.  One thing is for sure, you will not leave this establishment hungry! I don't even know where to start.  Bar area isn't huge, but was lively on this Tuesday evening.  I liked the chairs and couches much better than your standard table and chairs.  They make you want to kick back and enjoy a cocktail either before or after dinner. We were seated right away and had our waiter quickly appear to tell us how everything works.  You can either order off the menu or go for the rodizio which is basically all you can eat meats plus the side bar which is full of salads, vegetables, cheeses and starches (say yes to the mashed coconut sweet potatoes, black beans and mushrooms).  One great thing I noticed is that items were labeled for those with food allergies. Can I please just give you one piece of advice?  Go easy on this stuff because the moment you sit down, the meat will start making it's way to your table. We tried so many things, but my absolute favorite was the Medalhao com Alho which is beef tenderloin seasoned with garlic and herbs.  It was tender and just so delicious.  I didn't love the Fraldinha (skirt steak) as it was a bit rare for my taste, but all in all I really enjoyed everything I tried. We also had dessert:  Chocolate Torte, caramel ice cream, bacon-Brazil nut toffee with smoked sea salt, and creme fraiche sauce and the Passion fruit mousse with cassis reduction and shortbread cookies.  I have to say that the Passion fruit mousse was the clear winner!  The mousse was far from sickly sweet and had just enough tang to keep you wanting more.  The torte was a bit heavy and dry, BUT the bacon toffee was all kinds of stupid good. We always try to go to good places when it's time for GNO and Pampas did not disappoint!  Wakuriya will be our next stop.
This ain't McCormick & Schmick's, it's Maalox & Visa!  And I say that with deepest affection.  You will eat too much here.  Even if you are a seasoned (ha!) diner, and you intelligently decide to fast for oh, 7-8 days before your planned visit, you will leave stuffed like a Venezuelan ballot box. You should go the "all-you-can-eat" route, not to try all 14 meats the restaurant has to offer (good luck!), but because of the sport of it all.  There is an intangible art to the stop/start button.  A sense of timing and visual acuity are required.  Mario & Luigi have nothing on this.  Which reward would you rather have, after all: 8-bit simulated fireworks, or a slab of skirt steak oozing delicious juices?  I thought so.  The secret to this game is a watchful eye and a peripheral vision... Put the button on its "stop" side.  Survey the landscape for the mobile tray of meat you're most interested in.  Wait for it, patience is a virtue.  It's coming your way now.  You can smell the meat from where you're sitting... no, NOT YET, you don't want the damn pineapple-ham guy to come at you from behind for the ninetieth time this meal.  You're holding out for the good stuff!  He's getting closer... almost... oops, he stopped at another table.  Hand on the button now, slooowly.  He'll move again anytime, and... NOW!  Slap that button over to the green side, smile at the server, and enjoy your cut of slow-roasted happiness!  Don't forget to put the button back on "stop".  That ham guy is persistent! You can't buy excitement like this unless you hunt the game yourself.  Or maybe it was just the buzz from the 3rd glass of Zinfandel.  Either way, this places comes with my hearty recommendation, so long as you remember the "Maalox and Visa" nickname.  You will need both. Vegetarians: you too can stalk your own prey down at the side bar.  (No, not the one on this page, the one at the restaurant.  Well, maybe both. I digress.)  Meat-eaters should not forage too heavily here, though, lest you not get your gut-busting money's worth of roving animal carcass!  Besides, you can't go home and brag about how much celery you ate.  Your kids will laugh at you.
We had a wonderful family dinner here tonight.    It was a first time experience for all of us to experience the Brazilian method of carving skewers of meat at our table. Our server, Cheeno, was the consummate professional, catering to our needs and checking on us every 15 minutes during our dinner.   The meats were all very tasty, and the buffet of side dishes were very appealing both to the eye as well as the palate.    Several waiters passed by our table, asking us if we wanted to sample the tri tip beef, filet mignon, spicy chicken, chicken hearts, lamp chops, turkey chunks wrapped in bacon, leg of lamb, pork loin, and skirt steak.    You need to be ready to eat a lot of meat, and it was all very tasty and excellent quality. For dessert we ordered the flan and the cheesecake.   Both were elegantly prepared and the presentation was very nice.     We shared these desserts, and they were fantastic. We will definitely return to this restaurant in the future... a wonderful time.    We were even serenaded by a 3 piece live band, playing soft jazz songs while we dined. You should make this a definite choice for a special occasion... you will not be disappointed!!
So we went to Pampas on the prodding of our friend. I had second thoughts because ive been to espetus and i thought it was spectacular. Here is the gist of my experience... 1. The service was the worst! They tried giving us the sirloin 4 times, and bypassed us for other types of meat (the server bypassed us several times and went directly to a table full of overflowing cleavage. how unfair!). I actually had to complain to the waiter about it. Also, unlike Espetus where they give you meat before you even finished your current protein, we had to wait long intervals at pampas. In short, we ate less meat because we got full from the sides (veggies, soup etc.). Maybe thats how they economize... 2. Meat quality was so so and definitely less variety (we had 13 different kinds at espetus and 7 only at pampas0 3.You have to pay extra for seafood. Its included at Espetus (nice succulent shrimp) In conclusion: It is so worth the drive and the $6 difference at Espetus. If you want side dishes, just go to fresh choice, not Pampas where youll save a lot of money.... P.S. the waiter tried salvaging the service by giving free dessrt, but it was too too late...
A meatlovers dream come true!!!! They have card with red on one side and green on the other.  We quickly flipped it to green and the parade of hot delicious meat on swords came our way. They had everything from skirt steak, lamb, chicken and fillet.  Any kind of meat that exist, you name it and they most likely have it. 3 hours later we stumbled out of there with probably enough protein in our stomach to last the whole week.  Full but very satisfied, it was worth the 44 bucks for all you can eat. My first experience with Brazillion bbq and I loved it!  You can never complain when you have endless amounts of meat to eat.
I would have to say the atmosphere/decor is what barely gives this place 3 stars for me.  I do love the modern decor, and definitely a great place to hang out at the bar.  But the food fell short and I prefer Espetus over Pampas. The salad/sides bar was pretty good but nothing really jumped out at me.  The meat selection wasn't as extensive as Espetus, or maybe it was and they just kept bringing the same stuff to our table over and over.  Overall everything was just OK, but then again I'm all about quality and not quantity.   If you're all about the all-you-can-eat-meat, then this place is definitely for you!
I like meat. Given that and the fact that I wasn't paying for dinner, the Rodizio on their menu was a GREAT experience. The Rodizio gives you unlimited access to the sidebar and unlimited MEAT. The Sidebar: Had a lot of fresh and grilled vegetables. Interesting things like vanilla infused cantaloupe, seasoned pears, cous cous, grilled eggplant and peppers, etc. Basically the sidebar is to get you full off of starchy things. The Meat: Men come around with huge skewers of meat and they give you these tongs that you use to pull off the meat as the men cut it for you. I really enjoyed the filet mignon, rack of lamb, spicy chicken, and tri tip. The grilled pineapple (i know, its not meat...) was delicious as well - so warm and sweet, literally melts in your mouth. The top Sirloin was ok as was the turkey wrapped in bacon. I thought the spicy pork was really strange - I mean it wasn't TOO spicy for my korean palate, but at the same time, it had this weird sweet taste that I did not feel complemented the spiciness. Oh and i had chicken heart, which was interesting, but nothing that tasted that spectacular. Dessert: We had the Coconut Flan, Tres Leches Cake, and Chocolate something. They were all very good. Im not a big fan of flan, but my friends all seemed to like it. The tres leches was my favorite because of the wonderfully tart passion fruit sauce they put on it! YUM. The Chocolate dessert was also tasty, especially the toffee that came with it on the side. The atmosphere was casual, yet classy and the serves were all so pleasant and willing to serve you slice after slice of deliciously juicy meat! I would definitely come back if I wanted to have a more "fun" type of dinner and perhaps celebrating a special occassion with a large group of friends or family.
I'm not sure why everyone else finds the food here good.  I lived in Sao Paulo, Brazil and have also frequented several churrascarias in LA, Chicago, and Texas, and Pampas has been the most disappointing. Don't get me wrong, I was super excited when I found Pampas, in my own backyard in Palo Alto.  So we went there for a friend's birthday. It was a weeknight, so it wasn't too crowded, but the service was horrendous! The rodizio meats were being served sometimes by our waiter!  These meats are meant to be served by the chefs, who each owned and cooked their cuts of meat.  Even the picanha, my favorite cut, was overcooked and dry.  All the other cuts of meat were worse, including the lamb. Since the restaurant was pretty empty, you figure they would keep coming around with the skewers, but no, that was too much to expect apparently.  We had to keep asking for them to bring us more meat. The salad bar was just whatever, although they did have farofa, the yucca flour to go with the rice and beans, which is great.  They don't even have farofa at Fogo de Chao.  The cheese bread, pao de queijo, was pretty good, but they're quite stingy with them. Overall, I was really disappointed with Pampas.  Perhaps my expectations were too high, but this place failed in both cuisine and service, perhaps two of the most important ingredients of a good restaurant.
Amazing!!! I made a reservation for a large party two weeks before we came in for my boyfriends birthday.  I was upset because a lot of people rsvp'd but didn't show or where really late. The restaurant was really nice about the situation and waiting for our party. The food was delicious. I ordered the Rodizio which is the all you can eat meat and side bar. They have numerous types of meat that were all very good. I don't eat rare meat but they satisfied me by giving me the portions that were well done. The side bar had more selections than I was able to handle but everything I tried was very good especially the banana dressing. I loved it.
I don't normally give 5 stars, but the service here really pushed it over the top.  Now it could be because we went there on a Tuesday, but the experience was amazing. Ambiance: The restaurant was well lit, tables were well placed (i.e. not tightly packed), and the decor was nice.  There's sky lights and a well lit bar area too.  There's a middle split-level as well.  There was no live music, but that's probably cause we went on a Tuesday. Food: The food was really good, and its what you would expect from a brazillian churrascaria restaurant.  Me and my gf went only for the mammal meat (i.e. pork, beef and lamb) and skipped the salad bar.  All the pieces were moist, tender and well flavored.  The lamb came with an optional balsamic sauce, which was perfect!  And, the pineapple was well grilled, there were no raw pineapple chunks. Here is our ranking of the meat: #1  Lamb Chops - and get the balsamic sauce! #2  Skirt Steak - omg so flavorful, and perfect texture #3  Top Sirloin #4  Filet Mignon w/ garlic and herb - the parmesan one wasnt that good #5  Tri tip - try it with the chipotle sauce #6   Leg of Lamb Like I said earlier, we skipped the birds, so maybe there's something better. Service: Our waiter and the staff were very friendly.  What impressed me the most was that the sword guys actually asked us what we wanted, and brought it out soon after.  This is a HUGE difference when compared to Espetus in SF.  At Espetus, you eat whatever they happen to bring you (doesn't matter if you've had the tri-tip 3 times already), and you might have to wait 30 min for the meat you want.  Here at Pampas, they ask you what you want ( like lamb chops ) and they bring it out soon after.  So, as our waiter said, "don't be shy, you can't be shy here"... he was right.  If you are waiting for lamb, or for skirt steak, ask, and they'll bring it right out. Miscellaneous: One thing the other braizillian bbq places can't beat is the location of Pampas.  If you're reading this, you are a south-bay'er.  And because you live in the south bay, you are a suburban person -- you are lazy :P   Pampas is CLOSE!  Palo Alto has EASY, FREE PARKING!  It's safe and pleasant to go for a walk on University Ave. after you're stuffed with meat! (and everyone should walk it off before driving... otherwise you'll be DUI of Meat) Normally I'd give the place 4 stars, but the service definitely pushed it over to 5!
All-you-can-eat steaks, chicken, pork, lamb and whatever other meat they serve.  Service is good and the price is fair.  I like the layout of this restaurant.  The dining experience was pretty cool and I will definitely have to come back.
Ole! Ole... Ole! Ole! Viva Brazil! My oh my do the Brazilians know how to serve their meat! Over and over and over again... I'd been wanting to try Pampas for MONTHS and finally booked reservations for my 25th birthday. My party of seven was running a little bit late. So the BF thought it would be courteous to call the restaurant and let them know. A hostess was a bit catty and replied "We are going to have to give your table up at 830, Sir." Our reservations were for 630. Slightly annoyed, my BF replied "We're a big sale, so don't worry, it'll be worth it." Ugh.. Whatev lady. Anywho, we arrived at this posh two story restaurant and were greeted by the bartender who suggested that we try a Brazilian drink called 'capeirinha' while we waited for our table to set up. Capeirinhas are made with Brazilian rum, sugar, lime, some other delicious component and crushed and whished together into one of the best mixed drinks I've ever tasted! As we were seated we all decided to try the Rodizio for $44. Saber after saber of filet mignon, top sirloin, bacon wrapped turkey, lamb shank, lamb chops, bbq chicken, skirt steak... and more rotated their way around the table. All very delectable, all very delicious, and all very unlimited! The side salad bar really wasn't all that memorable. I tried to not fill up anyways since I wanted to capitalize on all that meat! Only downside to filling up on so much protein was that I had a hard time maintaining a buzz while at the clubs partying that same night. I didn't even wake up with a hangover! :P Note to self: Light dinner equals cheaper bar tab.
Brazilian Steak House- If you love meat, you have to come here!! ALL YOU CAN EAT!!! It is one of my FAVORITE restaurants yet. The ambiance is really relaxing. I walked into a live band playing soothing music throughout the night. This is one of those place where you can dress very casual or switch it up and do a formal dinner date. I recommend doing the Rodizio and side bar (unlimited)= $44 MENU: PICANHA traditional Brazilian cut of top sirloin MAMINHA tri-tip slow-roasted and seasoned with rock salt and olive oil CORDEIRO leg of lamb marinated with yogurt, garlic, and mint LAMB CHOP marinated with garlic and ginger LOMBO pork tenderloin slow-roasted with authentic spice dry rub LOMBO pork tenderloin slow-roasted with parmesan SIRLOIN FILET with garlic and herbs SIRLOIN FILET with parmesan FRANGO natural chicken legs and thighs marinated with white wine and herbs FRANGO PICANTE natural chicken legs and thighs marinated with garlic, spicy peppers, and vinegar LINGUICA Brazilian pork sausage PRESUNTO ham slow-roasted with pineapple PERU turkey breast wrapped with smoked bacon FRALDINHA skirt steak with onion-herb marinade Personally, I love their Lamb Chops. Lamb can be gamy, but it was delicious here. I ate FOUR all by myself. MmMmmM so gooood!!! The service is cute also. They give you a card with two sides. Red (stop asking) and a green (ready to eat more). Highly recommended, but make sure you are hungry. Starving is even better :)
This was my first experience with Brazilian Rodizio dining, and I thought it was fantastic.  Definitely go for the unlimited $44 option.  I think just getting the side bar for $27 is not worth it, but the meats are delicious. My favorites:  any kind of pork loin (lombo), tri-tip (maminha), and the turkey wrapped in bacon (peru) Their drinks are strong here, at least in the caipirinha style.  Service was excellent.  I'd come back for special occasions, or when I'm craving lots of meat.
I enjoy this place very much!  I love their modern decor and set up.  I enjoy the bar/lounge seating area --it's designed very efficiently to initiate conversation with those around you. I've had two drinks here, both caipirinhia's.  I had the original/regular caipirinhia and the pineapple caipirinha.  Both were extremely good and really strong --you get a total huge kick off the cachaca.  That could be a good or bad thing, depending on your preference --I loved it. We had a company dinner here so we had a fixed menu with a choice for our main course.  In short, I had Cheese bread, Ribeye Steak, and Chocolate Torte. The Cheese Bread is scrumptious!  I still dream about the flaky crusted roll with the cheese melted inside. The Ribeye Steak was divine!  It was grilled nicely with the right amount of spices and flavors.  The whipped potatoes on the side complimented the steak very well. The Chocolate Torte, I was not a huge fan of.  I did not like the bacon infused taste on the side, but the main dessert it self was fine. Overall, I would definitely go back here again.  Just thinking about this place makes me giddy.
Pampas = MEAT If you order the rodizio, which is what they are best known for, expect a ton of meat.  14 different meats and they are happy to continuously offer you seconds, thirds, fourths, until your explode. My favorites were the spicy chicken, pork with parmesan, and turkey wrapped in bacon. The side bar is plenty of food to eat on it's own.  For $27 it's worth it.  A a regular restaurant I could order a charcuterie platter and salad and pay that much. At Pampas, there are so many options and you can keep going back for more.  My favorites on the side bar were the marinated mushrooms and manchego cheese.  You can't go wrong with cheese.  =) When you sit down to eat a selection of breads are offered.  There is cheesy bread which is gluten free.  They are like little cheesy golf balls and super yummy.  The fried polenta was alright.  They also give you fried bananas which are super YUM!  Five stars alone for these little yummies.  I didn't have room in my stomach for dessert so I ate two of these and it did the trick to cure my sweet tooth craving. For beverages, I tried two of the featured cocktails.  The Alma and Sgt. Pepper are two berry flavored drinks.  My favorite was the Sgt. Pepper.  The description sounds a bit intimidating but it was light and refreshing. We had kids in our dining party.  Children under 5 eat free. Service was very good.  Our waitress was very attentive and was able to recommend cocktails and beverages to keep us quenched. The only negative is that we had bottled water poured at our table and one of the servers refilled our 1/2 full water glasses with regular tap water.  They were very accommodating with changing out our waters but still charged us for the additional bottles.
Pampas is an orgy of meat, but I was getting cock blocked all night. 1.  It's not a good idea to have your staff socializing at a table, then seat your guests who have been waiting for 20 min. past their reservation at that exact same table. 2.  Ordered Mojito..............waited a good 15 min. for the waitress who took my order to graciously reappear and have to ask her again for it.   Then (wait for it...) have her say to my face, "Oh, so you ordered a mojito?"  YOU ARE THE BLITHERING IDIOT WHO TOOK MY DRINK ORDER!  Shoot me now. 3.  Note to others if you're in a party of more that four.  Avoid sitting in the middle of your party with your back to the aisle.  You will be dodging swords-o-meat as they sneak up on either side of you unannounced and leave you barely any space to continue your meal. 3a.  This position will also leave you vulnerable to falling utensils.  One of the wait staff dropped a utensil on my back.  Un Freakin' Believable! 4.  My friend ordered the blueberry-acai crisp but is absolutely stuffed and can only muster the strength to finish half of it.  Our waitress (yes, that same one) proceeds to say to my friend, "I can't take that back! They'll be so mad in the kitchen."  Ok, so maybe she way trying to make a joke.  But when she returned, my friend still had not finished the desert and she again tries to guilt him into finishing the desert!  He's engorged himself on the endless servings of meat, cut him a break. 1 star for the live music and interior design. 1 star for the meat. I really wanted to enjoy my dining experience here but the service completely and utterly sabotaged any possibility of that happening.
My boyfriend took me here last year for my birthday. I don't remember too much, just that it was really good. However, I do vividly recall the tres leches cake. We took it to-go so we could share it with our daughter who was at home. They boxed all the toppings separately so I had to place them on myself when I got home. I got a little creative and ended up having fun with it. While I'm not sure I did it how they would've done it, it still tasted amazing. I love how they offered fruit and nuts with it. It was a nice balance of textures.
Good Brazilian BBQ ("rodizio") style restaurant. It clearly doesn't top Fogo de Chao in LA, but I don't think it's what they are looking for. So, basically a churrascaria consists of 3 cornerstones: the open buffet, the table sides and of course the meat. Let's break down to each of them: Buffet: nothing really special but it's worth mentioning that all the good and brazilian traditional stuff is here: tasty white rice, wonderful blackbeans, rich farofa (fried yucca flour) and sauteed cauli greens!!! An added bonus is that if you are not a meat lover or not in the mood (= diet maybe?) for the rodizio you can have just the salad bar. Table sides: usually rice, farofa and fried yucca are on the table sides (I know, some are at the bufffet!), but here you will find only fried banana and polenta and cheese puffs, which is not bad at all, as you can keep fully focused in the meat! :-) The meat: it is good. Yes, it could be better as usual, but it was a surprise to find a real picanha and maminha, two traditional meat cuts that you should definitely try. Ah, the ham+pineapple is delicious and should work as a "dessert option" for some. Bonus: I know it's hard after the meat extravaganza but don't miss the desserts; make sure to order a couple of different ones to share and taste how different they are. Service: Jorge, our waiter was always around and checking if the we were ok. And don't be shy to ask the waiters if you want a specific meat cut; they will happily bring it to you. Very nice place for medium to big groups, birthday parties, etc. Need to come back to check the main course options. I saw some couples (dates in a churrascaria?) having something nice, but it's almost impossible not to order de Rodizio!! A note to Pampa on the drinks: it's a big NO-NO to use (high fructose corn) syrup on drinks like caipirinha and mojiito. Real CANE sugar is mandatory on these drinks and you better change that!!
I want to review this from the standpoint of someone not knowing what to expect. I was invited here for a birthday party without knowing anything about Pampas. My wife and I went there for a friends birthday and we arrived a few minutes late (on a weeknight) and the hostess seated us after we got our drinks and joined our party. We then were seated on the loft (guess everyone is referring that as the third floor). The waiter came around and was instantly pressuring us all to get the Rodizio. My wife is not a big all you can eat person so she asked to see the menu a bit longer as she was interested in the entrees. The waiter very eloquently told us at the table that the Rodizio was much better than any of the meats they can offer on the menu. That should of been a red flag to me but I just figured that the waiter was speaking in a manner that he did not understand that came off as contradicting. Either way my wife ordered the entree and I went with the Rodizio. I made my way down to the salad bar. Now I do not know what to expect, but for $44 I expected a pretty extensive salad bar. Cucumber soup, 2 types of salad, grilled vegetables, corn, mash potatoes and pastas are the main focus but they did have other items. I personally was not excited about anything but I figured the meat is the focus of the meal. I sat down and being that the salad bar took about 10 minutes to get through and the meats came about 5 minutes after I sat down, i expected my wife's entree to show up withing 10 to15 minutes. 30 minutes after we ordered the entree I had to ask our waiter to check on our order. 15 minutes later it showed up. He placed in on the table and walked away. He did not ask her if she needed anything nor did he apologize for the wait. Either way she had her meal and I was continuing on the meats. The chicken was excellent as was the bacon wrapped turkey. All of the other meats seemed to be slightly dried. The waiter was extremely inattentive. He came by 2 times after he took our order. once to bring my wife's entree and then the check. The servers for the meats and the bussers were AWESOME! They explained all of the meats and were patient when I was not sure which to use the tongs. The bussers brought us fresh side plates and made sure our glasses has water and were overall really good. Our evening ended with a small dish of ice cream with a candle in it for the birthday boy. When the check came the waiter gave us a smile and thanks and walked away. There was no sincerity to it nor a welcome to come back to the restaurant. The bill was $440 (including a $67 dollar tip, which i would of argued if I was hosting the party as he did almost nothing). After all that they still had the nerve to charge $4 for my friends cup of ice cream for his birthday. I am sorry but the waiter/waitress is the front line of any good restaurant. Poor service makes you not want to come back, no matter how good the food is. So here is my review broken down: Ambiance: 3 stars Food: 3 stars Service: 1 star ( I would of given no stars if it wasn't for the support staff) Price: 1 Star Location: 2 stars (does have a parking garage next door, if you can find a spot) Overall it is an experience and much different than your normal dining outing, but the service from the waiter and the time waiting for one of their non-preferred food items completely blew it for me and I will not be going back.
5 fucking stars thats whats up. When you first walk in you are greeted by  the hostess and a beautiful bar to the right, fully stacked like a girl with double d's.  I ordered the gaucho at the bar, its some mango fu fu drink but its good as fuck.  What made the experience better was that these assholes in front of me didn't finish ordering their drinks so they were going back and forth asking their friends what they wanted.  Patience paid off and the bartender gave me the drinks on the house.  FTW Onto dinner, which was the bomb diggity no doubt (shout out to Blackstreet and Dr. Dre)  What I liked: -side bar with veggies, cheeses, deli meat, mashed potatoes (one of the two  used coconut milk), soup, and a bunch of other sides but DON'T FILL UP ON THIS -the meat was fuckin tender, juicy and fresh to death from the kitchen.  I recommend eating EVERYTHING THAT COMES YOUR WAY.   They'll have servers walking around that cut the meat right off the skewer.   Notable favorites; the chicken, bacon wrapped turkey, filet oh and the fuckin pineapple. -I also recommend the breads they have: banana, rosemary and cheese.  All are very fucking delicious and piping hot.  So good I wasn't even done with my meal and I already wanted to come back. Overall, great food, beautiful decor, clean bathrooms, great service.  Check it out! Fuck yeah!
Had reservations here on Valentine's Day, the food was fantastic! Try not to overindulge on the sidebar, you'll miss out on a lot of the meats if you get full easily and accompany everything with the grilled pineapple! Overall great, calm experience..they even had roses for the ladies that night!
I can't believe I had to wait over 23 years of my life to experience the rodizio. The place is protein heaven; various meats are dropped off on your plate every 5 seconds. My favorite were the spicy pork and the rack of lamb with balsamic reduction. The herb sirloin, spicy chicken, and flank steaks also hit the spot. The side bar is included with lots of vegetarian options, especially liked the rice balls and grilled peaches there. But dude, you come here for the meat so lay off the side bar as much as possible or else you might as well go to Fresh Choice and stuff your face with chlorophyll (at least they have dessert included). Service is great here, non-stop meat delivery until you flip the tab of defeat to the red side.
5 stars for service - it was impeccable. Food and ambiance - I give 3 stars - just because it's in PA doesn't automatically qualify it for 4+stars! I am spoiled because of Boi Na Braza in Texas. Their meats are fresh, flavorful, and their side bar is not like Pampas' - Vegas-style buffet - yucks! True churrascaria like BNB has all the sides in a very elegant setting, arranged in a circular table, like one would do at home. Pampas' sides were of reasonably good quality, but not every authentic Brazilian, and it was the arrangement that threw me off - it was on a side table pushed against a wall. Their lamb selections were good, but overall as I said, I am spoiled having been to some of the best churrascarias outside of Brazil, in Dallas, Texas!
Mmmmm... This was actually our second choice for a Bachelor's party dinner, but it should have been the first. We had to wait a whileeee to get our table. But rightfully so, we were a huge group of 12 and the place was happenin' on a Saturday night. With a live jazz trio serving up tunes in the front of the restaurant. While waiting for our seats, we noticed a Michelin sticker on the window. "I didn't know this place was Michelin rated" I said and almost immediately a voice behind me proudly said "Yup! Just got it last week." It was Pampas' executive chef who continues to tell us about how he preps some of his signature dishes. Some of his recommendations were: spicy chicken wings (which he told us took 2 days to marinate), chicken liver and the linguisa. Needless to say, we tried each one plus a whole lot more that night. We all had the all you can eat buffet. Now, typically Brazilian BBQ places are known for their MEAT and not so much for their side dish/salad bar. But this place had DA BOMB side dish/salad bar. Such creative dishes like a mango salad and spicy fruit salad had me make multiple trips to the salad bar. As for the meat. I'd recommend you try a lil' bit of everything, everyone has their own favorites. My personal faves were: the prime rib, spicy chicken and the linguisa. It isn't a meat but the grilled pineapples are to DIE FOR. The atmosphere was great. We were on the lower floor and noise level was just right. I've gotta come back and this time fast the entire day before I do.
I'm a guy and I love meat. So 5 stars because it's all  you can eat! Hey that rhymed! Be sure to flip your card to red so you get a chance take a bite because they keep coming and coming non stop with 13 different types of beef, pork, and lamb. Definitely a fancy place so dress up and go impress your date...if you have a date that is.
It's 9:47am and I'm writing this review because I'm hungry and I love meat ...especially when it just keeps on coming!! Unlimited meat! What more could I ask for!! YEAH! Oh yeah, the sidebar is great too. :) It may get a little overwhelming, but all you have to remember is to turn the stone over to RED for them to STOP serving the meat then back to GREEN when you want MORE. Easy, right? The ambiance is great and everytime I've been there (Fridays & Saturdays) they have some live music going on. Loves it.
Excellent place for happy hour. From 5-7pm they have an awesome selection of creative cocktails(think caipirinhas) for $5 and half off all their apps. A friend and I shared the olives and feta. We were pleasantly surprised that they were nice size hunks of cheese and a decent amount of olives. We also, shared the guava glazed ribs, DELICIOUS and well worth the $5. Our total bill for 2 at happy hour was $20!! Can't beat that with a stick. Awesome!
No offense to the other reviewers, but have you ever been to a Brazilian steakhouse before?  Yes, the concept is awesome.  Yes, the food is great.   Yes, the location is perfect.  But 5 stars? Really? I think novelty is distorting your perception. In a nutshell: - Hostesses didn't seem to care - Bartender should read up on elementary drink recipes - Waiter needed to be reminded to bring our wine and appetizers - No water service (not once) + Food was great + $44 is a good value + Servers (the meat servers) were spectacular The food was phenomenal. The pieces of meat were tender, tasty, and juicy.  Perfectly cooked (I like my meat rare) and perfectly seasoned.  The spicy chicken is a must, and the Picanha is as good as I've had in Brazil.  The servers who come around with the meat are extremely courteous.  They promptly send out anything you haven't tried or anything you want to try again. I wish I could tip them directly. The hostess, bartender, and waiter were a different story.  The hostess made us wait (we were the only ones waiting) even though they had a table.  What are the chances of a party of 6 waltzing in an hour before closing time?  If we didn't insist on being seated, we wouldn't have had enough time to eat . While waiting at the bar, we ordered a White Russian.  The proportions were way off.  How off? You can make the same drink at home with 3 shots of vodka and a few drops of Wite-out liquid paper. After being seated, it took a while for our waiter to assist us.  Ordered a glass of wine, and it didn't come until halfway through our meal.  Apparently, I needed to ask a waitress to remind our waiter that we still existed; my bad.  We never bothered to ask for water, so naturally, we never got refills. I'm definitely coming back, but I hope they improve the service in the meantime.
I'm kind of an old-fashioned guy in that I drown my sorrows in beer. Saturday, after a miserable day, I tried something different--I drown my sorrows in meat. The simple rule of thumb you have to subscribe to if you come here is you're going to order the $44 Rodizio, which entails an all-you-can-eat salad bar and all you can eat meat. Waiters walk around with skewers of meat. When you're ready to eat, you flip a card to green. When you need to stop, you flip it to red. The choices in meats range from amazing (the filet, the bacon-wrapped turkey, the skirt steak) to adequate (I'm a lamb guy, but I couldn't really get into either lamb dish). You also get free, unfettered access to the salad bar which is a meal of it's own entirely (in fact, you can just do that for $27). It has a great choice of salad options, meat meal neccesities such as potatoes and mushrooms, plus a great option of cheese, cold cuts and olives. It also has a touch of adventure. For as good as the meat was, the best thing I ate here was the cold cucumber soup (the girlfriend raved about the coconut cous cous). To add insult to injury, the dessert we ordered was not only delicious, but included a bacon-hazelnut toffee. If you live in the neighborhood, this is definitely something to do. If not, it's still worthwhile. Just be prepared to spend an extended period of time listening to the person you came with cry out "Meat gut," which only seems naturally after eating nearly two pounds of beef.
Keep it coming with the meat! Bring it on with the filet mignon, top sirlon, garlic and mint marinated lamb, pork loin with coriander adobo, tri-tip with rock salt and olive oil, homemade Brazilian pork sausage and skirt steak with onion-herb.... I foresee a heart attack but it will not stop me from eating! Shared a bottle of wine with my friends and gorged out on the food. To be honest, I'm not much of a meat lover but this place is will be my exception. All you can eat for only $44 AND it includes the salad bar. Oh my goodness, let me tell you about their salad bar- it's EXCELLENT. The moment the waiter lead me to the salad bar, my mouth dropped and I had to confirm, I turned and said to him, "WOW! THIS IS THE SALAD BAR??"  There were assorted cheese, pasta, mashed potatoes, roasted and grilled vegetables, hummus, olives, sauteed rushrooms, soup, rice, smoked trout, different types of salads and fruit salad...I believe there's much more but I can't remember. All I can say is, just the salad bar alone will fill you up. Almost forgot to mention that their slow roasted, warm, sweet, tart and juicy pineapple chucks is very popular. It's a refreshing break for your palette. Pampas is MY Mcdonald's. ba ba ba ba baaa, I'm lovin' it.
Here's a list of what I liked: GREAT: bacon-wrapped turkey, filet mignon (garlic or parmesan), grilled pineapple, GOOD: lemon chicken, skirt steak POOR: tri-tip (deep pink but oddly dry) I didn't have room for the lamb, prime rib, or spicy chicken, but I'll try those next time. $44 / person for all-you-can-eat meat, as well as a salad/appetizers bar.
